It's called "touch", use it some day. You'd do a more convincing job if you'd reminded me that whiskers are sensitive to air currents.
&gt;pushing forward and getting out of the kill zone of the ambush This indicates that it's not US troops who have the control of the territory. When they go outside, they are the prey. When convoy is attacked, fighting continues and attackers are in control and US forces defensive until reinforcements arrive. In the Vietnam war US troops could go to the movies, sit in the bars and walk on the streets in the areas controlled by south. It seems that US friendly locals are not controlling any areas in Iraq (sans US bases).
The author of Q likes it for being (with some mathematical assurance) more general than normal evaluation methods.  I can't say that it's good, but I can say that it's different.
This is why he shouldn't be allowed in America: "He publicly refers to the Islamist atrocities of 9/11, Bali, and Madrid as 'interventions,' minimizing them to the point of near-endorsement." (Taken from: http://www.danielpipes.org/article/2043 ) 
This amazing little creation is an edible miniature cheeseburger with fries but measures less than 1 inch in height. Take a look at these photos - it has to be seen to be appreciated.
My representatives voted against it, little difference that it made.
Thanks heavens the Western powers are making the world safer
Even through GM's closing U.S. Factories and opening them in other countries, I've always bought Chevys (except for one Caddy and an Oldsmobile). Recently, I've been wrestling with myself over the fact that some of the "foreign" makes (Toyota) have models that are more U.S. than the home boys (with more and more parts being imported).  This Hannity episode is the final slap in the face. I will NEVER buy GM again.
Do you suppose that passive vs. active is a useful distinction in the context of senses?  Well, maybe a better distinction would sound like 'sensing from a distance vs. sensing from contact', with temperature-sensing in mind.
The implication there is that the tests we're using to measure intelligence, which were developed about 100 years ago, are really a good measure of intelligence.
Way for a professor to screw up _the_ most important subject in the "real world"! From what I see, the class was mostly trivial projects designed to be paper pushing exercises.  I had a very different experience in the software engineering course that I took: the textbook used was _Mythical Man Month_, there were no slide-based lectures (when something had to be shown on a project, the professor would use emacs on his Linux laptop) and there was a term-length, serious project (a web application that had to run on UNIX). We could choose our own programming language (generally C, C++ or Java, but I think anything, besides PHP/MySQL -- which would make the point to trivial and fail to teach anything -- could be used). While there were some documentation exercises (writing use cases and documenting cvs check-ins and what was done during the week), most of the class time was spent learning how to write testable code and how to refactor. Being comfortable with refactoring, a concept that I've never been exposed to in an educational setting before, seemed to the most important thing to have learned from the course that I took to the "real world" -- and I'm not even software engineer (I'm on a production operations team which does its own platform/ops-tool engineering)! The professor was also open to humour and I do believe, had at one point, posted some sarcastic cartoons on his website. While Drew's response was unusual, it was certainly understandable: being asked to drop the course for posting a Dilbert cartoon on your team's wiki is preposterous.  However, there's also the matter of setting: Drew is at a large public university in the middle of nowhere; I was at a small private university. Although it was a traditional university, founded hundred and fifty years ago ago by a religious order, it had great links to the industry (alumni, co-ops, donations) and was located in the Sillicon Valley. That I think is the main difference: in the a midwest university, you're just another student ID number, trying to be yet another white collar wage earner. Whereas here, nerds are the bread and butter.
It was pretty split, but there were a few Dems that voted for it
damnit, people are so immature when it comes to sex. That's why this stuff sometimes goes overboad. I think it's funny, but people who are offended... no comment.
So the USA lost a scholar in the humanities?  Who cares?  Show me a good mathematician or computer scientist that we're keeping out and I'll start worrying.  
Bingo. Contrary to what the US Army thinks, the occupation forces are just hostages. The Shia's hostages in case of USAF misbehaviour against Iran. The Shia want the USA out of Iraq just as much as everyone else, and they certainly have the power to oust the US Army, but they tolerate the situation for the greater good. Moqtada al-Sadr, learn that name cause you'll be hearing a lot more of him in the future.
Correction: *The Shawshank Redemption* was indeed a novel first (see below), and a very good one at that. So while it does create a good, and rare, example of a good story turned into a good movie, it doesn't support your argument. It actually supports the original article, in that you didn't even know it existed as a book. I do acknowledge, however, that I've heard tons of anecdotal evidence for learning English via TV. A side note: I gave up TV three months ago. I'm doing OK. (*Different Seasons* by Stephen King, 1982, contained four novels, three of which were turned into movies: the above-mentioned, *Stand by Me* and *Apt Pupil*. I'm not a Stephen King fan, I just know this, so please don't blast my reading choices.)
There is nothing you can do Big brother has total control over your countries.
It reads to me that the professor is a prig who's doing his duty by being fair (as he sees it) but can't handle the slightest cirticism. Yates is over-caffeinated and very young, but "almost sociopathic" seems quite an exageration. To put it another way, I woldn't want to work with either one of them, but if I had to choose one, I'd probably choose Yates.
The minumum wage if Canada is around $7-8 CDN (varies from province to province), and most people who do earn this money according to the article are teens living at home, so it essentially is disposable income, since thier parents provide for thier basic needs. Of course, there are many below the poverty line who do desperately need this money to survive, and I sympathize with their situation. My recomendation would be to have a higher minimum wage for adults (this plan is under debate in Ontario). Also, the author quite succinctly mentions that a standard minimum wage is ineffective in dealing with poverty but fails to provide any alternative plan. Brilliant.
The cutting of funding for the Vietnam government. This was the final death knell of colonialism in Vietnam
another example of the failure of the American system  the entire system is rotten to the core
We need LESS, not more of these religious, islamic fucks in this country!
George Bush is speaking the truth actually
Which would explain why Canada, Sweeden and Switzerland are having similar problems with him.  No, I have a feeling he cares as much about our internal politics as he does about what you had for breakfast. They've made it abundantly clear that what they want is for the "foreigners" to get out of "their" countries and away from their holy sites.  I think of it as unilaterally imposing a set of racist CC&amp;R's backed up by a bunch of self-exploding nutjobs.  But that's just me. 
Actually it's more like pornographic spam than regular porn
At what point does negligence become treason?
Forth is one, as is FSVO Lisp, but 'speaking to the metal' has more to do with convenience and the intentions of implementors than with any language limitation.  You could certainly write a Python program that emits machine code enough to boot a Python interpreter with os modules.  It doesn't matter that this would require a great deal more work than a corresponding native[0] Forth system. I don't know why you'd seem to sneer at 'dropping down to C'.  Do you remember when C frequently dropped down to assembly?  Or when C could call out to FORTRAN for help? 0] 'native' in Forth parlance means 'on the metal', vice 'native code', which just means 'compiles to machine code'.
For those of you who haven't seen me around the thread's I normally begin my comments with "In my country (Ireland)"
So his "crimes" are: Free speech  * He has praised the brutal Islamist policies of the Sudanese politician Hassan Al-Turabi. Mr. Turabi in turn called Mr. Ramadan the "future of Islam." Guilty on suspicion * Mr. Ramadan was banned from entering France in 1996 on suspicion of having links with an Algerian Islamist who had recently initiated a terrorist campaign in Paris. Free Assembly  * Ahmed Brahim, an Algerian indicted for Al-Qaeda activities, had "routine contacts" with Mr. Ramadan, according to a Spanish judge (Baltasar Garzón) in 1999. Free Speech/Free Association  * Djamel Beghal, leader of a group accused of planning to attack the American embassy in Paris, stated in his 2001 trial that he had studied with Mr. Ramadan. Free Speech * Along with nearly all Islamists, Mr. Ramadan has denied that there is "any certain proof" that Bin Laden was behind 9/11. Free Speech * He publicly refers to the Islamist atrocities of 9/11, Bali, and Madrid as "interventions," minimizing them to the point of near-endorsement. Guilty on suspicion  * Intelligence agencies suspect that Mr. Ramadan (along with his brother Hani) coordinated a meeting at the Hôtel Penta in Geneva for Ayman al-Zawahiri, deputy head of Al-Qaeda, and Omar Abdel Rahman, the blind sheikh, now in a Minnesota prison. Guilty of having an account with a bank that is accused and not even proven. wtf? (that's like saying everyone who had shares in Enron should be accused of the crimes the executives are) * Mr. Ramadan's address appears in a register of Al Taqwa Bank, an organization the State Department accuses of supporting Islamist terrorism. 
Yeah, everyone should just calm down. Why get angry about this, really?
Mr. Ramadan is not on trial.  He applied for a visa. At least the last time I checked, that's a privilege, not a right.
Out of curiousity, what percentage is classified as military aid?
If you do not believe that something exists, you believe that that something does not exist. It is semantically the same. The fairy, pixie, etc. argument is often used to show that atheism is not the same as some other religion. I don't disagree on that point alone. Religion is characterized by:  * Belief in the absence of proof.  * An apparent need to continue in that belief characterized by summarily rejecting alternate beliefs.  * The apparent need to convince others of your belief characterized by public expressions of that belief along with arguments against alternate beliefs.  * It is often accompanied by anger, etc. that other beliefs persist and public calls for the banishment of such beliefs. The agnostic professes no belief. The simple atheist who simply doesn't find any reason to believe in a god or gods can hardly be called religious. But the atheist who prosetylizes and denegrates those who hold that there is a god or gods, has put on the mantle of religion. He is behaving in the same manner as fundamentalist preachers who rant against atheism. He has made his atheism his religion. As to the comment about the list of words. Homosexuality, for example, is not in the bible. The concept is and the practice is condemned, but the word is not in the bible. Many of the terms listed apply to specific denominations and their interpretation of the bible. Such denominational specific interpretations hardly require comment. The document which was ratified to become our constitution does not contain the word or the concept of 'separation of church and state'. The constitution requires that the state not establish a religion and that the state not interfere with the free expression of religion. The 'separation of church and state' concept is used to argue that religious people cannot hold office or practice their religion while in public service. Article VI of the constitution states that "... no religious test shall ever be required as a qualification to any office or public trust under the United States." It is plain that the government should remain neutral to religion. Neither encouraging it nor prohibiting it. When a religious person conducts a public function, he is not prohibited from expressing his religious beliefs because he is operating publically. 'no religious test may be required'. The 'separation of church and state' concept takes the plain statements in the constitution that the government leave religion alone and turns it upside down, requiring the government to prohibit that same expression of religion. You ask where I think this fiction of 'separation of church and state' comes from. I suppose it was created by those who want to find in the constitution cause for the government to regulate the expression of religion. One of the 'founding fathers', I believe Thomas Jefferson, is quoted as stating his belief that the church and state remain separate. Of course, the state and any church or churches should remain separate. The constitution requires that. It is the meaning applied to the concept of 'separation of church and state' which is the problem. There is no constitutional provision that the government prohibit the expression of religion. In actual fact, the constitution prohibits the government from doing that. But 'separation of church and state' is constantly quoted as requiring the state to regulate the expression of religion.
er... the website says the protest is on october 5th....
This is awesome. Check as of minute 27.
Yes, and Tariq Ramadan isn't in it. I've always wondered what justification people who hold the perspective that you seem to have for opposing the proposition that the US should simply extend its citizenship to everyone in the world. Why, after all, should we discriminate against anyone based on their race, their beliefs, or their place of birth?  What moral justification can you present for this unfair policy of automatic exclusion?
Not really, we say we do but we don't really.   You have to get permits from the gov to protest, when you do you are fenced into "free speech zones". In many small ways free speech is limited such as certain t-shirts not being allowed in airports, schools.  Many others. With passage of recent laws I can be carted off for associating with susspected terrorists.   Don't get me wrong it's better in the US than many countries, but still what we have is not what the bill of rights promises.
I heard they kicked him out.
What's wrong with ||?
Lame, was amusing the first time, 5 years later and 10,000 times later it's not.
I admit my mistake. It's not term rewriting. It's graph rewriting. Even better :) http://clean.cs.ru.nl/About_Clean/Clean_Language_Features/clean_language_features.html &gt;is a lazy, pure, higher order  functional programming language with explicit graph rewriting semantics; one can explicitly define the sharing of structures (cyclic structures as well) in the language;   From the book: http://clean.cs.ru.nl/download/Clean20/doc/CleanRep2.0.pdf **Basic Semantics** The semantics of CLEAN is based on Term Graph Rewriting Systems (Barendregt, 1987; Plasmeijer and Van Eekelen, 1993). This means that functions in a CLEAN program semantically work on graphs instead of the usual terms. This enabled us to incorporate CLEAN’s typical features (definition of cyclic data structures, lazy copying, uniqueness typing) which would otherwise be very difficult to give a proper semantics for. However, in many cases the programmer does not need to be aware of the fact that he/she is manipulating graphs. Evaluation of a CLEAN program takes place in the same way as in other lazy functional languages. One of the “differences” between CLEAN and other functional languages is that when a variable occurs more than once in a function body, the semantics prescribe that the actual argument is shared (the semantics of most other languages do not prescribe this although it is common practice in any implementation of a functional language). Furthermore, one can label any expression to make the definition of cyclic structures possible. So, people familiar with other functional languages will have no problems writing CLEAN programs. A CLEAN program basically consists of a number of graph rewrite rules (function definitions) which specify how a given graph (the initial expression) has to be rewritten  A graph is a set of nodes. Each node has a defining node-identifier (the node-id). A node consists of a symbol and a (possibly empty) sequence of applied node-id’s (the arguments of the symbol) Applied node-id’s can be seen as refer-ences (arcs) to nodes in the graph, as such they have a direction: from the node in which the node-id is applied to the node of which the node-id is the defining identifier.  Each graph rewrite rule consists of a left-hand side graph (the pattern) and a right-hand side (rhs) consisting of a graph (the contractum) or just a single node-id (a redirection). In CLEAN rewrite rules are not comparing: the left-hand side (lhs) graph of a rule is a tree, i.e. each node identifier is applied only once, so there exists exactly one path from the root to a node of this graph.  A rewrite rule defines a (partial) function The function symbol is the root symbol of the left-hand side graph of the rule alternatives. All other symbols that appear in rewrite rules, are constructor symbols. The program graph is the graph that is rewritten according to the rules. Initially, this program graph is fixed: it consists of a single node containing the symbol Start, so there is no need to specify this graph in the program explicitly. The part of the graph that matches the pattern of a certain rewrite rule is called a redex (reducible expression). A rewrite of a redex to its reduct can take place according to the right-hand side of the corresponding rewrite rule. If the right-hand side is a contractum then the rewrite consists of building this contractum and doing a redirection of the root of the redex to root of the right-hand side. Otherwise, only a redirection of the root of the redex to the single node-id specified on the right-hand side is performed. A redirection of a node-id n1 to a node-id n2 means that all applied occurrences of n1 are replaced by occurrences of n2 (which is in reality commonly implemented by overwriting n1 with n2).  A reduction strategy is a function that makes choices out of the available redexes. A reducer is a process that reduces redexes that are indicated by the strategy. The result of a reducer is reached as soon as the reduction strategy does not indicate redexes any more. A graph is in normal form if none of the patterns in the rules match any part of the graph. A graph is said to be in root normal form when the root of a graph is not the root of a redex and can never become the root of a redex. In general it is undecidable whether a graph is in root normal form.  A pattern partially matches a graph if firstly the symbol of the root of the pattern equals the symbol of the root of the graph and secondly in positions where symbols in the pattern are not syntactically equal to symbols in the graph, the corresponding sub-graph is a redex or the sub-graph itself is partially matching a rule. A graph is in strong root normal form if the graph does not partially match any rule. It is decidable whether or not a graph is in strong root normal form. A graph in strong root normal form does not partially match any rule, so it is also in root normal form.  The default reduction strategy used in CLEAN is the functional reduction strategy. Reducing graphs according to this strategy resembles very much the way execution proceeds in other lazy functional languages: in the standard lambda calculus semantics the functional strategy corresponds to normal order reduction. On graph rewrite rules the functional strategy proceeds as follows: if there are several rewrite rules for a particular function, the rules are tried in textual order; patterns are tested from left to right; evaluation to strong root normal form of arguments is forced when an actual argu-ment is matched against a corresponding non-variable part of the pattern. A formal definition of this strategy can be found in (Toyama et al., 1991).
This is mad.
Wikipedia, by definition, doesn't present one side or the other.  It presents a synthesis that may succeed in balancing both, or may not. A person who really cares about an issue is probably always going to do better by reading advocates for each side.
Cats do not wear clothes or carry a cane while they walk!
I want some of that shit.
Yeah - TFA, while interesting, is quite revisionist. Most people, at least up to the 20th century, have been more inclined to blame the [Gracchi](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Gracchi).
Pity this has 0 points; I quite enjoy unusually-hackable-programs like this.  Most programs in your environment[0] will be written in C, alas -- even IRC and MUD and such clients, where you'd want the most rapid path from "I'd like to talk in pig latin, ha ha!" to "ouyay erkjay!".  Even when such programs offer an embedded language[1], you have an extra demarcation between tame[2] and feral[2] hacks. 0] your unix environment.  Or even: your BSD|Linux|OpenSolaris environment. 1] [the sawfish WM](http://sawmill.sourceforge.net/) is very capable, more comparable to Eclipse[3] than StumpWM. 2] [see italicized text](http://quadium.net/funge/spec98.html#Fingerprints) 3] [not the IDE](http://common-lisp.net/project/eclipse/)
I wish all of my teachers had been like him.
It's funny how people who pirate are always claiming that it doesn't hurt the creator.  The assumption seems to be that the pirate knows better than the creator what's best for them. So yeah, ask the author and if they're cool with it then it's fine, otherwise it's not. 
FDR lead America to victory against the Nazis. Why are you talking shit about him?
Nice
Is VirusBurst a genuine program or a fake?  Verdict - It's a fake!
&gt; Part of me still wants to slap people when they reel off "I'd buy that for a dollar!" as if it really were a Robocop thing. That part of you isn't very happy.  I hope you ignore other things it wants you to do as well.
It is a shame and some generation will have to eventually deal with the toxic waste.  It is a shame with wars and mass poverty the waste of most of the entire continent of Africa.  One day a couple hundred years from now I believe the majority of Africa will be like America was 50 years ago and USA will be like a 3rd world nation.
Boolean operations have to work on booleans in C#. References/null aren't booleans. Consequently "if(null)" is illegal as is "return x || y" when x and y are reference types.
It is not idiotic to believe that there is no god. Neither is it idiotic to believe otherwise. People holding either concept have reasons for their belief. The atheist looks about him and sees no evidence for god. Others look about them and find evidence for god. Neither concept implies mental deficits. When you argue on the basis that 'people who don't believe like me are idiots', you cheapen your argument. Those who hold alternate beliefs can say the same about you -- with the same effect.
It should be pointed out that the period from when Rome became a dictatorship until the empire was split was a time of great expansion and wealth for the empire. The time was called 'Pax Romana' in fact and the prosperity was similar to the one America experienced following WWII. Most of the roman emperors of the first few centuries AD (exept some like Nero) were quite capable and expanded the borders of the country to encompass all of europe, asia minor, and north africa. Nevertheless, the empire decayed after it became too big to be controlled by one person and had to be split. Corruption, disasters and endless raids by barbarians  all caused the Western empire to be destroyed. The eastern one with its capital at constantinople (Istanbul), however continued to exist, as a mere shadow of its former glory, until the 15th century
It was founded as a christian nation.  That doesn't mean we can't correct that mistake.
I agree.  Hitler said to give him the youth and he could change the country and the world.   We are homeschooling now. 
In other languages, however, this would work fine.  (or object1 object2 object3) Perl fought for a while about whether or not it should have an operator like its || and 'or' that works on definedness rather than truthfulness. But, goodness, *coalesce*?  What a silly name!
Yep. When Moqtada al-Sadr sees that the time has come, it's not home-made bombs anymore. Sunni rebels in Iraq (like the members of Al-Qaida), just don't have the know how and support like he has. http://www.msnbc.msn.com/id/8829929/ &gt;The officials say the shipment contained dozens of "shaped charges" manufactured recently. Shaped charges are especially lethal because they’re designed to concentrate and direct a more powerful blast into a small area. &gt;“They’ll go right through a very heavily armored vehicle like an M1-A1 tank from one side right out the other side,” says retired U.S. Army General Barry McCaffrey. &gt;Military officials say there’s only one use for shaped charges — to kill American forces — and insurgents started using them in Iraq with deadly effectiveness three months ago. First Israeli Army tank to Lebanon was destroyed with these  only after ten meters. I bet al-Sadr is currently busy. He is hiding these around and keeping quiet.
I agree, the best way to show disapproval is to be silent and do nothing, that way no one else knows you are unhappy about the way things are going.
Nice.
Ah, thanks.  I've avoided Clean for licensing reasons, but I'll put it on my list to study it to see how it plays out to be aware of such graphs.
What do you expect? It's a shit job and they get paid minimum wage.  Why would soldiers risk their lives to save a bunch of highly paid mercenaries?
Which means the margin of error was hundreds of thousands of votes greater than the margin of victory.
lol it was like a street party good stuff
Are you sure you didn't see it on tv?
From their FAQ: Q:  But aren't there communists in World Can't Wait? A:  Yeah, there are. Supporters of the Revolutionary Communist Party helped initiate it.   
I had an idea for what to do.  *Organize*.  Let's figure out what the #1 threat to our freedom is.  Is it the breaking down of separation of powers?  Then we'll be *Americans for Federal Seperation of Powers*.  Is it the increasinlgy unfair elections?  Then we'll be *Americans for Fair Elections*.  If we can't decide on one or the other, then in a pinch we can be *Americans for Fair Elections and Federal Separation of Powers*.  But it's best to select only one issue, because if you take a position on a lot of different issues, then if someone disagrees with you on one of the issues, then they're less likely to join.  Our organization should not take any position on government welfare, for instance. Then what would we do?  Get noticed.  Have marches and demonstrations.  Tell other people about whichever atrocity we are choosing to combat.  Make those in power fear us.  Do anything that would make us likely to be in any mainstream news media.  Most of all, *try to get as many people as possible to join the organization*.  Make it free to join, so that anyone can easily become a member.  Try to solicit donations to pay for our demonstrations. And stockpile guns and RPGs.
The Asteroids one (a.k.a. craterface) is hilarious.
Why should atheism need defense? Look up the meaning of the word 'fool'. It does not mean lacking intelligence.
Passive vs active is an important distinction for hunting and thus for biodiversity. We live in a world literally flooded with light but with very little sound. The development of the eye led to the Cambrian explosion so it's nothing to sneer at. Distance matters for hunting. It doesn't matter so much for solitary activities like grazing or building. So that's another important distinction too.
Yes I would agree.. OpenVPN is rawking my world. The set up wasn't too bad. I thought it would be much much harder.
"and also becomes headline news" That answers movafova's question "Why are no mainstream news outlets covering this?"
60-70% of it typically. The rest is corporate aid. Genuine humanitarian aid coming from the Anglo countries is as rare as thunderstorms in the desert. The biggest givers of humanitarian aid are the Scandinavian countries, Cuba and Venezuela. And ironically enough Iran.
Democracy isn't ACID compliant, unfortunately.
The world Jewry? Is that Barbara Walters take on global trinkets? Damn Semitic Conspiracy! Maybe Adolf was right! Thanks pica for showing us the light...again, and again, and again... 'Yawn' from the sakebomb "Hey, were not the chosen people anymore. We're just highly selective."
Could you supply a source for that? I would like to see the numbers myself, if it isn't too much trouble.
But it's so simple. All I have to do is divine from what I know of you: are you the sort of man who would put the poison into his own goblet or his enemy's? Now, a clever man would put the poison into his own goblet, because he would know that only a great fool would reach for what he was given. I am not a great fool, so I can clearly not choose the wine in front of you. But you must have known I was not a great fool, you would have counted on it, so I can clearly not choose the wine in front of me. Iocane comes from Australia, as everyone knows, and Australia is entirely peopled with criminals, and criminals are used to having people not trust them, as you are not trusted by me, so I can clearly not choose the wine in front of you. And you must have suspected I would have known the powder's origin, so I can clearly not choose the wine in front of me. You've beaten my giant, which means you're exceptionally strong, so you could've put the poison in your own goblet, trusting on your strength to save you, so I can clearly not choose the wine in front of you. But, you've also bested my Spaniard, which means you must have studied, and in studying you must have learned that man is mortal, so you would have put the poison as far from yourself as possible, so I can clearly not choose the wine in front of me.
&gt;Posit: Haskell and Clean exist. Why Q? * Haskell, Clean (H,C): lazy.  Q: eagerly evaluated.  * H,C: Hindley/Milner static type system.  Q: Dynamically typed.  * H: Monadic I/O.  C: Uniqueness I/O.  Q: standard side effecting I/O.  * Q: user defined [special forms](http://q-lang.sourceforge.net/qdoc/qdoc_9.html#SEC42).  * Q: built-in [symbolic](http://q-lang.sourceforge.net/examples/symbolic.q) manipulation.  * Q: lexical and [dynamically scoped](http://q-lang.sourceforge.net/qdoc/qdoc_7.html#SEC28) variables. 
mm
Or perhaps they just want to make a point.  I think the liberty dollar people are more like an NGO than a corporation.
proof that cats are evil
0] Cowardice.  And for what?  So that you won't receive downmods, so that you won't look like a fool in retrospect -- but deleting the comment means that you can't look like *anything* in retrospect.  "Man, I was a jerk." or "Ha ha, I was a jerk, but I *meant it*." is still quite a bit more satisfying than "... what was I?  Did I even exist?" 1] Netizens have a greater intimacy with time, with the co-play between *past selves* and *future selves*, even if many people today only think yet about this in terms of "how could this effect my future employment?". 2] It's vastly more important to try and speak *sincerely* with your own voice, consistently from your own evolving values.  To do anything else is to eventually not recognize yourself.
Its currently lisenced also in LGPL.
When American citizens exercising their freedom of assembly becomes "cute" to a sufficient number of people, then America will truly be lost. I'm not here to debate the observable short-term effectiveness of these protests, but the ease with which you mock them and their patriotic significance is sickening. How comfortable your life must be from behind your keyboard, criticizing others who are out there actually doing something, *anything*, to demonstrate their patriotism and love of American freedom. However "cute" and worthy of derision you find the 1st Amendment now, you may come to miss it someday when neo-conservative authoritarians have finally finished eviscerating it from the Bill of Rights. Or when your grandchildren ask you what you were doing while it was all happening.
What if there was a game, like Everquest, that everyone played which had Liberty Dollars as it's currency?  What the Liberty Dollar needs is some clever marketing.  How can we create a micro-economy where all the participants agree to use Liberty Dollars?  Once we create micro-economy, then people who are connected to that economy can use Liberty Dollars as a real currency.  The trick is thinking of the mirco-economy.  If a very successful game, like Magic: The Gathering successful, used Liberty Dollars, that would be a huge step in the right direction.  Can anyone think of any real-world applications for an alternative currency on a small scale?
Wow, another Slate economics article to [abuse the phrase "beg the question."](http://reddit.com/info/g24l/comments/cg2x9)  What are they teaching kids in economics schools these days?
It is not particularly wise or self-serving of the administration to remove the court of law as an avenue for conflict resolution.
I don't get it.   If he paints the pictures as it looks to him they should look like a normal cat.  It they look distorted to us they must look different that the real to him as well.  What's the flaw in that logic, if any?
frontpagemag is some kind of satire site to remind us all how morally corrupt the president and his suppoters are, right.
The link you provided yourself is an excellent source. I'm saving it as a reference myself. Scroll down a couple of pages down from [this point](http://www.globalissues.org/TradeRelated/Debt/USAid.asp#Arenumberstheonlyissue) and you'll see a chart that shows the quality of the USA's aid. Now if you look above you'll see that *on average* half of all aid is crap. The USA's aid is in the worst category for quality. Other interesting factoids from your source: While the US provided large amounts of military aid to countries deemed strategically important, others noted that the US ranked low among developed nations in the amount of humanitarian aid it provided poorer countries. “We are the stingiest nation of all,” former President Jimmy Carter said recently in an address at Principia College in Elsah, Ill. — Who rules next?, Christian Science Monitor, December 29, 1999 and this one: Commenting on the latest US pledge [of $10 billion], Julian Borger and Charlotte Denny of the Guardian (UK) say Washington is desperate to deflect attention in Monterrey from the size of its aid budget. But for more generous donors, says the story, Washington’s conversion to the cause of effective aid spending is hard to swallow. Among the big donors, the US has the worst record for spending its aid budget on itself—70 percent of its aid is spent on US goods and services. And more than half is spent in middle income countries in the Middle East. Only $3bn a year goes to South Asia and sub-Saharan Africa. — Monterrey: US Will 'Seek Advice On Spending Aid', World Bank, March  Middle income countries in the middle east. Geez, I wonder if they mean the 2.5 billion to Israel (2 billion military, .5 billion other) and the even more to Egypt. Yeah that would add up to 5 billion right there. The only society stingier than the USA is Japan. Which really doesn't surprise me given they're racist fucks.
personal blog
and Laura Bush will be GM's new car safety spokesperson,  http://www.snopes.com/politics/bush/laura.asp
&gt;Bring warm clothes. October is at our door, so temperatures are around -30 C (-22 F) and it's gonna get colder.  Huh?  It's in the 50's and 60's (F) in Montreal right now (daily high temp)  And with Global Warming, Canada might be downright balmy pretty soon. 
That's because you don't live in Lancaster, PA. When my wife worked there, we used to see the Pennsylvania Dutch, who are Amish, driving their horse-drawn buggies all the time. Hats and all.
==&gt; reverse (reverse X) = X;   ==&gt; list (take 3 (reverse (reverse {1..})));   [1,2,3] I don't think this is easy to express in Haskell or Clean. Note that line 1 above needs to be read in from a file, and can't be entered at the interactive prompt.
&gt;I could point out that while today’s “enemy combatants” are Muslim fundamentalists, Christian fundamentalists might not be all that far behind. &gt;I could do all that, but it would really depress me. I hope ya didn't mean that to be taken the way I took it.  I'm going to assume I misunderstand.  heh
Eloquent. But dude, you gotta get out a little more.
All theists have to do is lay out their argument for believing. Then use the same reasoning skeleton (outline/format/model whatever you want to call it) in a different context (like every single other religion). Reductio ad Absurdum kills practically every reason a theist could have for believing (other than it makes me feel good, or I derive a social benefit from signalling my belief). So maybe idiotic isn't the word but their lack of consistency and the amount of wiggling they do trying to stay outside of logic (of course you can't use logic against logic) deserves a mark against their problem-solving abilities.
Unfortunately I can't take credit for it.  It's a quote from The Princess Bride.  It's just what came to mind while I was reading the RPS Society's tips. heh
mmmm mangos
I can see my house! 
&gt;If you do not believe that something exists, you believe that that something does not exist. It is semantically the same. That's simply false. "(not (believe x))" and "(believe (not x))" are semantically different. Put it this way, write a list of all the things you believe. By your logic, this would have to include negations of all the things you don't believe. You're an a-fairyist if you don't write down "fairies exist", even if you don't substitute "fairies don't exist". &gt;The agnostic professes no belief. The agnostic professes no *knowledge*. This may lead him to a lack of belief, in which case he is an atheist; or he may believe anyway, in which case he is not an atheist. He does not occupy a "middle ground": agnosticism operates on a different axis. On the matter of words vs. concepts, you seem to have taken my point. That the words "separation of church and state" do not appear in the Constitution does not mean that it is not a constitutional principle. You are arguing that it is not for other reasons, but you at least seem to see the problem with the argument based on the words alone. As for the rest of your comment: the Constitution protects the free exercise of religion. If your religion requires you to kill someone, you will not find that exercise to be free or protected. Why? Because your right to have your actions protected, on the one hand, has come up against someone else's right to be protected from your actions, on the other. By the same token, the free expression of religion is restricted *where it violates the establishment clause*. It's straightforward enough.
The flaw in that logic is that schizophrenia is not like color blindness.  It doesn't just change the way his eyes interpret signals.
&gt;Why should atheism need defense? Because it is constantly attacked.
There is actually a multi tier minimum wage system (at least in Ontario). There is the "Student Minimum Wage" and the regular "Minimum Wage". The student one is lower, as can be seen [here](http://www.labour.gov.on.ca/english/es/factsheets/fs_wage.html) and there is even more levels for Liquor servers, etc.
hy‧per‧bo‧le  /haɪˈpɜrbəli/  Pronunciation[hahy-pur-buh-lee]  –noun Rhetoric 1.\tobvious and intentional exaggeration.  2.\tan extravagant statement or figure of speech not intended to be taken literally, as “to wait an eternity.”
this gives an unrealistic portrait of what actually  happens in these situations. usually when we can get the terrorists in a conventional gunfight we fucking slaughter them. e.g., not too long ago NATO troops killed 200 taliban while only taking 4 casualties. but in the magical land of the internet, and especially reddit, where the US is weak and Iran/North Korea are fearsome enemies to be reckoned with with extreme caution, this is irrelevant for the most part.
You're assuming that what he sees on the canvas is distorted inversely to how he sees the actual cat. But, he might just see the painted cat even more distorted, or perhaps not at all. It's a mental illness, there's no real logic in what a schizophrenic experiences.
Yes. That was a strange argumental line. you can be extremely intelligent and have achieved academic excellence and still be a fool.  And what is it with the hollywood stars? Is that the best they could come with for "people who do no evil"? 
The article describing schizophrenia and the various drugs used to treat it is interesting reading: http://www.schizophrenia.org/crackup.html
Thanks for the links. Man I'm dying from laughing.
&gt;All of us Christians worship the Prince of Peace, but the fundamentalists I referred to earlier publicly supported what I consider the unjust and unnecessary invasion of Iraq. I always find it silly when self-proclaimed christians try to speak out against fundamentalist christians.  "Oh no, you're taking that book I believe to be the word of an infallible creature *literally*.  You can't do that!"   In reality, the fundamentalists are closer to the real culture of christianity than people like Jimmy Carter are.  The Judeo-Christo-Islamic God LIKES it when you kill infidels, we are told time and time again in the holy books.  Don't believe the holy book to be true?  Then you shouldn't call yourself a member of that religion, because you are not.  Simple as that.  Jimmy Carter would rather whine and complain that fundamentalists are not using the "right" interpretation of the words (hint: they are), instead of speaking out against this illogical superstition that 90% of USians buy into.  Coward.
I hope every parent in the country remembers this come election day. 
Oh GOD! Not Kenny G, anything but Kenny G.
(nudge) How about a blog post, and then a reddit submission?  (nudge) Nice to have a URL to language's homepage, but *fun* to talk about what the language means to them.
I find evidence for god in the world/universe. I take it you don't find such evidence. I fail to see how that makes either of us idiots. Why should I lay out my arguments for believing? Why should you lay out your arguments for not believing. Why should either of us care what the other chooses to believe? Just for fun, though: The current best theory for the beginning of the universe is the big bang theory. According to that theory, the univerese was in a nearly perfectly ordered state -- quantum fluctuations being the only disorder believed to exist. The second law of thermodynamics states that entropy increases in any closed system. The big bang theory does not postulate that the universe was or is interacting with any other system. How do you suppose such a perfectly ordered system came into being?  -- Possible evidence for something greater than the universe having something to do with its creation?
Hmm, interesting, so it's sort of logic-ish and treats the lhs and rhs of equations as co-equals? Pattern matching on any language construct?
I was at Target (the store) and saw a woman with a T-Shirt that said "Think Less, Pray More."   I thought, in the olden days, people would see that shirt and think "what a weirdo" and laugh her off as some kind of nutcase. Then I thought, sadly, today, in suburbia, in the Target store, people probably see that shirt and nod their heads yes, amen. I got so depressed. 
&gt; And what is it with the hollywood stars? That's more a problem with the modern world than a problem with atheism or Christianity.  If you're trying to come up with a list of names that other people will recognize, it's going to be hard NOT to have the list be mainly populated with rock stars and movie stars.  How many top scientists can the average person name?
[See sleepingsquirrel's reply](http://q-lang.sourceforge.net/examples/symbolic.q) Also, belatedly: [2. Yet another "Haskell for the poor"?](http://q-lang.sourceforge.net/FAQ.html)
I hope every parent in the country remembers this come election day. 
I just disagree with you on the restriction of expression due to the establishment clause. I believe you have the right, even if you hold public office, to say "I don't believe in god." I believe you have the right to say that if you are the principle of a school. I believe the constitution protects that right. The courts have ruled otherwise, citing the 'separation of church and state' which does not exist in the constitution. But the constitution protects that right. If you want to put a little Buddha on your desk, you should be able to do that. If you are a teacher in a public school, you should still be able to do that. When you go to lunch, you should be able to pray to Brahma, or Allah, or God. Or you should be able to say 'The hell with it, lets eat!'. Your expression of your belief, whatever that belief is, does not violate anything in the constitution. The fact that you may hold public office or work in a public setting doesn't change your right to say anything you please. (Yes, I know neither of us has any right to yell 'fire' in a crowded theater.)
From a historical perspective, it's a stretch to claim the U.S. was "founded by" the population. Following the Continental Congress, most of the Founding Fathers returned home and had to campaign vigorously for ratification by the colonies. In the beginning it wasn't at all clear that it was going to happen; there was extremely vigorous opposition, in particular from the anti-federalists.  The US Constitution finally took effect in March of 1789, after nine of the thirteen states ratified it. To this day, there is a question regarding whether the U.S. Constitution was actually legally ratified-- after all, the Articles of Confederation, which were then in effect, required all states ratify any changes. I think it's in this way that the confusion often arises. If you have always lived under the assumption that this country is a democracy then you'd be inclined to think of "founded by" as meaning the population, rather than the select group of intellectuals who made it their life's work to bring forth this nation.
yeah i was thinking the same thing. thw word "fool" was taken completely out of context. the bible is talking about being fools WITH YOUR SOUL. are you going to throw it away, or save it.  not about having brains. jeez what a dumb argument. also. "75% of americans are christians, 75% of all people injail are christians" makes no sense what are you trying to prove, that christians are bad. some christians who call themselves christians are. but everyones a sinner (i'm not justifying it) but everyones done bad things.  and then 10% atheists- .2% jail. so what does that mean.  is that trying to prove that atheists are better than christians? heres one for you. (probably) 50% of all people who call themselves christians do not act ina christian manner. but they have a much better chance of getting into heaven than an atheist... and someones gonna say "well i don't believe in hell", well tough luck. hell doesnt care if you believe in it or not.
It wasn't just "revisionist". The "hostorical parallels" claimed in that article are just dreamt up by the author because handing over dictotorial powers to individuals at times of war and emergencies was something that was done throughout the time period of the republic from beginning to end. It wasn't something done for the first time in respone to piracy as many reading this article would end up believing. Also, his claim that Pompey was given dictotorial powers in 68 B.C is false. (edit: corrected the year to 68 B.C )
George Bush is only the puppet.  The corporate interests driving his decisions are calculating, powerful, faceless, and without accountability.   Halliburton makes Caesar look like hello kitty.
Soldiers get paid minimum wage?
Tallies with accounts in [Iraq for Sale](http://video.google.com/videoplay?docid=6917530144343888396)
Curiously, why do you think that Clean has a greater chance of dying?
i wonder what nintendo is tring to do these days. after "touching is good" then this..whats next!
Are you going to go to hell if you don't defend it?
Interesting, the progression to more fractal and geographic pattern like pictures is what strikes me, somewhat.
[Here](http://reddit.com/info/k6jf/comments/ck8sa?context=5) is a similar thread.  I quickly scanned his fatwas and from what I could see, he did not talk about expected results of his terrorist activities. His primary objective was to repel the US military force from Saudi Arabia where they had been since the first Gulf War. Maybe he hoped for it and maybe not but it's amazing to see the liberty of Americans slowly ebbing away.   
IMO animal rights activists are right up there with animal charites! Both are such a complete waste of money, time, human effort.  If we funneled all the resources from animals to charities that actually save human lives could you imagine the impact!
Oh yeah, only in the magical land of the internet, and especially reddit.  Let's conviently forget this was on CBS, you dipshit.  You probably didn't even watch the clip if you missed that.
Track-Issue is a work flow management system optimized for all types of organizations, groups which need a total integration of work management and proper delivery. Track helps make deliver better service by tracking, prioritizing etc.
An age-varying minimum wage is probably the best kind of minimum wage (if you are going to have one).  Germany manages to have a much lower youth unemployment than France because the minimum wage for German apprentices (which are youth) is lower than for normal workers.
Take a deep breath John.  We hate the printer, but not the people who make it.  /wink
Sigh... read the other comments. No one said "the White House" blocked it. Only that a Bush appointee who knows the score blocked it. I don't believe that Bush is an evil mastermind that controls every little thing that goes on in the government.
ha ha, that's the one.
I don't think it's ever going to work, but if you're interested in the latest research, I think the hottest stuff is probably separation logic from 2002, which lets you prove things about simple programs that have memory.
I'm not going to hell, or heaven, athiests like me think that's nosense.   But I'm still concerned that atheists (being a minority) are attacked - as pointed out in the article which we're commenting on - and need to not be steamrolled by the larger majorities of religious people, or have our rights diminished in any way.
Infinity is not a number - you can't use it in an equation - only for limits. The only proper use for infinity (as far as I know) in math is to describe the behavior of a series.
Uhm... I don't care?  How the hell did this get onto my recommended page?
There wasn't any mention of 66 BC in the linked article, and there was no mention of the Roman concept of "dictator" powers.  There was a quote from Plutarch, and some discussion of the money and troops involved, followed by ponderings of the effects of the grants of power and funds.  The key points were tied up in the huge war chest and the fact that there weren't time limits for the power granted by the Senate. edit: typo
OS kernels are not that big. If you exclude drivers (which are conceptually separate programs, even if they run in the same address space), OS kernels are quite small.
I didn't see any terrorist, did you?  I didn't see any insurgents either. I did see Iraqi's defending their Homeland.
They can't find a way to both be responsible and to make money. They're fucked. Bear in mind that they "leaked classified national security info" about a year after being told not to, and only leaked it once the book was about to be published. The conservatives can have them.
I would get up and leave.
If you uphold the rights of free expression, you have my support. Just remember that that right applies to everyone.
I don't understand.
This can't be real. It isn't Nintendo's style. Nintendo is all "family friendly."
It's ironic that the US is building the wall to keep people out of the US. I now think of it as a countrywide 'Escape from New York' movie.
Abortions are for terrsts
Do you have any scientific *proof* that there's no such thing as a soul?   Aha!  you don't!  see there really *is* a soul then! Q.E.D.   
Who needs TV when you have BitTorrent?
That's a good description. His obsession with race is sloppier than yours. He's probably not as smart as you are. I'll cut him some slack, and consider him in your tent just the same.
Because we're not talking about torturing terrorists, we're talking about torturing terrorist *suspects*.  That means that innocent people *will* be tortured, and probably longer than the guilty.
I am a software developer. The idea definitely does not translate well for me :-(
The fact that the word "dictator" was not used is irrelevant. The point is, the article claimed that complete power, not subject to checks and balances was given to an individual for the first time in history in response to pirate threats! This is clearly false.  And the powers were not granted by the senate (and the majority of the senators were against doing so), they were granted by the tribune. The issue of "time limits" is irrelevant because in the case of "Proconsul powers", the tribune had the power to withdraw them whenever it chose to unlike in the case of dictatorial powers. And in any case even the handing over of unlimited power to an individual for an indefinite time period had happened before in 82 B.C That's not something that happened for the first time in response to piracy, as the author of the linked article claims for the purpose of maintaining his false analogy.
Most definitely. I detest porn, personally. But I don't mind and often enjoy artistic nudes. This is one such case. The photography is very surreal.
http://www.lilitu.com/catland/images/gallery/coquette.jpg Dude drew pictures of cats flirting with him. He wasn't rotten or anything, but he was blinking.
You have serious issues. I feel sorry for you.
&gt; Is this the best way to take someone's dignity? Priceless.
Great articles!
There were 219 traitors.  We know who they are.  We should all make sure that they know this too.
i haven't noticed any loss my civil liberties.
no, I am not a negative person.
Here's [a more thorough look](http://instruct1.cit.cornell.edu/courses/nbb421/student2003/epl8/Blank%20Page%202.htm) at how his art changed over time, with more images.
When you're in the majority you're never in danger of losing your rights. When you're in the minority is when you have to worry, and defend. 
I submit that no one was plotting what happened.  It just did. Conspiracy theories are not necessary to explain all the bad things that happen in history.  Well-meaning people - among whom I'd count both Bush and bin Laden - can cause enough trouble by itself. The scariest fact about human society and history is that almost anyone who manages to achieve a position of power is completely sincere.  Insincerity is too easy to detect, and makes it hard to win power struggles.  Humans have insincerity detectors that are incredibly sharp and well-honed. This doesn't mean leaders like Bush and bin Laden don't lie.  They lie for breakfast, lunch, and dinner.  But they think they're doing it for a good cause.
Great articles &amp; links. Lots of information.
And what *was* "Abraham Lincoln's most appropriate quote"? Unfortunately, Bush is [right](http://reddit.com/info/kc0q/comments), in a self-fulfilling prophecy sort of way The more he treats it like a piece of paper, the more it's becoming one. Even Lincoln [helped](http://www.gmu.edu/departments/economics/wew/articles/02/lincoln.html) with that.
Actually, the majority can have their rights taken away too. Just look at what congress and the executive branch are doing to rights in America to all Americans (and visitors to America).
.. and both parties voted it in, 409 to 2. Is this really how laws should be made?
Is it just me or do they look blonder and skinnier now?
Really satisfying reading!
reptiles eyes are far better than mammalian eyes (human).  they can see uv spectrum (additional colors) and have filtering in color sensing cells.
The solution to gerrymandering is getting all interested parties to agree on an algorithm for a computer to use to divide up the districts.
Golly! Imagine my shock and suprise!
Your argument doesn't hold water. What christians do is what christianity *is*, not some theoretical version that exists only in your head. You don't get to embrace the christians you like and disavow the ones you don't; if you want credit for the successes, you must take responsibility for the failures.
I don't know. Although he's a thousand times better than Bush, Clinton always came off as insincere to me, with all his fake crying and "compassion" for the poor at the same time he was selling them out to NAFTA.  You also have religious "leaders" like Pat Robertson selling purity while living in huge houses and making gold mining deals with African dictators.  Sorry Mencius but I think it's pretty hard for most people to detect insincerity. If you want to believe, you will believe - until reality becomes unavoidable.
The only way a majority's rights can be taken away, is when a different majority takes their place, and forces them into a new minority. 
ha ha ha.  I remember learning about that add in a graphic design class.
Everyone keeps talking about how the election was stolen, implying that life would be so much better if John Kerry had won the election. Though Kerry might have done things differently as far as foreign policy is concerned (war in Iraq, terrorism, etc.), I am firmly convinced that he would have bungled our economy even more than Bush has. Now I am not saying that I support Bush. In 2004 I voted for a third party candidate, because I could not in good conscience vote for either Bush or Kerry. But I frankly don't believe Kerry would have been any better of a president than Bush has been (or should I say, Kerry would not have been less worse than Bush).  Either way, I also firmly believe that electronic ballots should be illegal at least until both parties, as well as a consortium of independent experts, agree that they are hack-proof, and they provide a paper trail. Until that time, paper ballots should be the only legitimate way to vote.
That is funny. "Nooooooooo, he didnt copyright it."
Dumbest argument for atheism I've ever seen. I'm an atheist because it makes sense, not because there are celebrities who are also atheists. Why doesn't anyone get that? And, just for the record, I've seen this thing posted to reddit at least once a week for the past 2 months.
Those are great! (well not really) But fun to look at. Costumes have come quite a ways from those plastic mask/shirt packs. I was once "Wonder Woman". :-)
Down modded for the appalling font used on the site. Gave up trying to read it after the first sentence.
Interesting.
James Brauch's blog has some very straight to the point information that is very usable.
Oh, there will be heavenly consequences, even if there is no heaven.
I think that "fool" has meant *a person without wisdom* for a long time, and that this hasn't changed. Atheists are supposedly fools according to preachers, this is true, but their own brand of "wisdom" comes from a book rather than within.
Daylight robbery.
Not everyone in nordic countries is happy with how things are there. The "success" of socialism in Sweden for example is a scam so big that one has to live it to believe how bad it is, and fortunately the system is falling to pieces quite fast. Some here think that the problem is not enough government, that is in a country where over 30% of the population works for the government, income tax is often close to %50 and sales tax(VAT) is 25%!, of course those are the people that think that the only reason big government fails is because it is not big enough, I wonder what they will say when the government controls everything, and still fails miserably? Oh, wait, someone already tried that... 
maybe it was a typo for "causal"
It seems to me that you're basing your entire impression of the article off the Plutarch quote: &gt; Pompey was to be given not only the supreme naval command but what amounted in fact to an absolute authority and uncontrolled power over everyone and &gt; There were not many places in the Roman world that were not included within these limits. While the geographical extent of the Roman empire went far beyond the Proconsulate, the vast majority of Roman citizens fell within its range.  While officially Pompey didn't have absolute power, he had such significant military power that nobody could directly oppose him.  Nobody (not even Plutarch) said "complete power" in that article, but the practical reality could certainly be characterized as "uncontrolled power", as Plutarch put it. I'm not really very well versed in the facts of the Sulla dictatorship, and there's quite a bit more of Roman history with which I'm not very familiar as well, so you could very well be right that there were earlier instances of similar or greater grants of power without official time limits. When considering the extent of Pompey's power, however, it might be instructive to look at the number of troops involved.  120,000 infantry and 5,000 cavalry -- that's a total of 125,000 combat arms personnel, not counting naval forces.  Compare that with today's United States Army.  Last I checked, it takes about five noncombat personnel for every combat arms soldier in the Army to keep the war machine moving.  The Army has roughly 500,000 soldiers.  That's enough for about 85,000 combat arms personnel (tankers, attack helicopter pilots, infantry, et cetera).  Think about that.  We live in a world with six billion people in it, and the army of the world's greatest military superpower can field less than 70% of the soldiers under Pompey's sole command. I, for one, wouldn't want to be the guy whose job it is to tell him to stop doing whatever it is he shouldn't be doing.  There comes a point in the concentration of power where checks and balances are just tic-marks in a ledger sheet used to keep people from feeling guilty or frightened while all they deny can possibly exist is actually happening all around them.
Toast is good. Therefore, YouTube is good!
it's also correct :)
&gt; His original comment suggested that going too far in embracing the notion of ubuntu would lead to the collectivism of the Borg which is an extreme leftist concept. Did you miss the words "too far" in your own paraphrase?   
I wish someone with more mainstream appeal (and better web design skills) were organizing this. Does anyone know of other upcoming protests?
no no no no no no no... that can't be right. this woman is not real. i just imagined that. maybe it was the whiskey. maybe I need sleep. please. someone. pinch me.
time flows like a river ... and history repeats
Supposing god exists, and that he is omnibenevolent. An atheist stands a much better chance of getting into heaven than a christian ever would. The god of love and mercy is not going to torture you with unimaginable agony for all time simply because you made what amounts to an intellectual error, and one that is impossible not to make unless you are a deity yourself. But he will take a look at those who believed (despite being giving a rational brain that shouldn't, by rights, believe such a thing unless it were defective) and how they acted. And most, apparently aren't good simply for goodness's sake. They're afraid of going to hell, or trying to earn heaven, which ignores the whole point... being a decent moral person, for goodness's sake alone, whether or not god exists, whether or not Jesus was real. Supposing he exists, I expect to see alot of atheists in heaven, and few if any christians. The jokes about how wrong we were will get old, as eternity goes by. And the sad irony of those who superstitiously guessed right, but are frying in a lake of fire... well, that might be depressing even in paradise.
we had an english literature teacher who was always drunk while taking classes. But by god those are the best english literature classes I ever have.
Of course, this isn't even remotely scientific, people change styles and draw things differently even if they aren't schizophrenic.  To do something scientifically, you'd have to have a set of schizophrenic and nonschizophrenic people draw the same things.
Redirecting time spent watching television doesn't seem too radical.   I came across an eye opening statistic recently that indicated that the average time spent viewing television is approximately 37 hours per week. That seemed high. if you were building a business I can see where that much television watching would impact results.
Enter a list of keywords that filter out submission titles containing them. Similar to the "-" operator in google searches: Show me titles without these words. 
I suppose that if we called denominations of capital "foo" instead of "dollars", then I could claim that any debt I have isn't valid since it's not represented using terminology normally associated with the exchange of money. What the hell?  Does every leftist-collectivist economic philosophy have to use the word "proletariat" to be associated with other leftist-collectivist economic philosophies in your estimation?  Have you no concept of subtlety, indirect reference, or parallel reasoning? Are you just playing dumb because it's easier than constructing a logical argument?
What this world needs is a good injection of clever. Instead, what we are assaulted with when we usually go about our business is the mundane. Same old, same old. I count shopping into the mix when it comes to the topic of "boring". I really do hate shopping. To me, shopping exists due to necessity. The mall is simply a repository of clothes, fast food, books — so on, so forth. You know what would make shopping better for me, though?  Clever shopping bags.
A few people in positions of power can remove the rights of millions. Being in the majority is no insurance against the loss of rights.
Wow, that really sucked for Coke...
The "Hit the Pinata" analogy makes sense. I like it.
You're right that everything can be done algebraically in terms of row and column arrangements. (That's actually how I did it first.) But I found that compiling an ASCII diagram to a composition of such arrangements is quite tricky precisely because of shared rows and columns. AFAICS it requires a "global" view and cannot be done simply by "local" cuts such as in your proposed reduce procedure: when you cut the diagram in two you have to look at the rest of the diagram and consider orthogonal cuts, too. So that's why I scrapped that and instead went with my "cloud of boxes" approach. If you can figure out a very simple algorithm for compiling to a composition of row/column arrangements I'd be quite interested in seeing it.
It looks like a surveyor just laid all that out by turning on a radius point.
Wow, I was going to comment on this, but the comments on that page are far more eloquent and persuasive than I am.
&gt;7) But Amnesty International and the left say the information gleaned from this technique is unreliable. Is it? &gt;Amnesty International is either confused, dishonest or both. Some people do say it’s unreliable. But the undeniable consensus is that water-boarding is an extremely productive interrogation tool. This is pure insanity.
It should have been enough to cause checks on preparedness, and as we all know, we were coincidentally "training" on that day.    
The market uses prices to efficiently allocate resources that have alternative uses. Supply and demand balance at an always changing equilibrium price. If government goes in and fixes the price of something, it distorts many aspects of the economy. An artificially low price like in food for example will cause farmers to destroy food crops and stop producing them altogether…eventually leading to shortages and lots of hungry people. An artificially high price on something means consumers pay more for their products or services and businessmen often earn excessive profits. An artificially high labor price (minimum wage) will also cause employers not to hire poor/inexperienced people who likely are the ones who especially need a break.  If our goal is to help genuinely poor people, why raise the minimum wage? If we want to help the unfortunate who might be trying to support a family, JUST GIVE THOSE PEOPLE MONEY! There’s no need to try to indirectly help them by fixing the minimum wage and sending large parts of the economy out of whack.
*Somebody* had to write Leisure Suit Larry!
it is not an argument for atheism.  it is a defense against those who think atheists are terrible people.  the use of atheist celebrities is just a way of showing people that atheists are good people.  people are gonna know whether some random guy off the street is a good person, but they will know whether angelina jolie is.
mr bush stop trolling reddit...
It's true that Pompey was granted an extremely high degree of power so much so that he arguably could have established a dictatorship if he wanted to, the way Julius Ceaser did later on. I just wanted to point out that what was at issue was the degree of power granted, not the time period it was granted for. Also, it is clear that giving someone so much power that he may try to establsish a dictatorship is less serious an issue than handing over dictatorship outright to an individual as had happened many times throughout Roman history. My focuse is on the false claim made in the article that the practice of granting to leader the power to rule without checks and balances originated in anti piracy sentiments.
Your observations were spot on even though you were positioning the products you produce...and, there is nothing wrong with that becasue they seem very reasonably priced.  I heard a saying once- "Turning $1,000 into $2000...that's good business....turning $100,000,000 into $200,000,000... that's inevitable. You are right about mindset.
When it first begun to load i was like, Oh haha, its just black. :P But seriously, So there is a black hole in the middle, right?
Why do all repuiblican women look like men? http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Ann_Coulter   
The Clean semantics are usually given in terms of graph rewriting but I don't think it's accurate of him to say that Clean is a GRS in the same way that Q is a TRS. Every lambda calculus variant tends to have a simple term rewriting semantics but when people speak of term rewriting systems they usually have something more expressive and unrestricted in mind. Here "unrestricted" also means "more dangerous and inefficient", by the way. :)
All right, who leaked this document? Round up every possible suspect, and tort^H^H^H^H harshly interogate them until someone confesses.
I've also lived at/below the minimum wage level for many years in a row while I put myself through University. People say you can't get by on minimum wage, but I know it's non-sense. A person in the developed world making minimum wage can afford a standard of living that most humans that have ever lived could only have dreamed of. Plus they have money left over for full health insurance ($300 per month) and a few other small luxuries.  If someone wants more luxuries, they should learn some skills and start making far more than the minimum wage. Mexicans can jump the border uneducated and knowing no English and make it to the middle class owning a car and house in just a year or two. Anyone who puts forth a bit of effort can move beyond minimum wage and into the middle class.
&gt;Buried just below the surface, however, is a critique of the modern American workplace and of the materialism that makes us slaves to our machines (particularly our fax machines). Not only are we supposed to work mind-numbing, soul-sapping jobs without complaint—we're supposed to love every minute of it. This reminds me of an old videotaped interview between a rock journalist and Tom Petty. He asks Petty a question about his song "Last Dance with Mary Jane", where he quotes a lyric and says "I found this song to be a fascinating depiction of the loss of innocence that occurs when someone leaves their hometown." To which Petty replies "Really? I thought it was just a song about pot." Anyone who's ever actually talked to Mike Judge knows that he intended it as a paean to the everyday schlub working a job he hates and wondering where his life is going. He actually has a lot of affection for these everyday characters (or, do the interpreting-themselves-out-of-their-pants crowd at Slate think that *King of the Hill* is really a smirking jab at middle-class middle America), living their everyday lives. Rather than injecting meaning where the author may not have intended it, this Slate writer should think about, I dunno, actually seeing what Judge had in mind.
Eh, not when they were the ones who initially proposed the Patriot Act in the first place, after the 1993 WTC Bombing.
&gt; it is a defense against those who think atheists are terrible people. Unfortunately, those who "think" those things, aren't really thinking at all. And they're certainly not impressed by any of the names in that video. As for some of them, I don't know enough about their personal lives to say whether they are good people or not. Asimov of course was a pacifist, saying that only the stupid ever resorted to violence, and I only remember that because that asshat Pournelle has a counter-quote that escapes me at the moment. Something like "violence solves everything". Bah. Other than Asimov though, the rest could be the dregs of society. Hell, didn't chomsky support Pol Pot at one point? It's a bad defense.
They also believe women shouldn't vote... 2 from 2... hmm
Ah, but here's how it works.  When the Democrats are in charge, they propose a bad idea, and Republicans use every trick in the book (dirty or otherwise) to make sure it never happens. When the Republicans are in charge, they propose a bad idea, and the Democrats bluster ineffectually and let it get passed. Ergo, having the Democrats in charge is the lesser of two evils.
A stolen election is one that is won by cheating. There is no hidden implication that Kerry would have been better. A fair election is the cornerstone of a democracy. However, I can explicitly state that I don't think a Kerry or Gore administration would be filled with a pack of evil lying bastards like this one.
There were earlier attempts at tyranny in America as well - see Adams, John and McCarthy, Joe. Those periods didn't last, but just as Rome eventually fell under a permanent tyranny after previous power seizures were defeated, we're at risk too.
Why vote for a lesser evil when you can vote for a greater good?  Vote your conscience, not Democrat or Republican.
He got pissed not because Drew called it silly, but because Drew undermined the professors authority and publicly ridiculed the work in front of classmates; in this case, by CCing his friends/group members. The professor was right in every regard to be pissed: you can't just let obnoxious students walk all over you, or you won't have a class at all anymore.
I found this article and curious if anyone has a first account testimony on this and how it has helped them.  Looking back at the preschool days it actually doesn't sound like such a bad idea...although limiting it to 10 to 30 minutes might be hard for me.
Is it fire?
They resemble nudes by Renoir in oils or Degas in pastels.  Very interesting.
Yes, this is my blog, but I don't make jack on my ads.  I just want the truth.  Help me figure out the angle behind this scammer who has been flooding the internet with his scummy affiliate program.
Well, if she's right then there's also a vast government conspiracy to commit treason by causing terrorist acts against America. That was a plotline in 24 too.
Let's both do another shot. I think we're going to be needing it!
I think your 'us' is morphing.
I think you broke my internet.
Still, I'm encouraged: There are no shared columns, but only shared rows; shared rows can only appear in the above box algrebra from a flip.  Also, rows have a height of 1, and columns have a height of the number of rows that compose them: only width needs special care. Note this illegal/invalid box:  |----------|   |    |   |    |   |----|  |   | |  |   |----------| And you're right; on paper, a cut(box) equated to N&gt;=2 composed sub-boxes, so:  |----------|   |    |   |----------|   |    |   |----------|   |    |   |----------| should have been expressible as 1/1/1, and divide-box in my example should have returned a list.  I forgot a bit, writing this up the next morning. There aren't any other orthogonal cuts, that I see.
Im sorry but as an athiest I dont see the need to be defended.   I really can't think of any time in my life where I was persecuted for my beliefs.  Sure theres been arguments(ok alot).  But thats always going to happen.   Some people just need to be able to put blind faith in something.  It lets them take the responsibilty of life out of their hands.  I just gave up on trying to change people along time ago.  As long as they don't infect the way we run our government then let them "praise the lord" all they wan't.(god damnit) 
I hate shit like this. To some of us, both are sacred and should be inviolate.
Even if your numbers are right (I worked for a year minimum wage and went into severe debt doing it. My after tax was around $800), this is a really shitty life to live. As you say yourself, you basically have nothing, and nothing to do (whats the point living?), while constantly working in probably a no respect, really shitty job. You serve steaks to fat white people, all the while looking forward to the few onions left at home for your dinner... To simply live is not enough. I am all for raising the minimum wage to $10 an hour. You must not have worked it very long.
Seriously, it's not that new any more.
That gun one made me lol
"You have to understand that many people are not ready to be unplugged, and many of them are so inured, so hopelessly dependent on the system that they will fight to protect it." -Morpheus
s
This commom problem is often neglected by women today. The solution is finding a method that works best for each individual.
raganwald is f*ing awesome.
Six fake comments? Don't you have anything better to do?
most TEDIOUS defense ever. Does atheism really need to be defended?  Magic isn't real.
No, no, no. *Diagnoses* have increased. That can just mean that detection methods are getting better.
&gt;usually when we can get the terrorists in a conventional gunfight we fucking slaughter them. e.g., not too long ago NATO troops killed 200 taliban while only taking 4 casualties. Yeah, and when we can fight conventional enemies, I'm sure we'd be kicking ass. Unfortunately we are not fighting conventional enemies.  Our enemies do not blend into the populace, they ARE the populace. This is not a criticism of our armed forces.  I'm sure they are doing the best they can with what they've got.  Unfortunately, they've been put in a ill-planned war by idiotic leaders.   
yessirr... 4 years tvfree here.. youtube + 0day tv programs = more than plenty
He has resigned from his office and pretty much handed the seat to the Democrats. End of story.
You could probably get a library card and read books instead of sitting around eating onions and feeling sorry for yourself.  All sorts of books that could fill your minimum wage brain with knowledge. Also, generally speaking, if you are serving steaks you will be making a good bit over minimum wage.
I agree WRT the article, but the poster suggestion wasn't about America being a dictatorship, it's about what's already happened. (and still it feels sensational)
Different country, different war, different battle.
I hadn't thought about it in those terms and you're right that it's amusing. OTOH, what about when person A blogs about something, person B reddits person A's blog entry, person C comments on this submission and person A replies to person C with another comment (thereby earning karma). FWIW I don't care about karma points, but if I post something it's because I generally found it interesting and therefore think as many other people as possible should at least check it out. I don't post under my real identity so it's not like I'm earning myself any employment brownie points here. :)
This has been happening since the beginning of SMS. I used to do this with my modem ten years ago. All you need is a program that connects to the service centre. Type in your message, pick a couple of friends to prank, and you're set. £1 is a ripoff.
76 blowjobs: http://salavon.com/76Blowjobs/76Blowjobs.shtml
fg
The last idea is my favourite (page flipper). It provides the most "obvious" benefit, whereas some of the others require a bit more explaining.
Unfortunately most people only noticed they have lost their civil liberties when they actually need them.
&gt; People look at all this and think of Hitler - and they are right to do so. The Bush regime is setting out to radically remake society very quickly, in a fascist way, and for generations to come. OK, Bush is bad.  Cheney is worse.  But they're not Hitler.   Musollini, maybe, but not Hitler. At any rate, it is time to take to the streets and protest.
I was going to post something to that effect, but you took the words out of my mouth. Anyway, to trot out the old poem, "First they came for the gun owners..."
&gt;I find evidence for god in the world/universe. I take it you don't find such evidence. I fail to see how that makes either of us idiots. I think you're using a different definition of 'evidence'.
Do you really need someone with 'mainstream appeal' and good web design skills to organize a protest for you?  Start your own protest.  The shit has hit the fan, this is no time to wait around for someone else to do something.
And your point is? I'll bet those communists know how to organize a good protest.  At this point it's a bit late to be choosey about who you're gonna protest with.
&gt;*Anyone who ducks under will see the same under all circumstances.* Really? Interesting. And where is this pool, if I may ask?
Very interesting. The "perfect" picture itself is pretty normal, but the inscription described is definitely _not_ normal.
Not everyone in the Anglo countries is happy with how things are there. If you bother to ask what's the proportion of malcontents or how much more miserable people are in one place over another, then it becomes very, very clear. It's like the difference between Venezuela and South Africa. Both are third-world. Both had political revolutions. One's using socialist redistributive policies while the other is using neo-liberal policies. One's flourishing and the other is floundering. There are discontents in both but the *pattern* speaks for itself. You might try learning something about the world. In particular, the plural of anecdotes (which is all you've produced) isn't facts.
I hate to crosslink myself, but this cynical hypocrisy has to be seen to be believed: http://reddit.com/info/kf06/comments (ps. Hastert is the GOP house speaker in question)
I hate to crosslink myself, but this cynical hypocrisy has to be seen to be believed: http://reddit.com/info/kf05/comments (ps. Hastert is the GOP house speaker in question) 
Meal Replacements Products (MRPs) are either pre-packaged powdered drink mixes that you mix with water, milk, or juice and then drink; or bars that you eat. Both are consumed in the place of a whole-food meal. Generally MRPs are high in protein, low in fat, have a low to moderate amounts of carbohydrates, and contain a wide array of vitamins and minerals.
Um, btw, I just want to make clear that I posted this story not because I agree with it.  Nor is this an attempt at pointing swing voters to some obscure, fringe conservative site.  I disagree with the sentiments expressed in the article.
Not an interesting read.
[BitC?](http://www.coyotos.org/docs/bitc/spec.html) &gt;BitC is a systems programming language that combines the ``low level'' nature of C with the semantic rigor of Scheme or ML. BitC was designed by careful selection and exclusion of language features in order to support proving properties (up to and including total correctness) of critical systems programs.
qwe1234 - first of all, i find your comments on reddit to be amusing and informative, even if you are jerking our chains. if you didn't have something intelligent in there, you wouldn't be getting so many responses! now as to "why Io"? "why lua"? your point is valid. as a perl dude, i have likewise ignored the ruby hype because beyond some syntactic sugar, i found it offered me little. for at least Lua, i can say that its small size makes it amenable to embedding, and it has a large following in the gaming industry, so it does matter. and from time to time even after ten years, perl will confuse me, so i am looking for something simple enough for me to fit into my small brain. BUT, that said, keep up the comments! most of the time you are spot on. i can almost imagine you writing that fake stroutstrup interview that has been floating around for years.
Dude, we are *definitely* alone out here.
It isn't actually called coalesce in the spec, that is a SQL term. 
now to your point, to jerk your chain back a little, why have you bothered with python? CPAN clobbers anything python has to offer, always has, always will. and doesn't the whitespace thing make you feel a bit like a pansy?
Downmodding and predictable response, all from redditers not doing anything themselves. Seriously, we can feign rebellion all day long, but this protest won't accomplish anything.  The death of liberty *could* ignite many currently apathetic people, but it's not going to happen coming from the grungy riff-raff of the far left.
Tell it to Denny Hastert.   
What if you wanted to write...  if (a || b) where both a and b were nullable booleans?   A  B  ?   T  _  T   F  T  T   F  F  F   F  N  (F or N?)   N  T  T   N  F  F   N  N  N   
Another good insight...
perhaps when 3 thousand people die?
Hearsay isn't news nor should rational people use it to damn someone. The "I spoke to three people who where there" thing isn't exactly credible. Even if I heard about this from FOX, I wouldn't buy it without a soundbite.  I'm not a Bush fan, but I want to hate him for legitimate, provable reasons.
I'm not sure this syntax was really needed. There are so many other things they could do instead, like add ranges to the switch block.
dripping
That's what I saw. There also seems to be more tan lines.
Remember though that making preparations to sleep at work is an offence leading to possible dismissal at most companies.
I can't see how anything is faster/better than scp unless you don't know the filesystem and have to browse around. And re nc being more common than openssh: As far as i'm concerned your os/install is broken if it doesn't have ssh.
you forgot prolog, as well. (i consider it a term rewriting language as well, why not?) prolog seems to have intelligent and decent compilers, too. (mercury even generates efficient code.)   
don't know... i read the docs, found nothing new, essentially, and kind of just lost interest
fyi, ted bundy and charles manson were both democrats.
i don't sneer, it's just a bit hypocritical to claim 'don't code in C' in one sentence and then advocating calls down to C in another. if i write in another language it's because i want to *avoid* writing in C, no? *especially* for the difficult parts that are in the most critical inner loops and in the most critical cases of interaction with the machine. 
u r a gorgeous woman.u r my best astress.
*shrug*  python happens to be the first dynamic language i learned as a kid. i guess it doesn't matter which one you pick, they are all more or less the same, essentially.   
How would you write [symbolic.q](http://q-lang.sourceforge.net/examples/symbolic.q)  in prolog?
You guys, don't downmodding cypherx. I see what he is saying. I've been browsing that site for twenty minutes and I still cannot find definite information.   #1 rule of protest organization:  tell people the who what when and where!   
diff(X,X,1).   diff(U+V,X,Z) :- diff(U,X,Up), diff(V,X,Vp), simp(Up+Vp,Z),!.   diff(U*V,X,C) :- diff(U,X,Up), diff(V,X,Vp),       simp(U*Vp,A), simp(V*Up,B), simp(A+B,C),!.   diff(_,X,0).  simp(0*_,0).   simp(_*0,0).   simp(1*X,X).   simp(X*1,X).   simp(0+X,X).   simp(X+0,X).   simp(X,X). Slightly more full featured [here](http://sleepingsquirrel.org/lisp/diff.prolog).  Also of possible interest, a [Haskell](http://sleepingsquirrel.org/lisp/diff_ADT.html) look a-like, and [others](http://sourceforge.net/mailarchive/forum.php?thread_id=30649202&amp;forum_id=36790).
Add: Find the sum of two or more numbers. "If you add 2 to 3, you get 5". Advertisement: Has only one D. This is an *ad*, not "an add".
T1:BinTree + T2:BinTree\t= foldl insert T1 (members T2); I think a pretty interesting snippet, from a Q example.  You could translate this to an overloading of + in another language, but the above I think is has better semantics with Q's evaluation model.  If you were working on an algebra of BinTrees, Q might express it as naturally.
You know, a large portion of your housing costs came from property taxes that were passed on to you.  Not to mention sales taxes.  And a portion of every tax that every business you bought anything from had to pay, even the supermarket where you shopped for food.  I'm just saying, it might make sense to make things cheaper for people rather than put a price floor on labor. Think about it -- things really should be cheaper now than ever before in history, due to technological advances.  Somewhere, lots and lots of time and resources are being wasted.
read [this](http://reddit.com/goto?id=imqe) to find out "what the terrorists want"
Protests rarely change anything.  I recall the 1000's of people that protested against the the lead up to the invasion or Iraq. Yet we still invaded the country and 3.5 yrs later we are still there. So much for protests. Personally, I hate crowds anyway.
I be sailing the seven seas with one of these! Arrrrr
This is so stupid.
i've written something almost *exactly* like it in prolog, word-for-word. except that i then found out that there are a huge number of possible rewriting sequences being generated, some of which might even be infinitely long. so i had to implement fairly complex logic to cut off infinitely-recursive paths and out of the resulting finite paths -- to pick the path with the shortest resulting term. i'd be very interested in how Q handles this. (prolog has things like 'findall' which make solving similar problems simpler.) p.s. from wikipedia:  /* Derivation Definition */   d(X,X,1) :- !.          /* d x  dx = 1      */   d(C,X,0) :- atomic(C).        /* d c  dx = 0      */   d(-U,X,-A) :- d(U,X,A).          /* d -u dx = - d u dx     */   d(U+V,X,A+B) :- d(U,X,A), d(V,X,B).       /* d u+v   dx = d u dx + d v dx    */   d(U-V,X,A-B) :- d(U,X,A), d(V,X,B).       /* d u-v   dx = d u dx - d v dx    */   d(C*U,X,C*A) :- atomic(C), C \= X, d(U,X,A), !.    /* d c*u   dx = c*d u dx     */   d(U*V,X,B*U+A*V) :- d(U,X,A), d(V,X,B).      /* d u*v   dx = u*d v dx + v*d u dx   */    d(U/V,X,A) :- d(U*V^(-1),X,A).      /* d u/v   dx = d (u*v)^-1 dx   */   d(U^C,X,C*U^(C-1)*W) :- atomic(C), C \= X, d(U,X,W).  /* d u^c   dx = c*u^(c-1)*d u dx   */   d(log(U),X,A*U^(-1)) :- d(U,X,A).      /* d ln(u) dx = u^-1 * d u dx   */  prolog is a bit weird in that it requires that every term must be rewritten (eventially) to an empty term for the program to succeed. it looks weird, but all you have to do (essentually) is just to keep encoding the resulting term along with the expansion rules. i think prolog got mismarketed, unfortunately -- it's a beautiful and very clean term rewriting language at heart, and a confusing and difficult language for handling 'logic'. but when approached properly, it's very easy to use and powerful. 
It isn't a textbook, novel, blog post, or comic book.  It's the source of a programming language.  What did you expect to read?
or actress
"Halliburton does not provide its drivers with maps." What. The.  Fuck. What is that, supposed to be cost-control measure or some shit?  What the fuck are we paying those motherfuckers billions of dollars for?  They won't even shell out to buy  MAPS FOR THEIR TRUCK DRIVERS? How about we drop the Halliburton Board of Directors off in that neigborhood without a fucking map?
Why isn't this upmodded? It's fantastic!
Oh stop it. You are coming off like someone grasping for any excuse not to be involved. First it's the lack of 'mainstream appeal', then the website isn't pretty enough, then it's "this protest won't accomplish anything", then somehow **you've** become the martyr for being downmodded by redditers, whom somehow you happen to know aren't doing anything themselves. How do you know that? Of course, you don't know that. But if you convince yourself of it, at least you won't be *the only one* at home doing nothing, right? Whatever makes you feel better. If you don't want to do anything, just don't. And by the way: In more cases than you would care to know, were it not for the "grungy riff-raff of the far left", there wouldn't be a single fscking soul out there protesting for your rights.
Keyboard shortcuts are, IMO, the most important way to make your interactions with the computer more productive. I'm a command line junkie, but every action I take in a GUI, I look at the menu for the keyboard shortcut and try to use it next time. In whatever GUI you use, learn the following, at least; Window switching (Alt-tab in most), close (Alt-F4 in Windows), save (Ctrl-s), and open (Ctrl-O). These alone save me several minutes of mouseing every day. There are, of course, many more, and I would *strongly* encourage everyone to learn the handfull they use often. Oh yeah, and the cut and paste stuff as well, of course.
That's what I'm thinking.
The opening paragraph gives the example of a pilot walking away from a crash. It's a bit difficult for a pilot to go sit in the tail section,  I also note #7; "If you land in water". From recent stories on Reddit and elsewhere, I've learnt that no commercial plane has *ever* landed in water successfully.
Nice stuff but I think you hetero dudes are all taken by the skin aspect of this. Typical reaction in the art photo genre. I'd probably vote this to the top if it was dudes.
20 minutes, are you serious? If using the link off of this Reddit thread: 1. Choose between the English and Spanish verisons of the site.  2. On the main page, click the rectangular graphic that says *"Oct. 5th - Click Here for Protest Locations"*.  3. Pick the location that suits you. It took me about 15 seconds to get there, another 30 seconds or so to browse the locations.
link-jacked, slurpy praise for "your favorite productivity application", and *blah*. 'blah' because writing something silly with torturously inappropriate tools isn't special or unusual, and doing so doesn't say anything that Alan Turing hasn't already said about the tools. You know what would deserve more awe and giggling?  *A new project to implement an IRC client in C*.  Hee hee, or Java.  C++!  [falls over].
So what? I personally promise you won't have to stand next to any of 'them'. If it makes you feel better, you can carry a sign that says "I am not a communist".
I eagerly await the completion of his next article, titled: "No Salsa Can Make Your Carbon-Burnt Burrito Taste Good (aka there is no silver bullet)"
If you had $6 Billion, would you really care if you lost a few million dollars?  What about losing a single dollar?  Now imagine all of those dollars represent a living, breathing human being, and you get a sense of how many people are alive.   In 2006, the life of a human being on planet earth is precious, unique, and worthless.  With the knowledge of so many people alive, I find it hard to understand why any rational person would oppose abortion, or support keeping braindead bodies alive (see Terri Schiavo).
I found it a little distasteful.
Haha, self-righteousness?  Ahh... I mean, it could be said that those without television retain purity, and these days; naivety.  Surely we can be proud, set an example.  Life without television is beautiful!  I have been clean for nearly a year; it is almost difficult to recall advertising jingles!
30305.15 KB (31032474 bytes) Wowza.
Poker bonuses for popular online poker games including downloads for partypoker partycasino fulltilt poker titan paradise pacific along with poker bonus codes.
"But right now, that’s not an option."  --------------------------------------- When will not torturing again be an 'option'?
I wonder if fractal patterns are hidden in that sky. Such infinity, haha, this could be what God sees on the inside of his eyelids!  I can't really comprehend it, to be honest, so many seperate sparks of light - I want to convince myself they're refracted clones or something of the sort.  Space.  Room to muse.
Zing!
Congress is trying to circumvent the Constitution? Since when?!? Someone's got to put a stop to this before it [gets](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/NSA_warrantless_surveillance_controversy) [out](http://reddit.com/goto?id=kdlf) [of](http://reddit.com/goto?id=kcn6) [hand](http://reddit.com/goto?id=kdpz)!
re 'especially': From what propaganda I see, most people don't want to write in C because they've some other language that they can more quickly|safely|sanely develop with; when people using such languages want to 'drop down to C', they argue that: they've already implemented this, and therefore have a known and presumably good design, and know it to be a critical part of their program by their profiling, and only want to make it more efficient in ways that their language can't help them with.  They also argue that such rewriting only happens with a diminishngly[0] small percentage of their program source. 'course, this is a bit different when you write an OS.  My 'Python program that emits machine code' example probably can't benefit from dropping down to C. 0] old books will cite 20% of a program as 'critical'.  More recently people will say 10%.  I think both figures are clearly absurd things to throw around, and that people only do so as a numerical way to trick someone into agreeing that they don't actually need to write their entire chat server in hand-assembled machine code.
I don't know why you were downmodded, this is obviously a joke.
Really, so much for protests: [http://www.infoplease.com/spot/civilrightstimeline1.html](http://www.infoplease.com/spot/civilrightstimeline1.html) Because we all know those people woud have gotten their civil rights eventually anyway, right? Sarcasm aside: Protest has irrefutably worked before (see above), and it can work again. Not saying it always works, or even works often, but I'd rather try than give in to hopelessness or complacency. Even if the lesser nature of America is going to win out anyway, I'd rather go down swinging than hiding in my home. Protesting is good for the soul.
&gt; P.S. I'm not sure I get why the parent comment is being modded down. It's on-topic and, while I don't agree, I think it's a comment worth responding to. Perhaps redditers would prefer to mod-down for comments that are off-topic, instead? Well, in theory statements that are factually incorrect, or bad arguments in general also receive the down arrow. In practice people tend to downmod stuff that they disagree with in addtion to all of the above.
[First they came...](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/First_they_came...#Poem) Protesting an outrage with a communist is not necessarily supporting communism. Hell, you probably do more for that by buying products made in China.
Yeah, we need a cleanup on aisle 'ckeio'. Someone spilled sarcasm all over the floor.
This will print as a 20x16" @ 300dpi $8 at winkflash.com for a normal print  $20 at mpix.com for a metallic print (these are very nice)
I'm holding out for the SCOTUS to shoot it down. From what I'm hearing, it's very likely.
Smaller community. Developed by a smaller group that is associated with an institution.
How ironic - an atheist preaching to the choir.  Look at this video from a New Earth Creationist's point of view.  All those evolutionary biologists cited are indeed fools.  Look at this video from a strict moralist's point of view.  All those celebrities are indeed vile. And finally, from a smelly GNU hippy's point of view, Bill Gates' atheism is the most compelling argument for religion ever.
Yeah, really. I would so rather write a flash *and* an html version of the site than write it in html and add extensions with js.
ahem, did I read that right? &gt; Well-meaning people - among whom I'd count both Bush and bin Laden - can cause enough trouble by itself. Bush being well-meaning I find hard to believe, Bin Laden being well-meaning I find hard to stomach.  They don't mean well for their chosen enemies and their enemity seems to be what defines them. 
Brainiac faked the Rubidium and Cesium explosions in this video.  They put bombs in the bathtubs.  Rb and Cs are heavy atoms, so there aren't very many in a given mass; their reaction with water simply doesn't produce enough H2 to create that kind of explosion.  Read this:  http://www.theodoregray.com/PeriodicTable/AlkaliBangs/
The thrust of the author's argument seems to be that health care is not a right because it conflicts with other peoples' rights - such as the right to not be a doctor. This line of reasoning assumes that rights cannot conflict.  This is false - rights can and do conflict, and one purpose of society is to mediate between conflicting rights.
But you get to see the sepia-toned picture of the handsome Scott Hanselman!
By sitting around complaining to like minded people, you really aren't doing anything at all. Get moving and go do something real: http://www.democrats.org/action.html
The image broken for anyone else?
Excellently chosen clip from a truly great work of literature. If only I could give this more than a single vote.
* mainstream (political) appeal and mainstream (visual) appeal go hand in hand.  * without mainstream appeal this protest won't get the attention of anyone but the reddit/leftist echo chamber.  So I guess you could rephrase my complaint as: They have no sense of marketing.  However, your last point however is totally correct (I guess the founding fathers were the "grungy riff-raff" of their generation), and I shouldn't be so automatically critical of people more extreme in their views than me.  Re-reading the site, I find that I agree with enough of their reasoning to join in the protest. Still, without a slicker image and less hysterical tone I don't think many people will show up.
I was making two point dipshit.. LOL!
3) Hit the 'new' page frequently, and try and kill off these politics stories before they get momentum.
Guess that's why the US army's doing so well in Iraq, hmmm?  Vietnam worked out well too. Having 20% of the population in active resistance with small arms and home made explosives and at least marginal support from the community is more than enough to utterly defeat any army.  Unless you're willing to use nukes. 
This nearly crashed my computer... (Eh, it's a computer the place I work for gave me, too little ram....)
He could also have written it as the rather less gratuitously verbose  object1 != null ? object1 : object2 != null ? object2 : object3 != null ? object3 : null; This could also have been packaged up as a function if you aren't interested in the short-circuiting behavior. And when the expressions are side-effecting you have to worry about multiple evaluation. But I still think it is silly to bloat the language to slightly optimize a use case like this.
Lua started as an ad hoc configuration language, so I'm not so sure about that. Certainly the current design has a laser-focused Lisp-like simplicity to it.
Great I am glad you enjoyed it, I also added it to my site with the Orwell Literature attached. http://throwawayyourtv.com/2006/10/1984-you-awake.html   
Oh I don't know, maybe something about why I should care about it. One bit implied that it is a poor man's version of Mathematica or MathCad. The rest was about how Prolog-like its syntax was.
It is very useful in mathematics, hence the reason we have programs like Mathematica and MathCad. As for "rewriting logic", there are other langauges that do it. I don't remember them off the top of my head, but my CS teacher mentioned it as an alternate way of passing arguments. 
America?
I want to see miss world 2006 swimsuit gallery site
Ah.  You and the people who always complain about hype should come into contact.  The world will become a more peaceful place :-)
What is a "standard task"? Even something as easy as creating a database cannot be farmed out. You have to interview lots of employees to ensure what you are building will meet their actual needs. You cannot do that when your office is on the far side of the world. 
So God is whatever EVENT "caused" the universe? What extra information do you get about the workings of ANYTHING by invoking a http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/God_of_the_gaps ? Christians use the word God to describe a magical being that still affects the going-ons of our universe and when you die will transport your soul to heaven. You're using the word to describe an EVENT that no longer has any impact on the natural world (the laws of physics spontaneously came into being only after the singularity). Seriously, what's the point other than trying to fit in with other religious people that have nothing at all resembling your God concept (that provides no extra information).  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Transcendental_argument_for_the_non-existence_of_God  TANG represents my thinking if you care to say something about it.
If you own all the code that was broke, and you have a compiler or other static analysis tool that will tell you all the code that needs to be fixed, and you have the time to fix it, then nothing.  If you don't own all the code that was broken, all of your customers will be really pissed off at you. If you are using a non-compiled language, then you will only discover you broke the code at runtime. And since full regression tests are nigh-impossible, you may not find out until it is in production. And don't forget the whole point in using a dynamic langauge is to save time. If you had time to spare, then you would be using a staticly typed langauge. 
Actually, depending on what the protest is about - some are successful. Ghandi in India, The Civil Rights Movement, Solidarity in Poland are probably the three biggest examples of protests leading to dramatic changes in policy. Is it likely here, to be effective in one day? No. But it's not so easy as to say protesting something doesnt work.
He lied about it first though ("I did not have sex with that woman") and only admitted it when he had no other choice.  Anyway that wasn't a failure of policy.
Look at that guy's stasche. He belongs in porn.
People look at all this and think of Hitler...  ................hmmmmmmmmmmmm.............  Its not just me.
Well, I think it's safe to say from these results that every decade man has been unflagging in his predeliction towards blurry women.
ABC
That is absolutely amazing.  Stunning.  Uncomprehendably beautiful and vast.
Truly you have a dizzying intellect.
Well put. I'd go so far as to say you're my favorite racist.  I don't think that you hate black people for the color of their skin, or whatever. I just think that you are obsessed with race, and ascribe to race things which other more reasonable people do not. Coombs and you aren't unacceptable for saying prohibited things. You're unacceptable for your irrational obsession with one out of a million human attributes. And for being wrong about it, much of the time.
Didn't Tenet meet with Bush every week? Why go through Rice if he felt the information was valid and urgent?
the  missed the part where the artist also had changed the name to Cocka Cola. Sorry, couldn't resist.
Welcome to the 2nd millennium! 
I am an atheist, and I believe this is a crappy video.  Furthermore, I don't need to defend not believing in unproven things. YOU show ME evidence, and I'll believe.  I'll be waiting.
kemaren dilihat statistiknya di webhostingstuff, uda 99.98% uptime...
Well, that's what they *say* they're building it for...
"I used to suck dick for coke"
English is not my native language :) Even though I speak it quite fluently, spelling has never been my strongest point in any foreign tongue.
Nero in fact is seen as one of the best emperors by some modern historians, most claims about him burning the city and the christians were made up after his death.
Too sad that it isn't progressive-jpg. Such big pictures are simply not accessible if you have to load it nearly completely just to get an idea about what it shows. (and no, a title is not a substitute for a preview)
&gt; Unless you're willing to use nukes. Or actually carpet bomb.  Or use gas. Or any of a number of tactics which would be quite effective, but aren't fully used due to public opinion.  But if you've lost the public opinion anyway, why not?  The failures of Vietnam, Iraq, Somalia, and so on were failures to *use* power, not the absence of power to use.  These were limited by politics, and it's not obvious how that would restrain a superpower which had turned against its citizens.  Other countries suppressing revolt have to worry about world opinion.  The US is less likely to worry about that, since they're usually the pointy end of world opinion. But, anyway, the point of that portion of the post I was replying to was the Second Amendment to the US Constitution, and my reply was to point out that it isn't as if they've allowed US citizens to buy RPGs and such legally, much less tanks and SAM installations, so the era of the ordinary citizen being as well armed as the ordinary soldier has been over for some time.
Yes, the pattern is clear: Venezuela has oil to fuel their socialist delusion, just like Sweden had iron that sold to Germany during WWII and later had the only surviving industry in all Europe, which gave it a great advantage until the socialist system it setup started to crumble once it had to face real competition. I don't know about you, but I have lived in quite a few countries, all of them have problems, but some are facing them and others are trying to hide from them. Sweden is doomed if it doesn't change(Finland has already started to change, Norway has oil and can wait), and now at last most of the country is starting to see this, just check the result of the Swedish elections last week. England made the difficult (and correct) changes in the 80's, the rest of Europe is now paying the price of socialism and will have to learn to move forward one way or another.
Ever had one of those killer parties that your cleaning up after? There is always at least one drunk left there that has overstayed their welcome. Here is a sure fire way to getum up and out of there.
Cripes.  It's not that simple.   Whatever your view on Cheney, military logistics planning is a difficult business.   Simply put, if you're planning on delivering goods into a hostile area, you need to protect the goods and the drivers.  The drivers deserve a chance at, you know, living, rather than being killed and having their bodies desicrated, like in that video.   That gives you a couple of options.  The first, private contractors, AKA, mercenaries, which haven't been terribly popular with the people that they run into because they, you know, kill people.  The second, troops.   By the by, Cheney would make more money off of hiring private contractors because that would go into the overhead of the contract.  In the video, the military is providing the service which doesn't go into the overhead... so Cheney is getting less of a cut.  In neither case would anybody approve a contract that reads something akin to "commit suicide by driving into a war zone."
By my count, C# has 48 operators, two shy of C++'s 50.  This brings it up to 49 - and of course the LINQ junk will cause it to blow past C++. Microsoft really has not learned the lessons of C++ - how a kitchen-sink language fragments into multiple dialects, hurting maintainability.
&gt;my first guess is that you're a Republican who is hoping that by saying "substitute republicans with American government", you will convince some rightfully fed-up person to stay home on election day. Wrong.  I am not affiliated with any party because I think that within *most* groups or parties you are going to find corruption and people that don't act on principle, but rather those that support their campaign contributors and other agendas.  That being said, I think it goes both ways between Republicans and Democrats.
So, are you saying that only Democrats care about habeas corpus and human rights? I know a lot of libertarians and Republicans would disagree with that.
Indeed, this is probably one of the best Daily Show bits that I've seen submitted to reddit.
This is the kind of bullshit, though, who may convince the populace that atheists aren't going to eat your children.  All religions use this kind of crap, so why should we be any better ? We aren't.
I have lived in Scandinavia the last seven years, and only a delusional socialist zealot would believe that the whole system is not collapsing under its own weight. The governments try to keep the image of a working system, but it is all a farce to keep the illusion, they know that the only option is to reform or die, and even left wing governments are starting to dismantle the socialist monster, lets hope it is not too late...
These are "arguments from authority", a [logical fallacy](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Appeal_to_authority).
Cool, it'll be crazy if it moved too...
Oh please, the liberals won on the basis of not being liberals. Idiots like you never talk about the present, you're always saying that socialist successes will fail in the future and capitalist failures will succeed in the future. It's always the future with you. Just like with Lenin, true socialism was always in the far off future for him.
Is there any more of these?
A unique view of America . . .and the world.
I find your 'Scheme'[0] and your 'rpc'[1] fascinating, and wish to know more! 0] which? 1] which?  where?
Motore di ricerca per trovare aziende e prodotti ecologici in Italia. Disponibili notizie e newsletter di settore.
I wont bother discussing the politics of the election, it is all rhetoric, but all parties know change is needed(even the socialists know it, and they had started the changes already), and the reason the left lost is because the country as a whole is starting to wake up and realize that without change it is doomed. There have never been any socialist successes, communism and socialism have failed already, many times, on the other hand capitalism has saved many countries and the countries that have embraced it have enjoyed enduring prosperity. Learn some history and let me know if you find a single free country that was successful for a measurable amount of time that was not capitalist. *The only way that has ever been discovered to have a lot of people cooperate together voluntarily is through the free market. And that's why it's so essential to preserving individual freedom.* -- Milton Friedman
Biuletyn dla architektów, deweloperów i użytkowników powierzchni użytkowych. Polska.
I am the only maintainer who is a CCP employee and CCP has allowed me to do some of the porting work in my working hours (to get Stackless up to date).  And also sent another coworker (who does not do any maintainance work) and myself to [a conference](http://www.stackless.com/Members/rmtew/News%20Archive/pycon2006]) to do porting work. Apart from that most of the work is done in my own time, but I steal the odd bit of my working hours for short bits and pieces. CCP also sponsored Christian Tismer (Stackless's creator) when we could afford to for periods of time while the game EVE Online was in development.
The skipping and mouth bags are quality!
Before looking at this, I had two tips: write with Emacs, using the appropriate mode; use a color-theme that makes your language look pretty like a little girl[0]. But this person means 'HTML' in place of 'code', and apparently only has one tip: to use CSS.  Where does Emacs and color-theme come in, I ask?  In the next article of this theme? 0] color-theme-goldenrod for Erlang 0] color-theme-charcoal-black for Lisp
I like your language[-1], and I like 0.02%=1h45m/year downtime[0], but I cannot abide by this programming-irrelevant reddit! -1] Indonesian. 0] what?  That's terrible!  How will I run my Amazon competitor in ASP+PHP with this kind of reliability?  Even Ruby on Rails couldn't keep loyal customers through that! 
Wow, the point of the video wasn't to say that "atheism is cool, be an atheist", but that "atheists aren't bad people, here is a list of some good people that are also atheists, atheists (mostly) won't try to eat your children, kill your mother and rape your pet". If you understood anything else, then you're an idiot.
People are always asking how to use Python in Web programming. As a general rule the only option to use Python in shared hosts is through CGI. This tutorial is just about how to use CGI with Python.
Looks like Chicken to me. The RPC module he's using is a standard egg. (Judging by the bunny reference in the blog's title I'm pretty sure the blogger is Felix, the coder of Chicken.)
No they're not, the video is not saying that "atheism is rad, be an atheist dude" for fuck's sake, it's merely saying "no, atheists are not 'bad' people, they don't hate you and they don't endanger you, look, here is a list of good people that are also atheists".
Looks a bit like some ready-made article delivered my MSFT PR dept and delivered verbatim by the journalist. There are a couple of key points which aren't considered here: * microsoft consistently proved itself unable to deliver a usable product before version 3 or 4. I don't see why it would change with zune. If you were to believe microsoft PR, Windows 95 would have made OSX pointless. * they compare ipods from last year with zunes from next year. Apple does have new ipods in the tubes, and new ones will follow; those surely will integrate zune's most desirable features, plus some new, awesome ones: apple is unquestionnably much better than microsoft at shipping those original features without which you can't live, once you've tried them for 2 days. And they're trained at releasing a substancially new ipod product every 18 months or so. Do I need to talk about microsoft's product shipping cycle? Essentially, a full screen video ipod, with a virtual control wheel and wireless capabilities, will crush zune technically. One point is left for zune: medias. If microsoft manages to get exclusive rights with major RIAA members, *that* might badly hurt Apple. Nevertheless, I'd love to see some non-ridiculous competition against ipods. I'm sure they can provide even greater products, if pressured adequately :)
This describes possible shebangs:  #!/usr/bin/python   #!/usr/bin/python2.3   #!/usr/bin/python2.4 Please just use:  #! /usr/bin/env python 
Either way, we lose.
pix pls
how does it taste?
Let me be clearer. All that is copied is the part of the stack that has been used by the tasklet.  And in general this amount turns out to be negligible (~100 bytes or so).  This is the main advantage, that tasklets and channels can be used casually as a natural extension of the Python language without consideration for any resource usage involved. And I mean natural in the code comprehension sense as well.  Not having to use callbacks or the new and arguably awkward "generator coroutines" and just being able to write normal Python code which blocks in the background is a big boon. I don't do any thread based programming, and haven't really had to care how they are implemented since university, so cannot compare the switching costs.  As for whether there can be livelock, I imagine that would depend on how you use Stackless and how you handle deadlock.  There are no locking mechanisms bundled with Stackless, although CCP has released a updated version of an old library which they use to provide [this and other](http://svn.python.org/view/stackless/sandbox/libraries/uthread-ccp/uthread.py?rev=51750&amp;view=markup) Stackless helper functionality.
Sometimes I really wonder if our society's leaders are reading through 1984 like it's a plan of how to run society. [Blair](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/George_orwell) was a genius.
It's all those recessive genes.
The headline should be ‘Why Apple should be scared’: they offer no evidence that Apple *is* scared at all.  I imagine that the Zune and suchlike will figure in Apple’s risks &amp; threats analysis and they will adjust their plans accordingly, but I don’t imagine blind panic is a useful response to a competative threat. I wonder if Microsoft are going to have trouble getting movie companies on-side after the recent debacle where Sky withdrew its video-on-demand service because Microsoft’s DRM software had been cracked.
Ever feel like your boss was like the guy in the movie "Office Space"? Well here is your chance to  whack your boss and not get in trouble for it.
From python's cgi.py file:  #! /usr/local/bin/python  # NOTE: the above "/usr/local/bin/python" is NOT a mistake.  It is   # intentionally NOT "/usr/bin/env python".  On many systems   # (e.g. Solaris), /usr/local/bin is not in $PATH as passed to CGI   # scripts, and /usr/local/bin is the default directory where Python is   # installed, so /usr/bin/env would be unable to find python.  Granted,   # binary installations by Linux vendors often install Python in   # /usr/bin.  So let those vendors patch cgi.py to match their choice   # of installation. 
-19 points for that comment? What's the problem?
CONDENSED VERSION OF THIS REDDIT: 1. Java has references that refer to Java objects, and not pointers.  If you duplicate a reference, you will then have duplications of this reference; the referred object doesn't care. 2. People don't know this because of some unrelated garbage about garbage collection; to prove my point, I draw on popular awareness of 'learning C', and on popular intuition about 'ease in learning programming languages', so that I can then destroy my point by confusing the subject with memory deallocation in C. 3. Some gibbering idiocy.
My respect goes to the VBA-head who created this :-D
I tried porting this to Haskell. It was quite fun given that I haven't written a line of python, haven't written anything greater than a couple of lines in a functional language, and have only just started reading a Haskell ebook a few days ago. Here's my partially complete and probably horrible version that scans for and creates boxes: http://deadbeefbabe.org/paste/2068 Not enough time this weekend to finish it. Maybe next.
hm, I would've written that as:  #! /usr/bin/env python  # Some systems install python outside of $PATH as   # passed to CGI scripts.  Everyone not using the   # arbitrary choice here should instead use a   # choice that works. but I suppose that I can refrain from sending this person a patch -- that quote speaks of plenty enough aggravation.
How do you reconcile your claim: &gt; John Adams was a passionate Christian with Glaxnor's [quotation](http://reddit.com/info/kdlf/comments/ckdsl) above? &gt; **John Adams:** "God is an essence that we know nothing of. Until this awful blasphemy *(the divinity of Jesus)* is got rid of, there never will be any liberal science in the world."
Free Mandarin Chinese lessons. Each of the 15 units contain easy to understand dialogues, usage and grammar notes and a practice page.
The Roman Empire, China, blah blah blah. Just about all of them in fact. Capitalism is a strictly modern invention and your even talking about looking through history means you're an imbecile that knows nothing about political history. Ideologues frequently are imbeciles so that's hardly surprising. Goodbye scum.
Stop posting on weed.
ok
That doesn't exactly convince me -- anyway, dictionaries record usage, no matter how vulgar.  "Facist" will do nicely -- no need for the -istic.
Isn't that every good citizens dream to live in a bubble and only hear what they want to hear. To have the same tired right-wing web sites, Tv commentators, AM shock jocks, and neo-facists blogs reassure them that all the lies they want to believe are true. A kind of dream right-wing fishbowl reddit where there are no patriots, just blind reactionary nationtlists. No longer being bothered to take that tired index finger, make a single click and go somewhere else. No sir, camp out at the fantasy Wingnuttery Reddit where the lies are the truth the truth is a lie, war is peace, incompetence is king, and social darwinism replaces American values.
He wrote a brilliant essay on the Watts riots: http://www.themodernword.com/pynchon/pynchon_essays_watts.html Should be compulsory reading for picas.
Yeah, but as far as I know, small groups of atheists don't go around finding Christians and beating them up. However bad piss-taking gets (and even reddit itself shows that it can get pretty appalling), it's still not physical violence. ...At least, that's the case in *this* society, where Christianity is the majority religion, and thus will be professed by every loudmouth jock looking for an excuse to bully someone. Where atheism is the majority-held (or state-sponsored) view, Christians *would* face such persection - but not because they're Christians; simply because the jackboot tendency will always clothe itself in the majority's garb and pick on minorities from that vantage point.
Warning! This briefing is not for the faint hearted. It contains tales of explicit financial recklessness that some readers may find offensive.
It is not only a path problem as the other replies mention. Most hosting providers have more than one version installed. When I tried to run the "Shell Commands" sample code that uses the subprocess module, which is new in 2.4, using /usr/bin/env python I had a version error since the default install in that host was 2.3. I had to specify /usr/bin/python2.4
This picture should make you think the exact opposite.  Look at ALL these stars just in our neighborhood alone.  All those stars look exactly how our sun looks if you took a ship out of our solar system.  So this picture shows just how MANY possibilities there are for life off of earth, not how few. Sarcastic or not, a lot of people do feel that the universe looks empty.
Glenn has a way of getting at the plain truth that drives conservatives crazy.
Carl Monday [blogs about it](http://www.wkyc.com/weblog/carlmonday/2006/09/john-stewart-crew-confronts-carl.html), and here's a [video of him and the Daily Show reporters](http://www.wkyc.com/video/player.aspx?aid=26989&amp;bw=) "confronting" each other in the TV station's parking lot. (I get very stuttery playback in VLC, and ironically my Windows Media Player doesn't even play it.) 
No. God is not some event that caused the universe. The point I was trying to make is the inappropriate and generally ineffective attacks on religion by those who do not believe in God. So often the attacks are on the order of: There are inconsistent statements in the bible, or there are many different beliefs which are not reconcilable -- therefore, there is no God. The way to show that there is no god is to show why you believe there is no god. Not try to show why people who find evidence for god are stupid or just wrong headed. If you want to convince me (or anyone else) who believes there is a God, that there is no God, you should not say well, Billy Graham and the Pope disagree on the nature of God, therefore there is no God. You then miss the point that I don't predicate my beliefs on some others beliefs, and I don't care what Billy Graham or the Pope think. Suppose I argue thusly: Scientists are foolish and their beliefs should be dismissed as absurd. Scientists believe there are 10 dimentions to our universe. We can only perceive 4, but the other 6 are supposed to be unobservable even though they have a profound effect on everything in the universe. How can a rational individual believe in something you can't see or touch? My argument would be ineffective on several levels: 1. I am attributing a belief in a particular theory by some scientists to all scientists. 2. I make inflamatory statements about all scientists. 3. I never give any reasons why the particular theory I chose to attack all scientists with is a poor theory, I attack it instead on the absurdity of believing in something unseen. I would be far more effective in convincing you there is a god if instead of presenting arguments showing you to be stupid or foolish, I instead present arguments showing why I believe as I do. You would be far more effective in convincing me that there is no god if you confine your efforts to presenting the reasons you believe there is no god.
Like chicken, ofcourse.
Looks like we've got ourselves a digg user.
Religion is also attacked.
Anyone think of Team America, World Police when reading this? F.A.G(Film Actors Guild).  Using their superior acting experience to lead the world
"I do not think that it is necessarily the case that science and religion are natural opposites. In fact, I think that there is a very close connection between the two. Further, I think that science without religion is lame and, conversely, that religion without science is blind. Both are important and should work hand-in-hand" Albert Einstein  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Albert_Einstein#Religious_views
To be honest, so did I.  There was once a time when I trusted my government when it claimed to have clear evidence that a dictator who hated us had weapons built with the names of Americans on them. There was a time when I could believe my government if they showed me satellite photos of facilities they claimed to be producing those weapons. There was once a time when I believed my government was there to protect my right to liberty. It's amazing what a little thing like "facts" can do to change one's perspective on a situation. So we can't blame the NYT if they discovered the same thing.
the point is that the cited 10% of the code is actually the code that is most critical, most important and most difficult to write and to maintain. the rest of the 90% needs to be there, but it's more of less filler anyways. so what's the point when the most critical and most difficult core of your program is written in C anyways? it's not the 'filler' parts where C development is difficult and unsafe anyways, it's precisely the 'core' parts that are.  
Point taken. I interpreted "defense" as "argument for a specific viewpoint" and not as "plea for respect". 
With pic
But your religion defines hell as "eternal separation from God". Given the character your religion ascribes to your God - *starting* with the whole "faith saves, not deeds" concept, which is just a licence to commit evil without penalty and suggests a God who only cares what people think of him, one of the worst personality traits amongst humans... as your own words make clear - given that, I'd frankly *prefer* hell. (Incidentally, *your religion is not Christianity*. It's a tiny little sect, in much the same way as the Jehovah's Witnesses or the Seventh-Day Adventists. The mainstream of Christianity has always been, and will remain, that of the Roman Catholic Church - with all the baggage, idolatry and channelling that accompanies it; the closest modern analogue of the original practices of the Church can be found in your local Quaker house; and almost all who call themselves Christians today have only scorn for fundamentalists and Biblical literalists, recognising that faith comes from a personal relationship with God rather than making everyone else do what a crusty old book says. Your religion would be better termed Biblicalism, or something like that.)
hell only exists in the minds of those fools who believe in it. eliminate the fools and you eliminate hell.
The gun could make some RIP. 
Upmodded for the first part, downmodded for the second part.
?? what's there to learn? an nth rehash of the 'dynamic-scripting-language-where-everything-is-an-associative-array' idea? why?   
skype mouse
I have seen no evidence of collapsing systems. Which system exactly do you see collapsing, and how? In Scandinavia, even the neo-nazis and others philosophically opposed to equality can freely express their opinion of the anything.
You're absolutely correct, however, the point njharman was trying to make is that we are preventing learned people from entering this country on the grounds that they allegedly speak their mind. What good are our rights if we are unwilling to extend them to those who disagree with us?   
&gt; a write to stdout returns a new stdout. Okay, you've got me with that one.  How does another process (or another program) know about this new stdout? As far as I understand it, there is only one stdout shared by all processes. ----- In Erlang, a list append returns a new list: _the original list still exists_. For example, assume a function is passed ListA as an argument, and the contents of ListA are "a, b, c". If the function has a line 'ListB = list:append(ListA, d)', then the contents of ListB will be "a, b, c, d". However, ListA is still "a, b, c": the list append has had no side-effects. Similarly, if a function take the head off a list, the "parent" list passed in as an argument to the function is also left intact. This is what allows me to ignore what other processes are doing when writing and testing my functions - I do not have to worry that another process is appending to the list I am using within a function. This, I believe, is what is different between our examples of a list vs stdin/out.  If I have two concurrent processes reading from stdin, I have no idea which process will get the next input character.  If I have two concurrent processes removing the head off the same list I pass to each of them as an argument, neither function will affect the other with any operations it does to their copies of that list. ----- If this doesn't help clear things up then I must be missing something from your example.  I am not usually this thick but I am obviously failing to understand something here. 
Any reason for submitting a link to a story that is over 5 years old?
I agree there--he was "slick," but at least he could make a convincing speech without inventing words and mangling his native language.  That's what his "crazy" behavior on Fox pointed out to me--even when upset, he can still create a complete sentence on the fly.  (if, that is, the entire thing wasn't rehearsed)  We've seen Bush when he's upset--it's ugly.
I guess the people who downmodded this comment like nsfw.reddit.com the way it is today. 
The search for intelligence continues another day..
Parents need to be aware of what children are saying and doing online.  Here are the list of the commonly used codes in IMs and SMS. Parents should be aware of this.
In fairness to myself, I had just turned 18 at the time. I had heard the speech that Colin Powell gave to the U.N. in a speech class and I had found it convincing. It sounded like he had real evidence. I would like to believe that four years of college education have sharpened my critical thinking skills. In any case, I'll probably end up voting Libertarian next election. They don't have a chance of winning, but it's better to vote your conscience than for the candidate who will win.
"Reality is merely an illusion, albeit a very persistent one" - Albert Einstein (1879-1955)  If what we generally refer to as 'reality' is an illusion dictated by your own perception, it would logically follow that if you were to change the way you percieve the world you could effectively change your enitire reality.  
You're not old enough to remember Nintendo's [old commercials with The Butthole Surfers](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=IIpM_WHQPfw&amp;eurl=) are you?   
Actually, I believe that because so many people watch Fox "News," that's as much of an endorsement of news organizations MAKING UP CRAP as long as it supports the President as one's likely to ever get.
Be sure to visit [TittyFix.com for more daily porn](http://www.tittyfix.com/)
Does this mean that DNA can be extracted? And we can clone a T-Rex? It's Jurassic Park all over again. edit: ah, hadn't read the last paragraph ("most scientists believe that DNA cannot survive for 70 million years").
Maybe to make it easier to find it on reddit. just last week I saw one of those people on tv who go around debunking the 9/11 conspiracies, and he said that when he contacted the BBC they said they had never heard of this story and that they never published it. Which is clearly a lie on the part of the debunker.
capitalism will succeed when there is a comprehensive social security system (unemployment insurance, minimum wages etc)
So he has an opinion that diverges from the mainstream. That's a crime? Ohh.. sorry forgot, in Bush's New Order any kind of criticism is a crime. And I hardly think citing Daniel Pipes is particularly useful in this context either..
Atheists worst nightmare: people like those!
Even though I agree more with Libertarian principles than any ideas I've ever heard from Republicans or Democrats, I'm afraid to waste my vote. Any Libertarian or Green party votes will be votes that could have been cast for Democrats. Third parties tend to cannibalize the Democratic base much more than the Republican's. For example, what would have happened in 2000 had Ralph Nader not run? Why have Republicans tried in vain to get a Green party candidate on the ballot for the Senate race in Pennsylvana. I feel strongly that the future of the US and that of the world will be better served with getting rid of the current American leadership and the only real way to accomplish that in the short term is to get the Republicans out of power any way possible.
4) Stick head back in sand.
Check this out [Worst defense of Creationism, ever!](http://reddit.com/info/kfjy/comments).
These "stop the politics" arguments are what annoy me about Reddit, honestly.
Hah, I like the hanging (6)
&gt;"No court, justice, or judge shall have jurisdiction to hear or consider any claim or cause of action whatsoever, including any action pending on or filed after the date of the enactment of the Military Commissions Act of 2006, relating to the prosecution, trial, or judgment of a military commission under this chapter, including challenges to the lawfulness of procedures of military commissions under this chapter." NO, that's not the least bit tyrannical, fascist or "pant-wetting" scary.
This article presents five great fonts designed for programmers to ease their long code-writing habits and put the eyes at ease. Pictures of each font along with their description is provided and download links are attached. So enjoy =)
This is the type of loose end that a government not covering up something substantial would be investigating aggressively. Its as if they were investigating only the conclusions they wanted to reach.  The naive dismissal of 911 conspiracies is that it requires too many people to keep quiet.  However, control over the investigation and legitimate information trumps all of that.  The 911 investigation is certainly not seeking truth.  The most likely conclusion is that they are hiding truth.
Pipes, that famous defender of free speech you mean? http://www.thenation.com/doc/20021125/mcneil   
I remember the biscuit tin artwork of lots of people out in the countryside which had a lot of detail and closer inspection revealed some "interesting things". I think it dates from the 1930's and there was a bit about it in the Daily Mail a couple of years ago.
Actually, there was no cat. It was a spoon.
[who is tariq ramadan](http://www.tariqramadan.com/rubrique.php3?id_rubrique=13;)
Man that's cheesy edited.
GM builds cars.  Building cars requires tools. GM found tool.
most of the successful USA presidents are [deists](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Deist#Deism_in_America)
THank you, brother!
ahhh, i feel lovely now (:
What is the unemployment insurance in Canada?
&gt;MMOS - Members Of The Opposite Sex Not only is that NOT what "mmos" means, but it doesn't even work as an acronym.
I am left speachless by the imense wastefulness of this.  I sincerly hope that those HD's where not new.  My GOD! THE HUMANITY!
Peace is inevitable? Only if extremists are removed from political leadership and reason prevails.
I like the idea of a game that hangs on the inability of humans to pick random numbers! The final strategy mentioned is an interesting one, mathematically.  Assume you set yourself a sort of time limit, whereby you concede defeat as soon as you are losing by a total of *T* rounds.  You can prove that the expectation (in the probabilistic sense) of the length of the whole game will be *T* rounds, and that you will win the game with probability *T/(T+1)*.   This means that if you remove the 'giving up' criteria by letting *T &amp;rarr; &amp;infin;*, you end up with a seemingly paradoxical situation where you win with probability 1, but the expected number of rounds you need to play before winning is infinite. Edit: fixed an off-by-one error in T.
It was founded by 18th century lawyers, who were not Christian in any recognizable modern sense of the word.  Most were deists, which was C18th speak for sceptical agnostics.  The Christian panoply (in God we trust on the currency, &amp;c) was added later.
Unitarianism?  Many Christian 'heresies' deny the divinity of Jesus.
&gt; Seperation of Church and State is simple - The Church of England forced itself   &gt; upon the people and our founders did not want to see that happen again. Very ahistorical.  Look at the theocratic states established by Puritans in New England and you'll get a better idea of what they were trying to avoid.
It's because T-Rex fossils aren't 70 million years old. Doesn't this make you think that it is more likely that they are only 10,000 years old? Wake up people!
Sure, if you don't think the cover-up is part of the story, or that Foley's hypocricy is worth mentioning.  I disagree with you on both, apparently.
One thing I wish is that more protests* would be focused on a single issue.  That is, at many protests you find protesters advocating satellite issues, some more related than others.  A protest against the war in Iraq, for example, shouldn't be full of side-protests against globalisation, against Israel, against capitalism, or against anything but the war in Iraq, regardless of how important, related, or worthy those other issues are. The reason is that specific goals have a higher chance of being achieved, and that by focusing on the narrow issue you have a greater chance of winning over people who agree on that issue but disagree on others. \* not to imply that this particular protest won't be focused edit: fixed markdown
I can't read the article! It is only for subscribers.  PLEASE EMAIL ME AND TELL ME HOW I CAN READ THE ARTICLE - or don't post articles like this on Reddit.
concerning a legal resident of the United States, arrested and held without charge in a Florida prison
You should continue reading that paragraph:  "Then again, before this discovery, most scientists believed that soft tissue could not survive for 70 million years either."
Pot calls kettle black
Some of us hate the Drivers too, but not the people who code them.
Every new and unauthorized intrusion into privacy gets this spin. It's either a clever new way to fight fraud or another tool in the war without end on terrorism.  Why stop at identifying you?  How much extra effort is it going to take to profile you demographically and then psychologically? Remember that old Total Information Awareness system that got shot down  in Congress only to rise from the dead on the military side under a new name? They've got terrabytes to fill and the phone call records aren't coming in quite as fast as expected.  This would make the perfect Christmas gift for them.
Why?
Jason Jones owns!
Where can I get a piece of paper that exempts me from these rules? (Do they hand them out at GOP voter registration drives?).  If they only mean to grant themselves authority to persecute muslims, then that should be part of the legislation. But then, if voting procedures will ever be fair again, the GOP is laying the legal framework to be driven into gas chambers, should they ever lose power. Federalism is no longer serving your state and town.  A substantially better (cheaper), safer and freer life is available through secession.
&gt; the entire system is rotten to the core Very true, and this is the reality no one wants to face.  It's delusional to think that a change of political party will lead to a substantive change in foreign policy.  Bush's gift to the US (and it's difficult to see them being able to take advantage of it) is to make the gangsterism and international thuggery that masquerade as US foreign policy impossible to ignore. No one outside the US will ever again believe that the US acts in the interests of freedom or democracy -- Bush's ludicrous speech to the UN assembly evoked contemptuous laughter -- the question is whether US citizens have the energy or capability to engage with what their country has become (over a long period) and change it. I'm pessimistic.
10K? No. It makes me think that large bones like those of the brontosaurs would also be worthy candidates for further inspection. At first look, it would seem logical that the thickness of the bone and the conditions at the time of the animal's death is what preserved the soft tissue from deteriorating.
I agree, but that has nothing to do with if Kissinger is correct or not...
Why do the journalists always use TinyURL for external links? It hides where you are going, screws with PageRank, and means that if TunyURL ever go offline then thousands of articles will immediately be full of broken links.
How ironic to see their interests coincide.  Or perhaps not -- was OBL ever off the CIA payroll?
25% oil from Chinese water snakes, itself consisting 20% eicosapentaenic acid (EPA) - an omega 3 derivative
Alex3917's rule of public libraries: In any library sufficiently large, the probability of some guy jackin' it approaches one.
I think the designers have been watching a little too much Tron.
You know, if you are struggling to pay for home, health insurance, and transportation, you aren't middle class. The title should be, 'Middle class smaller than ever, study finds.'
&gt; Conspiracy theories are not necessary to explain all the bad things that   &gt; happen in history. I'm sick of saying it, but to assume that conspiracies explain nothing is as irrational as assuming that they explain everything. Verified historical conspiracies: * the burning of the Reichstag * the Polish 'attack' on Germany that sparked WWII * the attack on and dissolution of the order of the Knights Templar * the Gulf of Tonkin * sinking of the USS Maine ...to name but a few modern examples. &gt; This doesn't mean leaders like Bush and bin Laden don't lie. They lie for   &gt; breakfast, lunch, and dinner. But they think they're doing it for a good   &gt; cause. Please, no moral equation of Bush and Bin Laden.  I challenge you to name some of Bin Laden's lies.
Lua's history document specifically mentions scheme as inspiration.  scheme is also embeddable, and technically suitable for configuration language.  Too many silly parentheses, I'm sure was the determining factor in driving a new syntax.  Tables as the one structure to rule them all was a neat addition, but not exactly innovation.  Lua is essentially a syntax on top of scheme, has a history of borrowing from scheme in new releases, and even today, macros appears in its future.
&gt; When and how does cooperative behavior emerge, and can we derive lessons from evolutionary history to foster cooperation in a global commons? Speculative, but interesting. Anybody know of some good further links?
He was slick, and insincere, and a war criminal.  His administration presided over the deaths of hundreds of thousands of Iraqis in the cruellest way possible. The clearest possible indication of American racism was that no one cared a damn about this, just about him getting a blow job from a fat girl.
He spoke about 'turning American into a shadow of itself'.  I think he has succeeded.
Some won't work others just look like crap on OSX. :(
Huge female celebrities wallpapers - photos collection with absolutely nothing ads, pop-up's, banners or hidden spam links. Contains 19.300+ high and super high quality image files from 535 different beautiful famous women.
Yep standard procedure in a convoy is to "drive through" and not stop to return fire or anything else.  Stopping is death.  That is what I was trained and I'm sure that is what these national guardsmen were trained.
It's in the contract that security for logistics is provided *only* by the military not haliburton.  It has been since the begining, at least that is what the Frontline on mercs I saw several months back said.
Scientology is banned in Spain, as I understand. They ran drug rehab centers called Narcoron as a cover but were shut down. This was 10 years ago mind you, so not sure what the situation is over there now.
Not about the torture act.  This one's about The Public Expression of Religion Act - H.R. 2679.
can't wait to take one to an airport...
It might just be cooler than anything *you* have ever done, young man.
I wonder if the GDPs of the listed corporations are subtracted from the GDPs of their respective nations, although it wouldn't make that much of a difference either way.
I wonder if you could implement a new spreadsheet tool within Excel.
Good to see that Bitstream Vera (Sans Mono) is mentioned. I've been using this font for a while (in 8pt, the same resolution showed in the screenshot), and it's simply perfect for programming.
damnit - now that wikipedia has locked-up all the republican congressional staffers - they've come over here to annoy us...
fashmatch.com is a site where you can get or give fashion advise. It aims at helping people answer to ubiquitous question of 'what to wear' or 'how to dress'.   Here people can look for a specific item and either suggest a match for it or see the matches other users have suggested for that particular item. Matches can be filter by ranking, style, occasion, color, etc. 
Probably because using retardedly long URLs doesn't fit in their column width.  Also, if it appears in print, it makes it about a zukkion times easier for somebody to type it in correctly.
I'm thinking this is more geared to executives or perhaps the self-employed.  I could see people with office jobs as well at least having the chance to find a hideaway perhaps in the car.
Gimme a break; they're a bunch of blurs.  The only piece of information you get out of this is that Playboy centerfolds tend to appear in the center of the portraits. Now, if they had averaged facial features for these bunnies (as, e.g., here:  http://homepage.psy.utexas.edu/homepage/group/langloislab/newformat/Morph.html  ), or somehow done the same thing for bodies, that would be interesting.  Or even if it had turned out that there was a strong preference for a certain pose, or something. But I don't see anything interesting here.  These are just computer-generated images with the label "art" slapped on them.
what is this??
Bush is absolutely right here - [Constitution is just a goddamned piece of paper](http://t-a-w.blogspot.com/2006/10/habeas-corpus-in-soviet-constitution.html). Even Soviets had constitutional guarantees of full set of human right. Without effective means of enforcement it means nothing.
http://www.geocities.com/~bblair/sbpsalmmontreal.htm
The people in this video are not good, they were successful at something.  But being a Harward professor or whatever doesn't make you a better person.  And even if everbody would agree that these people are good, that doesn't mean that they are good because they are atheists.  You could as well present a video showing people that infact eat their children and are atheists, this would prove absolutely nothing.
Keep in mind, there are 192 nations in the United Nations (which is practically all nations.)  There are tens of millions of corporations around the world, although most of the ones that made this list are in some way related to tranportations (automakers, oil companies).  In fact, some nations that made the list (Saudi Arabia and Iran for example) are also only there because they are essentially oil companies.  For there to be 51 corporations larger in sales than the bottom 143 countries should not be surprising at all given that many of these countries are tiny in size and populations while the biggest companies are global and serve hundreds of millions of the world's consumers.
The only one I think is usable in that list is Vera Bitstream (which is quite nice). Visual Studio's new Consolas font is my favorite font for programming. Too bad it's non-free. Here's an example: http://www.poynteronline.org/resource/78683/consolas.gif If you have a copy of Visual Studio 2005 you can download an installer for Consolas from Microsoft's website. Or an unscrupulous character might be able to find the TTF file with Google. :)
I thought the article was going to be a joke, but those were actually some tight little strategies.  I can't believe I'm looking forward to playing RPS soon.
Here's the scariest part of all... "Page A17."
I went from lua to python.  Lua is the only real option for PDAs, and embeds much more easily into C, so extending a C app with a "macro language" is something Lua is best for.  Python has more batteries included, and lets you ommit end statements.  Its more mature, and so more suitable for desktop/server apps, or if you don't have the C knowledge to integrate missing functionality.   Lua as a standalone "desktop" application language is not really maintained by the language designers.  There is definitely no compelling reason to ditch python for lua to target web/desktop apps. Io "macro" features might be a compelling advantage to learn instead of python/ruby, but the advantages are will usually be fairly low.
There were no permanent territorial expansions during the Roman Empire, with two exceptions: Britannia and Dacia (today's Roumania). The Empire just as large by the time it was split as during the so-called Pax Romana. The trouble began when legions discovered that they could choose their own emperor (the Soldier-Emperors), although there were other factors as well, the invading barbarians, and Gibbon [1] notoriously named the replacement of republican morals by Christian ones. [1] Edward Gibbon, The Decline and Fall of the Roman Empire.
Nice commentary. The observation that slower speeds do not engage the mind sufficiently causing loss of consentration is particularly to the point. Of course, speed laws have never been about safety. They are about generating revenue.
http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Demo_(computer_programming)
holy shit that is a lot of people.  I wonder how many demos could be added to the list? These are just the ones that were caught.  How many pedophiles can there be amoung elected officials.
A humorous tale from the country ...
Maybe the downmodders should read a biography of Linus Torvalds to "get it". He played Prince of Persia until Minix arrived. 
Excellent point, God bless your wonderful thinking!
&gt;How does this differ from any other religion? It's failing.
PUNishment, I believe.
The first demo I tried worked in wine. Nice. :-) 
This is the single stupidest thing I've seen on reddit so far (3 months).
Does anyone have a link to the page at nasa.gov or maybe just a link to a smaller image of this?
I post it here in hopes that some of us would take the time to make that article better. Right now it really looks like spam.
And just a week after we handed it back over to the Iraqi's - the torture has started [again](http://www.telegraph.co.uk/news/main.jhtml?xml=/news/2006/09/10/wirq10.xml).  Of course, there is no moral outrage this time because of only the US is capable of committing wrongs. Anti-US sentiment is the bell-bottoms of this era
It was free yesterday. I guess the Times decided to make some $ off it because we've made it so popular.. wait, I just checked the article, it's still free. (edited - update)
&gt;the brontosaurs No such thing. Brachiosaurs, perhaps?
really cool. it's like digg.com just but for software
This article is so science-fiction-y. i mean i've read and loved more than a few sf books that purport to describe a culture like this, but i find it hard to picture it actually happening. (course, the "easiest" solution, to such a population crisis is space travel, in my books anyway ;P )
A minimum wage of $5.15US or $7.00CAN--working just 40 hours a week with 2 weeks vacation per year--means you're richer than [the top 15% of humanity](http://www.globalrichlist.com/). It's enough to afford hot running water, heat, electricity, lodging in a house, and a fully nutritional diet featuring an unparalleled variety of cuisine (relative to all humans that have ever lived).  That's not nothing. That's a hell of a lot. And if a person is greedier still for even more luxuries, work some overtime or commit to getting a real job that pays more. It's not like higher paying jobs don't exist even for unskilled workers.
That AC-130 video is pretty disturbing...
ComputerWorld article strings together some psuedo points on why Apple is scared of the Zune player.
Reminds me of an episode of "Married .. with Children". Bud Bundy in the library ... 
download sites are usually so not user friendly. this one is nice - it's not just for geeks but for normal people too
Rather outdated: not significantly updated since 2003 and many of the links are dead.
Genius.
The point of the argument is to say that, based on the population there is proportionate number of christians in gaol as you would expect. But that is not the argument - that is a supporting point for the main point of the argument, i.e. despite the fact that 10% of the population are atheist, only 0.2% of those in gaol are atheist, thus refuting the argument that all atheists are without morals or are in some way corrupt "sinners". If atheists were so utterly illmoral as people would have you believe, you would understandably expect there to be at the very least a representative proportion (i.e. 10%) of offenders to be atheist, if not a higher percentage. Its a simple argument.
Halloween in Austin
I did not see a proper explanation as to *how* they average faces. Do you know how it is done?  Is this something reproducable by your average computer geek?
I read a review about it in Download Squade: http://www.downloadsquad.com/2006/09/15/beta-marker-digg-those-new-releases/
I applaud your certainty about what you want and don't want in a country. I expect there's a pro-market, non-democratic, tax-free state somewhere waiting to welcome you; perhaps the [Cayman Islands](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Cayman_Islands) will suit your needs.
About time people are being educated about Scientology. They have completely lost the plot and pry on people who are in differcult situations.
Isch wäs echt nedd was dess do zu suche hott. 
According to Wikipedia (http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Waleed_al-Shehri#Aftermath) this old BBC article is wrong: "Waleed and Wail were both mistakenly reported to have been found alive and well, by the BBC later in 2001."
f
Commons Confidential: George Jones probes how the Tory leader can light up his party's conference
Main Entry: bron·to·sau·rus  Pronunciation: "brän-t&amp;-'sor-&amp;s  Variant(s): also bron·to·saur /'brän-t&amp;-"sor/  Function: noun  Etymology: New Latin, from Greek brontE thunder + sauros lizard; akin to Greek bremein to roar  : any of a genus (Apatosaurus syn. Brontosaurus) of large sauropod dinosaurs of the Jurassic -- called also apatosaurus \t 
This site probably has the most up-to-date summaries of the bill's impact on the online gaming industry: http://www.gambling911.com/ I know people in the industry, and they're freaking out a bit - the major provisions of the bill prevent banking institutions from transmitting cash to online gaming companies. But US banks have routinely denied gaming-coded transactions for years now, and the industry has managed to get around that problem using 3rd party providers. So, not much has changed materially. A little birdie tells me that the largest pressure group behind this bill are the traditional brick-and-mortal casinos, who feel threatened by people gambling anywhere they don't control. They're also readying their own online gambling plans and are working with lawmakers to create the legal climate amenable for them and their plans for legalization and heavy regulation in a few years. Which will create barriers to entry to all the 'upstart' gambling companies operating out of Costa Rica and the Caribbean. You can be sure that once Harrahs and the other huge casino companies have their online gambling systems ready to go, that this law will be repealed, new laws made so that politicians get their kickbacks, so that the citizens of the US can lose their money in the legal, politician-certified, gambling dens of US companies and our politicians get the extra power and money they deserve for... well, nothing - other than brokering power. (Warning: Gambling911 contains a large number of annoying ads, unfortunately par for the course on these types of sites.)
Amazing. My first thought was: These really make it more comprehensible that a couple of gigs of DNA base pairs can generate a human being.
For some reason, no one ever seems to mention the Terminus Font: http://www.is-vn.bg/hamster/jimmy-en.html
From the Wikipedia: *The dinosaur genus originally known as [Brontosaurus](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Brontosaurus) is now officially designated [Apatosaurus](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Apatosaurus)*. From the Brontosaurus article:  &gt;The terms brontosaurus, brontosaurs and brontosaurians (no capital 'B'; no italics) are often used to refer to an infraorder of sauropods including genera such as Brachiosaurus, Camarasaurus, Diplodocus and Supersaurus, as well as Apatosaurus.
collection of computer ideas, business trends, humorous observations
The fact that Triskweline is available as TTF suggests that it is scalable, but it isn't. 10pt - constant headache - no thanks.
Well I haven't noticed founding members of other religions promoting the use of terror tactics against their critics, like cults do. Or harrasment, like cults do. Or unsubstantiated legal claims, like cults do. Or illegally practicing medicine, like cults do. Or commiting criminal acts, like cults do. Or trying to infiltrate governments, like cults do. Or steal all their members money, like cults do. Or enforcing seperation from family and friends, like cults do. Lets not forget that religion actually has some basis in fact, it wasn't made up by a science fiction writer who was addicted to happy pills and a ton of other crap.
huh? all modern operating systems, as far as i know, have a separate and unique stdin/stdout for each process. in fact, in modern operating systems *there is no possible way* to share stdin or stdout between processes. (precisely because this would destroy the 'functionalness' properties of io.) in any case, this is an operating system problem, not a language issue. p.s. stdin is read-only, stdout is write-only. this makes it *more* functional, not less. pipe semantics are functional and side-effect free.   
This was simple-minded to the point of being painful.
Yes, we definitely need to wake up and jump to conclusions with no scientific basis. Who needs further study and actual data to prove whether or not they are 70 million years old or 10,000 years old, i have a hunch and thats all that counts! Who knows, maybe you are right, and this will be the discovery that turns all of our previous discoveries on its head. But you make it seem like this is rock solid evidence and the only evidence you provide is 'it makes sense so it must be true'. What happened to the scientific method? Lots of things were thought to make sense and be 'more likely', but then it turned out they werent. So wait for the proof before sounding off. Unless of course theres a large anti-christian conspiracy that will cover up the truth?
Fetish vibes... fetish vibes... Yet that actually looks comfortable!  I'll get grandma a case for christmas.
FJax is a Javascript/Flash integration that simplifies cross browser asynchronous requests and XML processing. It seems to make more sense, though, as part of a larger Ajax framework.
bollocks, I hope that doesn't affect our supplies here
&gt; "Simply" uses the speech synthesis DLLs of Windows XP to say: "Welcome to function 2004" Does this really count?  Ok so the programs they are creating are 256 bytes or less, but they are just calling libraries that could be of any size.   What exactly is so special about that?
a good tool for software early adopters. helps keep you up to date
So!  After all these years - I finally discover the artist who created that awesome picture (the second cat, on the upper right).  I came across it a quarter-century ago, on this album cover: http://www.discogs.com/viewimages?what=R&amp;obid=608973 I had thought back then that it was probably mescaline-influenced, due to the style and colouring... perhaps the researchers during the sixties who had supposed that the psychedelic state may be comparable to certain mental illnesses were not so far off the mark, after all?
The first thing I thought when I read your comment was &gt;You steal men's souls, and make them your slaves!  &gt;  &gt; &gt;I suppose the same could be said of all religions...
So you picked out one of the lame ones in the archive. How about looking at some of the demos in the top 5? Like Lattice: http://www.256b.com/demo/256. If you don't think that's spectacular I don't know what to say. Nothing but mode 13.
You obviously have no historic knowledge of the flintstones.
&gt; &gt; You already degraded yourself enough. I do not care the least bit what you think of this, or of anything else. &gt; you apparently believe that this makes me completely worthless in every way? Falsely accusing others with the intent of smearing them is uncivilized.  Ergo, *you* are *again* proven uncivilized.
7 tips that give you real dollar savings when you decide to go for VoIP for your house
Research shows that in order to lose weight safely and keep it off, you need to exercise. And even those who are not overweight benefit from an exercise or workout routine. But many people don’t exercise regularly, which puts them at risk for heart disease, accidents or injuries, and other health concerns.
None of that matters. People only think that democrats and republicans are different from each other. Both sides want larger government, both sides hope to restrict civil liberties. Democrats are only pandering to voters by pretending to care. The truth is the more socialist leaning among them (Pelosi, H. Clinton) rejoice at these restrictions behind closed doors. People are quick to forget, and it isn't anyones fault. It is human nature. Allow me to remind you. Labels on records and violent games, increased FCC regulations, Ruby Ridge, Waco, Online Decency Act, you seriously could go on for quite a while, but don't you think this is enough commas? Democrats would erode the document to the point of striking out the second, ninth and tenth amendments on the road to socialism. Republicans would do the same for other reasons, but would wait to shoot the second amendment in the head for last.  Sometimes the savior is merely an equally insidious foe in disguise. Moral: "Wasting" your vote is the only hope your children have. Believe me, they are just pandering to voters for short term power grabs. Think they would pay attention to the Libertarian planks if a candidate got 15% of the vote? You bet they would.
3rd to be expelled in Pinoy Dram Academy is Geoffrey ‘Geoff’ Taylor.
I'm a Monospace man.
Pictures of InPhase Technologies Holographic new 300GB drive and an interview with the company.
"treshold"?  Small wonder that so many bugs exist in software - considering the woeful inability of people to spell correctly, in these 'modern' times.
This article came out a while ago.  The scientific community seems to have been ignoring it, for the most part.  It seems highly unlikely that 'soft tissue' could survive for 65-70 million years.  Either there's a good explanation, or the assumptions that have gone into paleontology are going to come crashing down.
preserved for 70 million years?  That's a really, really long time.  Any logic within me would tell me that soft tissue couldn't survive for 70 million years.
Funniest reddit link title EVER!
"Camelicious"... yummie...
I actually think they quoted celebrities because they donate large amounts to charity, they give up their time that they could spend making millions more in cash to *voluntarily* act as a public liason. I mean Angelina Jolie was concerned about accepting the UN's Goodwill Liason because of her controvestial personal life. I mean you've got that guy in the US senate, who was christian, who was sexually harassing teenage boys. How much money has the Church donated to humanitarian projects? Not all that much, the majority of Church charity goes back to members. Compare that with what 66 billion mentioned in that video for two donations, I mean that's probably more than the church donates in a decade.
That last picture is almost identical to the interfering wave patterns of holographic film.  Perhaps his ability to actualize holographic imagery (sight is holographic in nature, otherwise we would have blind spots)?
PHP 
Bitstream is NOT a good font to use!  It lacks *all* non-ASCII afaik. Use the BitStream derivative, [**DejaVu TTF**](http://dejavu.sourceforge.net/wiki/index.php/Main_Page).  It is GPLd and supports full UTF-8. Hurray!
What a waste of expensive purified elements!  Considering the work required to obtain them, as well as the cost of purchasing them, these so-called "experiments" are akin to the use of $100 bills as toilet paper.  I am apalled.
Because Bush is an idiot and wouldn't know what to do with the information??  It is well known that Bush doesn't manage at the level Tenet was operating at.  That's what Bush hired all those people below him for, to do "stuff". 
Just imagine if this had happened on Clinton's watch.  We could be seeing non-stop news about it for many years.  You know, like we did about Monica-gate.
FWIW the version of Vera that Bitstream gave away covers Latin-1. But DejaVu is definitely the way to go, it's a drop-in replacement for Bitstream Vera with very good Unicode coverage.
This is a vile piece of legislation, but it does NOT say that "non-allegiance to Bush" is terrorism.
Posh! John Adams was a christian, and passionate at that.  He devoted his life to the study of religion.  I could find you a hundred other quotes from his letters to Thomas Jefferson alone to indicate this.  His views, however, are somewhat more complicated than a single quote appearing in isolation will reveal.  I suggest you pick up a good biography on some of the founding fathers and learn for yourself what they think in all their subtelty. Incidentally, in one of Adams later letters to TJ, he intimates to the effect that he awaits the day when he will see TJ in the next lifetime, -- but if he is wrong, he says, he shall never know.
I really don't understand this obsession with bitmap fonts rendered at tiny sizes, given that modern monitors are rapidly diverging from the &lt;100ppi "standard" that prevailed in the 90s (the [graphic designer-y types](http://www.k10k.net/) are guilty of this too). Subpixel anti-aliasing on high-resolution LCDs is the way forward, and you achieve that using quality outline fonts (with good hinting algorithms, or good hinting information hand-coded), not using bitmap fonts designed to display at 8 pixels or whatever.
You tell your boss it will take a year.  6 months in he keeps pressuring you.  You tell him, "Look, i said ayear, I am aimed for 6 months but it just didn't work and so now I'm aiming for 9 but this is a very hard hting." at which point he turns and asks if you're working for the competition (!!). I think this stems from a lack of respect.  Along the lines of "if you were as skilled as you said you could get it done in 1 day" type thing.  he keeps joking to every one in the office about how I am going to get the website up past the number leader in the industry...next week.  Every one knows it is impossible, yet why does he keep joking about it after asking me how I'm doing?  I keep telling him that if he gives me a million in spending capital and a workforce to guide, I could get it for him in 6 months; that tends to shut him up as he knows he's getting me for quite the bargain.
How do you, in all your infinite scientific wisdom, measure whether the scientific community is ignoring this discovery? Do you read paleontology journals? Do you do paleontological research?  Perhaps if you did, you'd know that there are systematic, well-studied, and reliable (to within a few million years) methods of dating fossils of this kind.
D is the 5th letter of the alphabet.  Just thought that was notable.
&gt; Judaism, Islam, Christian old testament stuff. Islam somewhat, Judaism much less, and how the hell is the old testament doing terror tactics? It's a book. &gt;Many Christian groups have stated this to be their goal. There are schools where students are spefically being trained for this. Exactly groups, not the entire 'religion'. &gt; Like denying the worth of psychiatry? Uhh... medicine, practicing medicine. I didn't mention criticising it, I criticise psychiatry they give bipolar pills to kids that can't even be diagnosed with it. &gt; The great Mother Teresa did this kind of thing, trapping the sick and dying in her "homes" and not allowing family and friends to visit. It's called quarantine, most of the people she worked with had leprosy. &gt; There are also excommunications where you are supposed to shun your excommunicated friends and family. Excommunications are in a completely different league, and they only exist in certain christian communities namely the catholics. &gt; They were made up by madmen and maniuplative con artists. No they were made up to try and rationalise things like the sun and the moon. Also AFAIK only the Shik community enforces donations... wait that's of your time to charity work. No religion forces you to donate all your life savings, they ask for donations just like every other charity does. Scientology is vastly different from any religion. It's similar to parts of religion, but those are mostly parts that are defined as a cult by the main religion anyway such as catholic cults and Islamic extremists.
I use Dina. It's a tweaked and IMO better version of Proggy.  http://www.donationcoder.com/Software/Jibz/Dina/
Friedbeef interviews cyn.in creator and CEO, Apurva who says "Yes we see cyn.in as a sharepoint replacement and more"  Among other things in this interview covers cyn.in's business models, and competition like 37signals basecamp.
The [Emacs Wiki](http://www.emacswiki.org/) features a page with fonts recommendations for different display sizes and resolutions: http://www.emacswiki.org/cgi-bin/wiki/GoodFonts
I must disagree.  (And point out, because it bothers me, the inference, not by you, that Jefferson was a 'founding father of the constitution' ... in reality Jefferson was the minister to France at the time, and so not present at the convention.) But sure, the constitution as we have it was written, in secret session even, by a select group of so-called 'demi-gods'.  But these 'demi-gods' as such they were, were chosen to represent the State in the convention.  They were chosen to defend the interests of their State and the citizens of their State.  Then before ratification, the people of the several states argued about the constitution, -- several volumes of gazettes and private correspondance have been published of these debates, which I add that I am going through currently.  There was a great fervor to adopt the constitution, as the Articles of Confederation were acutely felt to be insufficient to the needs of the day. &gt;From a historical perspective, it's a stretch to claim the U.S. was "founded by" the population. Why is this?  In each State, the people elected a group of men to either ratify or not ratify the proposed constitution.  The federal government had no power, but what was given to them by the people and the states.  If the constitution only had the support of a few stifled intellectuals it never would have been ratified.  I find your claim patently false, -- indeed, it is a stretch to claim the U.S. was **not** "founded by" the population.
Meat eaters usually taste pretty nasty.
Why it is a surprise?
I didn't pick that one to single out one that's lame, I picked it because it was the "COUP DE COEUR", which I am going to assume means its the most popular one on the site currently. And as nice as Lattice is, it still doesn't answer my question.   How much of that relies on external libraries?  The .txt and .nfo files don't explain much of anything, so I can't tell how impressive this really is.
Perhaps he rode down on the falling debris.
According to the article, it most definitely allows that interpretation. &gt;Any person subject to this chapter who, in breach of an allegiance or duty to the United States, knowingly and intentionally aids an enemy of the United States, or one of the co-belligerents of the enemy, shall be punished as a military commission under this chapter may direct. It most definitely and clearly can be applied to political dissidents.  If there were sectarian violence in the US, branding the revolutionaries as co-beligerants of the "enemy" would simply be up to the POTUS.  avoiding the burden of trials would simplify distractions from the grand order that can be achieved tyranically.  Similarly, if some leftist fringe group (or covert military ops designed to frame them) commits a violent act, then its not less unreasonable-than-usual of a stretch to impugn democrats as cobeligerants.
the true hard cold fact of free webhosting
Hmm?  It displays properly on my computer - which is an old 'AT'-formfactor machine, running Windows 98 and IE5.  It has an Asus P2B-B motherboard with a P3-1000 (Slot 1 version), 256MB of PC-100 SDRAM, and an 8MB Matrox video card. At this time, such a computer would be regarded as "scrap" - which is indeed the condition under which I obtained it, at no cost whatsoever.  So; if such an "obsolete" computer is able to display this particular image successfully, what then is wrong with yours?  For clearly, it is likely not a situation of incapability or true obsolescence - therefore, I wonder if your system is somehow misconfigured, unless you actually are running a less capable system than the one I have described. EDIT:  A few minutes ago, I swapped out the CPU and replaced it with an old P2-233 - and the image still displays properly, although somewhat more slowly. ADDITIONAL EDIT:  I have now reinstalled the P3-1000 CPU, replaced the original hard drive with an empty unit, and installed Windows 2000 with SP4 and IE6.  Again, the image displays correctly, with no difficulty.  As a cross-check, it also displays correctly on my other computer - same model of motherboard, but with a 1.3GHz Celeron in a Slot-T 'slotket', 768MB of PC-133 SDRAM, a 256MB FX-5500 AGP video card, and running openSuSE 10.1 Linux with xgl.  FireFox and Opera both display the image correctly, on that machine. How 'little' RAM is your computer actually equipped with?  If it is 64MB or less, then yes - I concede that you would experience some difficulties with displaying large images in Windows 98 or newer.  However, you would likely be experiencing many other difficulties as well! As a general comparison: a P2-400 class of computer with 128MB of PC-100 SDRAM and a 4MB PCI-bus video card is capable of displaying DivX video files, as well as large images, in Windows 98.  A Celeron-500 with 64MB of RAM and a similar video card is also capable of such when running a less-demanding operating system - such as, for example, Vector Linux.
For me Powell is one of the key villains of all this. His testimony at the UN convinced many people, including me, that there must be something in the Iraq accusations. After all, what decent career soldier would be willing to put his soldier's lives on the line if he hadn't convinced himself it were true. The time to have fallen on his sword was before the UN presentation, when he clearly was shown poor and contradictory information. And saying that because he was a soldier he didn't think of disobeying  his superior sounds a lot like the Nurenberg defence.
Where is the evidence that they were not investigating it aggressively? 1) - from the article: "FBI Director Robert Mueller acknowledged on Thursday that the identity of several of the suicide hijackers is in doubt" (BTW, this article was written just 12 days after the 9/11 attacks). 2) - As dbenbenn says above, the article may not even be accurate. The most likely conclusion is that you are immediately embracing anything that seemingly supports your conspriracy theory.
I hadn't realized the T-Rex was fond of using Kleenexes ;)
crap, Rollerball was right
The last link was **very** interesting.  Thank you.
Probably an easy way for them to track how many people click on the links.
No - the image displays correctly.  Your computer is likely not configured properly (read my post, above).
A religion for the weak-minded
Mmmmh, Jurassic pork...
There are some video production houses which not only cater the corporate sector of Denmark but also offer there services to the average joe of Denmark who also demand professional quality videos for there day to day celebrations.
the stars are magic.
The 19 hijackers determined the same day as the attacks are still afaik, the official list.  If all you care about is whether you are justified in invading Afghanistan, or killing other random muslims, then there is no need to correct the record.  This shows that there is no ongoing investigation to fill in blanks and innacuracies around the story fabricated during the first week after the attacks. The part of the article about the guy who's name and picture are used as a hijacker is probably accurate.  There are literally 100s of 911 accounts and oddities that deserve official investigation and response other than some right wing blogger giving an offhand dismissal.
[Already there](http://nsfw.reddit.com/info/xxv/comments).
You do you realize the progressive JPG file-sizes are about 25% greater, right? And though normal JPGs don't have preview mode, they still load top down, so you'll start seeing stars soon enough.
This really should be titled "how to install PHP and use it to write bad code".
One suggestion to change reddit: Have categories such as Art, Science, Politics, Humor, etc., and allow people to filter by category. I personally love the "leftist political rants."  I have been a leftist political activist for years and I think this stuff is important and relevant. However, there will always be a large segment of any society that isn't political, no matter how bad the situation gets.   Even when I was in Palestine working in collaboration with Palestinians non-violently protesting against the Israel's oppressive occupation, there were those that just didn't want to know about it. And I think that's fine.  I myself, from time to time, drop out from working hardcore on political actions to just enjoy my life and "bury my head in the sand."
This is surely evidence of His Noodly Appendage at work.
vs?
Sorry Creationists... no dice... http://www.pandasthumb.org/archives/2005/04/dino-blood_redu.html "Hendrik Poinar of McMaster University in Hamilton, Ontario, cautions that looks can deceive: Nucleated protozoan cells have been found in 225-million-year-old amber, but geochemical tests revealed that the nuclei had been replaced with resin compounds. Even the resilience of the vessels may be deceptive. Flexible fossils of colonial marine organisms called graptolites have been recovered from 440-million-year-old rocks, but the original material—likely collagen—had not survived." "As is nearly always the case, the juicy bits are in the background.  The great advantage that science journals have today is the ability to put all supplemental details on-line.  In this case, the three page “main” article sports a supporting text over four times as long.  For example, the main article has left many people with the false impression that the recovered tissues were in a soft pliable state when first exposed.  This is not true.  All of the fossil material was rehydrated during the same process that removed the mineral components of the bone.  They were then buffered, and also some were fixed.  The related press reports have created the impression that there are large features with the characteristics of fresh tissue.  This is not true.  The structures examined are a few millimeters across at most.  The last, and rather irritating aspect of this research is not from the Science article, or the supporting material, but from the press interviews given by Schweitzer which repeatedly hint at the recovery of DNA, and even of cloning." Creationist claims are all the same.  On the surface they seem shiny, but scratch the surface and it flakes off. 
Given the fact that every line has a badly placed line break, I suspected copy-paste and found this: http://www.paintercreativity.com/articles/top-10-lies.html Looking at the submitter profile, there's another article, http://everyravlik.blogspot.com/2006/10/top-ten-list-of-investment-scams.html, which is copy-pasted from http://www.securities.state.ks.us/press/2004/2004TopTen1-14-04.html .  
I scratched at my screen for a good 30 seconds before realized the dot in the zero is built into that Vera font.
This also wasn't ignored.  Google 'dinosaur soft tissue'.  It was posted all over the place. 
Why would you want miss reporting to be found easier on reddit!  Do you like spreading miss information and confusion?
Would be interesting to have private corporations included.  For instance, Exxon Mobil is 26th on this list but something like 14th overall in world oil sales (the top companies are private state-owned corporations).
&gt; In section 950j. the bill criminalizes any challenge to the legislation's legality by the Supreme Court or any United States court. Er, what? Correct me if I'm wrong, but it looks like 950j. (and 950g.) specifically allow for appeals to the DC Circuit Court of Appeals and the Supreme Court. (Not that I don't think this is the worst law since the Alien and Sedition Acts. That particular statement just seems like an outright falsehood.)
Common sense is only worthwhile in common circumstances.  You only live for 70 years, not 70 million.  You have no common sense about what can or cannot happen in 70 million years. That being said, I Googled this and along with all the creationist trumpeting I found quite a bit of real information. On common sense: My grandfather was a pilot, and I remember him explaining to me how one of the first things you learn as a pilot is to trust your reason and your instruments and not your common sense.  Your common sense can tell you you're flying straight and level when in fact you're flying upside down and heading toward the ground.  The reason is that your common sense is calibrated for walking upright on the ground, not flying around at 500 miles per hour above the clouds. Of course, pilots practice and eventually their "common sense" learns to incorporate flying into it's repertoire... but this is learned, not innate. Science is a *discipline*, and part of that discipline is to learn to systematically ignore common sense in favor of deduction, induction, and direct measurment. Also, read my other post in response to this article. 
The frustrating adventure of working part time under bad management.  Today's episode may be the turning point.
let's not forget the [fedex tshirt](http://billboardom.blogspot.com/2006/03/fedex-t-shirt.html)
The real difficulty is more that protests typically have very *specific* objectives. Like, "free this person" or "abolish this law." To protest the stripping of constitutional rights is a difficult thing, since there isn't really any *tangible* abuse yet (outside of isolated cases like Guantanamo... and those do indeed have protests associated with them.) Until there's an example of some regular citizen being labelled a terrorist and locked away, it's tricky to do much. What slogan will you shout? "Don't do that thing that you now have the power to do!"?
I was just about to, but you beat me to it. I also like using the lfp-smooth font in emacs, especially on smallish LCD displays. Get alot of characters on the screen and it's easy on the eyes.
And if all you care about is supporting a conspiracy theory, rather than trying to find out what really happened, there is no need to admit that an article might be mistaken. There is nothing in the article that suggests the FBI was *not* investigating these reports and looking into what happened, and you don't address the claims that the article was wrong in the first place. If you want to present evidence that 9/11 was an inside job or that this article really was accurate despite other evidence to the contrary, by all means go ahead.  I won't call you anti-american or a crazy nutjob like some stupid rightwingers might.  But when something you present as evidence turns out to be inaccurate, don't cling to it like a life raft in the middle of the ocean or you'll risk making *yourself* look like the irrational one. PS - where does "some right wing blogger giving an offhand dismissal" come in?  Which right wing blogger dismissed these, and why is he/she relevant to this discussion?
I would upvote if you had commented with what it was on wiki BEFORE we all changed it so that you could see how it changed, instead of how a few pissed off people changed it. I mean, how is it interesting unless you see what it WAS? And this is towards everyone who links wikipedia "in hopes that some of us would take the time to make that article better"-we would like to see what it was and how it was changed if we didn't hit up this link right when it was posted.
I hope you at least read the wiki article.
Reasonable article overall, but... &gt; which probably made Wal-Mart about as important as the Federal Reserve in holding down inflation.  aaaaaaaarrrggghh!! The Federal Reserve *creates* inflation.  It is the *only* thing that creates inflation.  Prices change due to supply and demand.  If you supply more of something, the price drops.  The Federal Reserve constantly creates more money both by printing it and creating credit, and so the price of money drops. The price of money falling is exactly the same of the price of everything else...rising.  Rising prices are the *result* of inflation, which *is the increase in the money supply*, despite the government's attempts to change the definition of the word. If the newly created money were perfectly evenly distributed, this would be fine -- for example, 5% inflation would mean a 5% higher dollar value in your bank account.  The problem is that all the new money goes to central bankers, more than countering the loss in value, while everyday citizens get nothing to counter the loss in value.  Essentially, it is a hidden tax that the government blames on everything *except* the real cause. Wal*Mart has made prices go down, while the Federal Reserve has done the exact opposite -- it is one of the most harmful government agencies, especially if you're poor.
GM needs tools to build cars.  They found a tool.
I can see now why Carl is a TV reporter: he writes like a 9th-grader.
Any info about who made this? This is probably the best 911 conspiracy video I've seen.  Almost as good as reading the transcriptions of all the rescue operation communications.
&gt; I suggest you pick up a good biography on some of the founding fathers and learn for yourself what they think in all their subtelty. Why? I'm not the one making assertions about their beliefs. I merely asked degustibus to justify his claim about John Adams, considering a quote that apparently contradicted it. Of course, if I *were* to read "a good biography", all that will tell me is what I think the author of that biography concludes the Founding Fathers believed. So perhaps you should be a little more far-reaching in your condescension; perhaps next time you could suggest that someone at least read every textbook they can find, or go directly to the source material, or perhaps even embark on a lifelong course of historical study honing ever more finely onto the precise beliefs of the Founding Fathers. As, of course, you have clearly done, to be in a position to pass such withering judgement on others. For if you were to step back and think about it for a second, you'd realise that the only people in a position to assert anything about what the Founding Fathers *really believed* have been dead for a couple of hundred years. All we can do now is draw a few fairly obvious conclusions about a few specific beliefs they *didn't* hold, and guess at the rest. We might guess well - but anyone who claims more than that is a fool. **\*** One more point: many people who have no religion themselves have nonetheless studied it for a goodly chunk of their lifetimes; I myself have always maintained an interest in religious and mystical questions, particularly the Gnostic church, despite being an atheist.
Linux has had this since the early 90s. 
The real surprise for me is that in at least two of the images, we are able to see stars - the one feature most notably lacking in nearly all of NASA's space photography.
&gt; If clickprints are used as a way to prevent fraud, it's highly unlikely there will be an uproar over privacy, says Padmanabhan. We'll have to see. Yeah right.
Are you crazy that Excel is the perfect games platform but it'll be useless for business type stuff.
I'm one of those weirdos who likes proportional fonts for coding, and Verdana is my favourite for that purpose. I have to give MS a lot of credit for their fonts actually - my favourite monospaced font is their Andale Mono, and Georgia is a lovely serif.
Wikipedia calls these entries "vanity articles". Advertising on Wikipedia is a sure-fire way to get your article deleted.  Example: "reddit is a community-powered web site used to find new and interesting online content." "A recent PC World article comparing reddit and digg gave the edge to reddit, adding that "reddit may represent the future of community news filters"." "...in contrast to digg, which has been cited for editorial manipulation on several occasions." Clearly these things are used to convince Wikipedia readers to go to reddit, and not Digg. All of those things are vanity information.
I'm surprised those demos come with the assembler source.  That's not very usual in the scene.   That reminds me.  Justin Frankel, of Winamp fame, has his own [own set](http://1014.org/code/tiny_asm/) (circa 1995).
Following is a list of 232+ various RSS feeds related to information security.  save this text file and import to your feed reader.
Please don't tell me you're one of those moon hoax people.
Teenage kids, leading Tarawih prayers.
[IMG]http://www.museum-replicas.com/images/productimages/small/Rodin-Adam-red.JPG i tried.
It amazes me that eugenics still seems to be a credible idea among some people.
Interesting, can you provide some references ? The murder of his brother, his mother, Seneca and others, was that also made up after his death ?
[2000 revenue of $22 billion](http://sec.gov/Archives/edgar/data/789019/000103221001501099/d10k.txt) is below the cutoff.
They aren't. The math would be too hard, because some companies do business overseas.
One of the fundamental assertions of Christianity is that belief in this deity is an active transforming influence on one's life. In other words, if Christianity is true, Christians should have the fruits of the spirit: Love, joy, peace, patience, kindness, goodness, faithfulness, gentleness, and self control. Those are Paul's words (translated, of course), not mine. As for everyone's a sinner: Romans 6: "5If we have been united with him like this in his death, we will certainly also be united with him in his resurrection. 6For we know that our old self was crucified with him so that the body of sin might be done away with,[a] that we should no longer be slaves to sin— 7because anyone who has died has been freed from sin." And frankly, that's the least harsh part of Romans 6. :) I can go on to 1 John or how about the gospels? Did Jesus not say, "If you love me, keep my commandments?" So, we've now gotten rid of almost every Christian out there. Yet Jesus promises power in the form of the Holy Spirit. (remember those fruits of the Spirit?) Does your deity not have the power to do what he promised? All I'm suggesting is that this deity do what they promised... Fundamentally, there should be something different, something better about Christians, if you are to believe the bible. Now, if you can show me anywhere in the Bible where it says that Christianity means you just go about living your life and at the end you get poofed away to heaven, I'll retract. "But Ibsulon," you say, "I already said that many call themselves Christians that aren't. That's even Jesus's words!" However, have you not read 1 Corinthians? Paul commands that these people be *kicked out* of the church! Or do you not realize, according to that same book, that you indeed will judge the angels? "But Ibsulon," you then say, "What about the not judging others lest ye be judged in the same manner?" Well, it's your biblical contradictions, not mine. :) -- But if you have the redemptive power of Christ within you, and there indeed is such a redemptive power that exists, then you should have dealt with the planks and specks in your eye already. But you'd have to show that there indeed is such a power anyway.   
No - I merely state the fact that stars are not visible, in NASA space pictures.  I believe that this may be due to their equipment, which lacks dynamic range in comparison with other technologies.  Should NASA choose to fit their spacecraft with better equipment, then we would see stars - as in, for example, this image: http://www.mentallandscape.com/C_Zond08_01.jpg 
Flat panel monitors are getting cheaper than ever. For just $300.00 you can get a 22" Acer (brand) widescreen LCD monitor! Features include Ultra-fast 5ms response time, 1680x1050 resolution, RGB Analog/Digital input and optimal contrast ratio of 700:1 renders crisp images and enhances legibility.
It relies on nothing at all except the hardware and BIOS. Like I said it's all mode 13 for the graphics. Do you think there's a magical "render implicit surface" Win32 API call?
Thank God somebody did something about the TERRIBLE POKER PROBLEM in this country. All this terrorism/ending of civil liberties is really just a smokescreen that gets ratings.
But the word Christian has only ever been used to describe followers of the Pauline tradition, which is built (pretty irrevocably) on the divinity of Jesus... so yes, the one does pretty definitely imply the other. (Which also suggests that it is possible to be a follower of Jesus and yet not a Christian - as the early Gnostics would have enthusiastically affirmed.)
When you're looking at something this compact the original assembler source doesn't tell you much that the disassembly would not. :)
Maybe they could call it Phoenix?
To my knowledge, Microsoft has never utilised system memory correctly.  Proof of this lies in the fact that as far back as Windows 3x, Windows itself would run faster and more efficiently by configuring the computer to use the bulk of available memory as a RAMdrive, and assigning a 'permanent' Windows swapfile to it.
yeah the guy is a terrible shot
perhaps fewer children leading to fewer breast feeding may have effect also.  with every child chance of breast cancer decreases i believe.
So what does MMOS stand for?
There are many varieties of takes on Jesus' divinity, many espoused by those who would consider themselves Christian.  Also, Paul was the Apostle of the Gentiles, but not the only Christian Apostle who prosleytized, so saying that Christianity is restricted to the Pauline tradition (or that it has only ever been used of adherents of that tradition), influential as it was, is untrue.
Au contraire, I despise Clinton as a right-wing warmonger.
She's cleary just a little shy and he's trying to draw her out of her shell.  (Rimshot!)
Scientology rocks :p Ron must've been on crack when he wrote this. http://youtube.com/watch?v=68WBSM0-_HE
My programming language class recently had the following assignment (amongst other things): "Read Paul Graham's controversial paper titled The Hundred-Year Language. Post your thoughts on the paper to the "General Questions &amp; Answers" discussion forum. Here are some questions to think about... do you agree with his predictions? Do you have other predictions?"
ORLY?
I've watched this compilation sooooo many times and it keeps getting better.  Anyone know of the identity of the black guy with the afro and nuncucks (sp?)?
Did you see the cool bang? That was totally worth it. No science geek worth his salt would not get freakishly excited over that...
The headline really grabbed my attention when I came across, after I read it I noticed the date and thought it was quite facinating that this information came out less then a month after 9/11... Clearly Everybody missed this in the news, everybody was too busy hiding under their bed (like myself) It would be interesting to know whether or not these guys are still on the list as four of those 19?
If you’ve ever had occasion to visit a gym, you’ve no doubt heard people talking about “feeling the burn” and “pumping up.” But did you ever wonder what people were really saying? Here are some common terms and phrases that will help you to learn what is really going on in the gym.
I think it's funny that two of the five are based on the Macintosh's Monaco font (which I use, and is absolutely still available with a default install of OS X). ProFont is a slight improvement for programming tasks, but IMO not really worth installing if you already have Monaco.
Well I still suggest a good reference on Adams, if only because he is an interesting figure.  (It had nothing to do with you making assertions, but as you say you wanted clarity on the issue, and a good biography is better than a random reddit post.)  As to looking at source material, -- please, by all means, bypass the biography. &gt;perhaps next time you could suggest that someone at least read every textbook they can find, or go directly to the source material, or perhaps even embark on a lifelong course of historical study honing ever more finely onto the precise beliefs of the Founding Fathers. I see nothing wrong with this.  If you are interested in the  Founding Fathers, or in the development of the United States, I do indeed suggest as much! But to get to some sort of point, I suppose, ... John Adams was a Christian.  He was decidedly not a diest, so far as I can tell from his private and intimate correspondance.  But particularly with this subject, you must question the motives of people who will give you quotations or statements of fact -- which quotes or facts are they choosing not to mention?  So go to the source material; read it for yourself if you would like to make a better judgment.  But a lot of what has been posted on this page is one sided and narrow.  I didn't suggest you read a good biography to try to be condescending, but rather because you appeared interested in the subject, and the internet has a low signal to noise ratio on this subject.
Wow, that totally slipped my mind.  I remember [statix](http://www.jerware.org/fanclub/spotlite.html) talking about that kind of thing now.
Fun diversion, but I'm stuck on the prime number question.  Anybody have a hint for me?
&gt;The two hackers laughed off the comment. "It is a double-edged sword, but what we're doing is really for the greater good of the Internet, we're setting up communication networks for black hats," Wbeelsoi said. Jerks. Anyone responsible would report the flaws to Mozilla. And one of these losers works for Sixapart - not an association I'd be proud of if I were the company.
...and have huge power, economic clout, political power, and are completely unaccountable and despotic in structure.
If anyone likes this then they should check out scene.org for other demos from the demoscene.
with mayonnaise
I actually think this is a joke.  "the contents don't squirit in your face" "curved toward the mouth" "perfect shape for the human mouth" Or else he just committed the largest freudian slip ever.
Circular waterboarding! AAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAH
In which case they should nuke the Digg article too. Wikipedia needs to be consistent here - if they are going to allow one site in a market to have an article, there's no reasonable way to exclude articles on that site's competition.
Could you *please* email this font to me?  Just go to [**xMule.ws**](http://www.xmule.ws/) and click **Get support (*by email*)**.
This video is fairly inconsistent with it's treatment of agnostics.  Including them when it helps their statistics or to claim famous researchers as their own, then excluding them when it harms them.  Not that this is any suprise, just saying that it's pretty evident and it should be made clear that atheism is not synonymous with agnosticism.
No joke - this vid's been around for a while - it's part of a series featuring Kirk Cameron. http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/The_Way_of_the_Master Scary, though. Seems to comical to be real!
This list is 6 years old.  I'm sure its a bit different now (oil companies reporting billion dollar profits).
American and Canadian fighter planes were launched Thursday after Russian air force strategic bombers involved in a massive military exercise approached Alaska and the Aleutian Islands. Link to story [here](http://www.webcenter11.com/news/state/story.aspx?content_id=2c7506b2-07a2-4896-a4f1-11ff8bff1c6e&amp;rss=201).   
The last picture is particularly moving
I just read the article you linked to - that is indeed horrifying. It still doesn't make us right for doing it though. "But they're doing it too!" is not sufficient justification. Torture doesn't work for the purpose which we claim to be using it. And please stop conflating criticism of the American government with criticism of America the country. You know they are not the same thing, and it's a cheap smokescreen tactic on your part.
Mental Problems linked with Sugar.
I'll grant that Paul was not the only apostle who proselytised - but did the others call themselves Christians, or did they use another term to describe themselves? Certainly, Jesus himself never used the title Christos (or its Aramaic equivalents); he described himself consistently as the Son of Man. So the use of Christian as a term to apply to all of Jesus' early followers looks like a retroactive one - there's some suggestion that the Gnostics (a closer tradition to Jesus than the Pauline one) shunned the term. And then after Nicaea (and particularly after the reconciliation of the Celtic Church and the Catholic Church - and I'm not sure whether the Celtic Church ever described itself as Christianity) the meaning of the word was locked up tight until pretty much the modern day, with only a few people proposing otherwise. I know it's difficult to get a handle on the number of different groups which call themselves Christian from outside, especially given how prone they are to fighting amongst themselves and denouncing each other - the evangelicals denounce the Catholics, the Catholics denounce the Methodists, everyone rails against the JWs - but unless we adopt a standard of "a Christian is whoever describes themselves as a Christian" (which reduces the word to nothing more than an indicator of historical tradition) we have to select *some* definition of it - and the usual LCD definition is pretty much "Jesus died so our sins might be forgiven". It's hard to see how he could be empowered, or have the right, to do that without being blessed with at least some divinity, at least some special relationship with God. I think that is generally understood to be the bottom line. I'll agree that there are many takes on what form that divinity might have taken, but without it - or at least, without more of it than anyone else (mindful of the Quaker tradition that "there is that of God in all of us") - the only person for whose sins Jesus could have died is Jesus. And (for example) since Islam holds that Jesus was "the greatest of all the prophets", without the divinity distinction any Muslim would also be a Christian by default, until they explicitly denied it. So yes, it's pretty well a logical impossibility to hold that one can be a Christian without actually believing that there's something that much shinier than usual about the particular Anointed One in question. If he was just a clever bloke who was really onto something - well, you're off into personal revelation territory. Which I personally believe is the only territory worth exploring... but I do recognise that it's pretty silly to call myself a Christian when I don't even believe in a God. But I could quite happily call myself a Quaker, or a Unitarian. Because those traditions have also wandered off the map of Christianity in search of a deeper truth. Which raises the question - is Sufism Islam? Or is it something else, which just happens to have arisen from the Muslim tradition? 
I love how the guy says he is a conservative republican at the beginning ... as if it lends value to the judgement he has passed. A true conservative republican is _less_ likely to trust the government than a democrat. So, why the statement?
Wow! The oldest cultivated fruit in the world was designed by god? This whole time I thought it was bred by farmers to be handy. You know, like all the grains, fruit, vegitables, domestic animals...
&gt; 'blah' because writing something silly with torturously inappropriate tools isn't special or unusual, and doing so doesn't say anything that Alan Turing hasn't already said about the tools. You are dead on the inside
&gt; unnoticed until someone spotted it isn't that normally how it happens?
Ask the shareholders or former employees of Enron, WorldCom, Arthur Andersen, etc. if they think corporations are "completely unaccountable".
He even says: &gt; *[you would ask me:] "what are you doing? You're insulting my intellect."  And so I am!*
You know what else is curved towards the face to make the whole process easier?
Wow 5 year old article on a subject which has of course since been settled.  There was no coverup, these were cases of mistaken identity and were resolved.
I have no knowledge of whether the BBC story or the wiki followup is true. What I do know is that the investigation is essentially closed with a pre-ordained conclusion. That this loose end may have been tied up through the wiki/dateline info doesn't change that there are several loose ends, which a government intent on maintaining the pretenses of democracy and public service would allow an independent process with public visibility and responsiveness to investigate.
&gt;we would like to see what it was and how it was changed if we didn't hit up this link right when it was posted. That is what the [history-tab](http://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Talk:Reddit&amp;action=history) is for.
Plotted the data in chart: http://www.editgrid.com/sheetobject/image/30479.png
I'm with you in priciple. However, bitmapped fonts offer one thing that outline fonts dont: simplicity of implementation. You can pretty much produce a bitmapped font at a normal size and then scale it. Then tweak the stuff that got messed up. Time consuming but simple. It's akin to a cut-and-paste approach. Outline fonts are definitely more sophisticated since they benefit from hinting of glyphs. They are pretty much guaranteed to work at all readable resolutions IFF the designer took the time to hint properly. The problem is that hinting is a complex and iterative process. You need to be a mix of graphic artist and computer programmer. Something that isn't commonly found. Anyway, I was looking at Microsoft's Visual TrueType software. It's an attempt to make the hinting process less of a programming task. However, even hinting things visually/graphically still means that you need a strong understanding of type and how scaling can affect readability and character relationships. A lot of intersting reading here:  http://www.microsoft.com/typography/tools/vttusers.htm 
A movie from the creator of Beavis and Butthead, that had a huge success on his first film? No.  This is censorship, at his best.
Vote for the non-linkjacked story here: http://reddit.com/info/kg82/comments
Pretty cool.  A little on the pricey side, but stylish and functional.
I actually used Verdana for quite a while and loved it until I started working on ctc files for a Visual Studio extension.  I needed to use a monospace font because alignment was about the only way to find what you were looking for in these files and of course each developer had his own font preference.  I ended up switching to Proggy Clean (slightly different than the square version in the article) and find it a very nice replacement.
yay for big corporations ripping off american taxpayers.  i mean, that is going to cost bush a couple of days in iraq.
Heh.  Thanks for the condescending assholishness.  Yes, I understand the mechanics of how this all works (to some degree).  I understand that things (both "normal" binding partners and not) bump into each other all the time, and will stay connected depending on their binding affinity for each other (and that this is stochastic).  I also understand that as a teaching tool for a cell biology class, the video's simplifications in that sense are clearly acceptable.  Showing the real chaos at that level would do more harm than good for students in an introductory class.
I wonder, how is it usually determined in such surveys what's the cause and what's the effect?   For example, in this particular case, the survey shows some positive correlation between fizzy drink intake and mental problems. Somehow, this correlation is interpreted as fizzy drinks causing mental problems. It also can be the other way around - some mental conditions can lead to desire to drink more sugary drinks.
I would almost consider this article a prank, if not for the source. While the article does not clearly define the makeup of this "soft tissue," I still find it remarkable this exists after 70 million years. I've worked in the academic archaeology publishing field for years, and this is the first time I've heard of organic preservation over such a long time span. It's one thing to uncover a frozen or mummified mammoth buried in tundra since the Pleistocene, but 70 million years? I'm amazed to read that blood vessels are preserved; how was decomposition prevented over such a time span? This discovery presents numerous questions that will hopefully be explained by careful analysis. It shouldn't be too hard for paleontologists to x-ray their bone collections for other cases of "soft tissue".
...because mozilla is backed by a corporation that believes in trademarks and shit
Have to agree with you here. The Solaris environment is not what I'd go citing for useful defaults. The env version also allows you to make the script work without having to edit anything.
"rediculous"? and he's a reporter??
Why does God hate most of the population then if he only put bananas in one small section of the world?  Whatever did those poor peole who had never seen a banana do to survive without them?  Think of the children!
Probably because conservativism has been hijacked by the Kool-Aid drinkers
This article had a lot of great ideas and theories! I think, come Monday, I'll be trying out a few of these techniques!!
Why would anyone report on this?  I love America's backwards racism :)
you have a point
At least reddit's API isn't screwed like digg's. I've spent all morning trying to fix digg's diggbutton widget. Reddit's button will include a submit link within it, if the story hasn't been submitted yet, digg's just throws up this godawful  red error message in it's tiny little iframe. And, from within javascript, there is no way to check if the page has been submitted yet (even XHR barfs because it's a non-local site)... so you can't switch between the digg button and a submit link. Lame.
this article is further evidence that No One Knows Anything. Science is a bunch of tests that guesses are then based on. It's interesting, but about as reliable as any human you'll ever meet.
One of the Howard families
Just use a mac and you won't have to worry about it.
honestly, data from over 6 years ago is just too old to use the word "now" in the headline. i heard this 6 years ago, and clicked on the link wondering how the numbers could still be the same. the numbers must be different by now. in fact, i don't think gm is at the top of the corporate list any more. i think wal-mart may have surpassed them.
I was reading through these comments wondering if someone was going to say the obvious. I haven't noticed mine disappearing either.
Actually, it turn out he's correct.  Bananas came about because of intelligent design...by humans.  The bananas we eat today have been cross-bread over and over in order to make them the right size, the right flavor, pretty much everything he lists. The scary part is that this type of willing ignorance is promoted within many churches.
内容とは何も関係ありませんが、ブログタイトルが長いですよね。出所を明らかにするという意味でよい面もあると思いますが、リンク名はリンク先が読む価値があるかどうかを判断するのに使われるものだと思われるので、ブログタイトルのみがこのように長い場合は削除した方が良いのではないでしょうか。 あくまで問題提起です。
That's Wikipedia to you. Just see the discussions after lilo's death.
AI and Survival ;-)
Teaching others about how these elements react is just as valid a use for these elements as any other. Almost all of my high school chemistry teachers threw some quantity of alkali metal into some container of H20. It has never failed to impress the crowd.
no, just too small. $44B in gross product|revenue is a lot of money  
Wow.  How old is that? Five thousand years or so?
None of these examples are conspiracies.  The first is still debated, the second was a piece of propaganda that fooled no one, the third was a military action, the first Tonkin incident was real and the second was an accidental mistake, and the Maine probably just blew up. Read [this speech](http://news.bbc.co.uk/1/hi/world/monitoring/media_reports/1636782.stm) of Bin Laden's and see if you agree with it all.  I find the claim about East Timor especially pungent.
Heh heh heh - them ladies are showin' their boobies!
I would like a brief history of democrat pedophilia as well, please.
Nobody means well for his enemies, dude. What I mean is that they have a vision of a world they consider morally preferable to the present, and they intend their actions to produce it.
How would you react if a Nazi were appointed as a professor at Columbia? What about a member of the KKK?  A known hater of gays?  Et cetera. Glass houses, dude.
A good interivew and some exclusive pitures.
[How it was at posting time](http://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Talk:Reddit&amp;oldid=74154491)
It seems a rather deceptive use of numbers. The first 5 in the list (all countries) sum to more than the next 95. The top 22 are all countries and sum to four times the remaining 78. The sum of the 49 country's GDP is over 7x the sum of the 51 company's revenues. 
Pretty darn good, I'd say.  Would you be willing to give up your right to free speech, to protest Tariq Ramadan's exclusion?  I find this idea that the good is the enemy of the perfect pretty interesting. Try answering my question about discrimination above...
Cloning dinosaurs would be so awesome I can hardly believe it. I hope we get there someday. Has there been any thorough analysis on the fossils we have and whether any of the DNA is intact? In quasi-scientific articles like this one you never get an unbiased scientific opinion on the somewhat deeper issues like this one...
What makes you think anyone would ever want to read this shit?
Agree completely with ohmohm. These kind of speculative conclusions to surveys annoy me immensely. It only makes for more "interesting" headlines.
Google Universe anyone?
I am pretty sure that a carrot will also perfectly insert into is rectum.  I presume that he also think that God created carrots for that matter.
It should be noted that creationism and the notion of intelligent design is not the same. It's not possible to tell from this video whether the guy is fronting creationism (i.e. "young earth").
I modded you up, but I think you mistook my response to his question. I interpreted the question as 'why are US troops escorting halliburton convoys' as 'why arent the US troops escorting US gov (army, navy, DOD, etc.) convoys'. I know my response was snarky but my sentiment remains the same -- that the government has gotten out of the business of being self-sufficient and self-reliant and gotten into the business of making vital services a contract in Washignton.
That's hardly a fair review of science. In addition to making guesses (or predictions, as we like to call them), science allows us to do a lot of practical things that prove the soundness of the theory. Like making airplanes. And computers. And antibiotics. Oh, and it allows us to do brain surgery, without which you would be unable to write this kind of deep commentary on reddit.
Anyone even remotely convinced by this should *immediately* check out: **[The Banana: The Christian's Nightmare](http://www.atheisteye.com/thegodlessbastard.htm)**
Well, no offense, but do you really think that each site like reddit needs some place in encyclopedia?
This is old, but a classic.
You know, I don't think I've ever heard a turle make a sound before.
&gt;The gains among blacks in Queens, the city’s quintessential middle-class borough, were driven largely by the growth of two-parent families and *the successes of immigrants from the West Indies.* Nothing to see here, move along.
&gt;Any person subject to this chapter who, in breach of an allegiance or duty to the United States, **knowingly and intentionally aids an enemy of the United States**.... It's not enough merely to not have allegiance. You're probably right that in the worst case, legislation such as this could be used to round up dissidents; but my original statement stands. And in any case, what should be worrisome about this legislation is not that "allegiance" or whatever is involved, but that it codifies the denial of *habeas corpus*  and trial by jury to US citizens.   
I'm gonna ship your terrst ass to Gitmo for revealing state secrets
On German wikipedia the reddit article was deleted after a vote due to 'lack of relevance'. See [here](http://de.wikipedia.org/wiki/Wikipedia:Löschkandidaten/22._Juli_2006#Reddit_.28gel.C3.B6scht.29)
What's the point of stealing/ reposting an entire article? Here's the original:  http://www.roughtype.com/archives/2006/04/is_web_20_enter.php If you like it so much, you might as well point to it.  This way you're link-jacking.
And VS2005 will have stability issues! I'm far from your typical Microsoft bashing 17 year old (I consider myself quite level headed on the subject). HOWEVER, this is RIDICULOUS and OBSCENE.  I'm trying to think of better ways to piss off your core constituency (developers for your platform), and I'm at a loss.
I am actually really ambivalent about purchasing any computer equipment at all these days...with all this price dropping on LCDs, multi-core systems and HDR stuff going around, I can't help but feel that I would be wasting my money if I went out and purchased a new system right now. Now for the tricky part: is this something that every geek has been feeling since the dawn of computers? I haven't been thinking about it this way before, but this is the first time I manage my own money (having grown up and all that)
Adams was explaining that the awesome mystery and majesty of the divine can't be comprehended, one must have faith.  Like most Christians in history he saw a distinction between the secular and spiritual.  Here are some John Adams quotes without words added: We have no government armed with power capable of contending with human passions unbridled by morality and religion. Avarice, ambition, revenge or gallantry would break the strongest cords of our Constitution as a whale goes through a net. Our Constitution is designed only for a moral and religious people. It is wholly inadequate for any other.  I always consider the settlement of America with reverence and wonder, as the opening of a grand scene and design in providence, for the illumination of the ignorant and the emancipation of the slavish part of mankind all over the earth.  The Hebrews have done more to civilize men than any other nation. If I were an atheist, and believed blind eternal fate, I should still believe that fate had ordained the Jews to be the most essential instrument for civilizing the nations.  Inequality of Mind and Body are so established by God Almighty in his Constitution of Human Nature that no art or policy can ever plane them down to a level.  It must be felt that there is no national security but in the   nation's humble acknowledged dependence upon God and His overruling providence.  The highest glory of the American Revolution was this: 'It connected in one indissoluble bond the principles of civil government with the principles of Christianity.  The general principles on which the fathers achieved independence were.... the general principles of Christianity.  in letter to Thomas Jefferson, June 28, 1813 The Christian religion is, above all the Religions that ever prevailed or existed in ancient or modern times, the religion of Wisdom, Virtue, Equity, and Humanity. Let the Blackguard Paine say what he will; it is Resignation to God, it is Goodness itself to man. retorting to Thomas Paine in his diary, July 26, 1796   
No it wouldn't be awesome you sick fuck.
Eh?  Bananas in the wild are shaped differently?  I know selective breeding has made wheat hella interesting, but bananas?
*"The Constitution, by contrast, provides the courts with relatively few tools to superintend military and foreign policy decisions, especially during wartime," the attorney general told a conference on the judiciary at Georgetown University Law Center.* If these guys want the powers and privileges afforded to the government "during wartime", then they can go to Congress and request a formal declaration of war. Otherwise, they're bound by the same rules that every president since Truman has been. *"Judges must resist the temptation to supplement those tools based on their own personal views about the wisdom of the policies under review," Gonzales said.* Sorry, Al, but that's what judges do. *That's their fucking job*. If you don't like it, come right out and ask for what you jackals really want: the abolition of the Judicial Branch of government. *And he said the independence of federal judges, who are appointed for life, "has never meant, and should never mean, that judges or their decisions should be immune" from public criticism.* And they're not. They are, however, immune from the political process -- exactly as intended. It's one of those annoying little "checks and balances" that keep getting in your way.
I wouldn't be surprised if it would be oversimplification of what they said by Yahoo or Reuters. Anyway, described symptoms could actually suggest that sugar has a positive effect on those mental problems - notice how moderate drinkers have less of them than "no drinkers". It might be also the reason why kids with bigger problems want more sugar. But remember: "could" &amp; "might"
Lame study.  Here's a counter-hypothesis; kids of parents who allow them to drink a lot of soft drinks and don't get proper nutrition are different than kids raised by parents that make sure they eat balanced meals. 
yup ! the best programming font ever...
Interesting
Might as well just say America, because blacks in America earn more than whites living in countries like Russia and Azerbaijan and Croatia etc.. Blacks in America also earn more than blacks in Africa.
I'm sure Microsoft had greater *profits* than some of the corporations on the list.
It took us several years to build a decorative pond, which almost became a never-ending construction project. Now we would pull it off much faster. We already know what needs to be done and to be bought, all possible mishaps are taken into account and the step-by-step sequence of work is determined.
Just quit smoking &amp; coffee, and add some pineapple to your diet, and your S.O. will notice an improvement.
Wal-Mart is hardly an example of free-market capitalism; it receives heavy subsidies in the form of welfare for its employees. 
This could just as well prove that humans evolved from banana-eating primates and that the monkeys who were best at eating bananas had the best chances of survival.
Here's an example of a conspiracy then, the downing of TWA 800 off the coast of Long Island en route to Paris. It was downed by a missile, the US Navy was conducting exercises nearby and literally hundreds of witnesses saw a "flare like" object coming from the surface of the water to intersect with the plane which then exploded. The official explanation was a spark in a fuel tank.  Read "Into the Buzzsaw", which is an excellent compilation of stories about journalism that has been censored in some way. Conspiracies *do* exist and to deny that is to hide your head in the sand.
No, it exists. And it's called planet earth. What god could dream up a hell even half as sinister as this place? Humanity, the son, has certainly outdid the father this time.
very applicable to contract programmers also
The fatwas are dense and so full of Islamic history that I found it quite difficult reading. I completely missed that phrase.
no Consolas, no care
&gt; - Be actively curious about how interesting things work ("how can cl-ppcre be faster than Perl?")  cl-ppcre is masterpiece of Common Lisp coding. Reqular expressions in Perl are written in C for speed. Yet you can write Perl (version?) compatible rexex package in Common Lisp that is faster. How it was again? Dynamically typed languages are slow??
yes it has been like this always
Recently while researching some weight loss stories I came across this list of the top ten reasons diets don’t work. While I don’t necessarily agree with all of these reasons I did want to recite them and give some possible ways to overcome each. Perhaps if one of these 10 reasons is a weakness for you; you can find some ways to overcome it here.
Noam Chomsky was for a long time, and possibly still is, a vocal support of Pol Pot. Look it up. Do you even know who Pol Pot was, and what he did? He certainly doesn't have the *largest* bodycount as some of the world's biggest monsters, but he managed an impressive number all the same, seeing as how he didn't have a nation as large as the USSR or China in which to do it. And that's just the one I recognized. Atheism alone doesn't make you a good person, just non-stupid on one intellectual point that most adults shouldn't care to argue.
A term limit on that power *is* a check on power.  Using the term "proconsul" instead of "dictator" while granting enough military force and money to subjugate the entire world, however, is not.
If you are an absolute beginner or a novice in programming this site was made for you. In this Python tutorial you will learn how to program a computer the quick way. No long explanations. It will just show you how to do it and you will do it yourself. From the very beginning step by step.
That's good! Scientology is a business: any "religion" that has its "sacred works" under copyright that you have to pay hundreds of thousands of dollars to read is a business, plain and simple. Furthermore, deciding what can be defined as a religion is absolutely in the state interest. Crackpot religions can definitely harm people. In the case of Scientology, members aren't allowed to see psychiatrists or take any drugs. Scientologists could easily prey on those with psychological issues and brainwash them into thinking they shouldn't receive therapy or the necessary medication. This could be seriously harmful for people, and as such, I think the German state considers it its duty to protect the more vulnerable people in German society from being preyed upon by Scientology.  I say bravo to Germany for doing this. In the US, Scientology didn't get tax-exempt status until they used bullying, scare tactics and a huge army of lawyers to force the IRS to allow them that status. I'm glad that Germany isn't so weak to such scare tactics. I suppose they've dealt with enough Nazis in the past - they know how to handle them.
How quaint.
In other news: *Of the world's 20 largest economic entities, all of them are countries.*
An easy to follow tutorial on the web programming techniques. Designed specifically for the absolute beginner. Although using PHP, the most popular web programming language, it is not a PHP tutorial but a Web concepts tutorial, saving the beginner from common and frustrating errors that happen when the learning focus is on the language.
seems to me they can all be condensed to one point 1) don't do shit for free
Unfotunately, gridlock in Washington is preferable to unopposed power in either party. But having said that, the people that have been in power unopposed for the last 6 years simply have to be stopped. If only to send a message to the world that the people of the US aren't 'OK' with any of this.
VC++ 2005 is so ridiculously buggy that it still has fundamental code generation issues that require us to use #pragma nooptimize for a multitude of functions in our code-base to prevent breakage. We've elevated this with the compiler team but everything at Microsoft seems to move at a glacial pace. VC++ 2005 has some nice IDE-related enhancements (although nothing that Visual Assist hasn't provided for years) but the compiler is so buggy that it's absolutely shameful that it was released in this state. Their abandonware-like attitude towards their C++ compiler in favor of their C# and VB compilers is not earning them any favors. Yet another reason we won't be moving to Vista (as if we needed any more).
This sounds like bullshit.  Soft tissue preserved for 70 million years beggars belief.
Indeed, but the smart ass smile of people who talk about creationism or intelligent design is the same.
hot
&gt; But since when were they supposed to treat captured American soldiers humanely? To not do so would be a war crime according to the Geneva Conventions.  The treatment of their own civilians, unless it's on a genocidal scale, is not a war crime, and is a legally different matter. 
How does the AG get to lecture judges?
I imagine that it's criminalized because legislators believe it to be harmful to people's health. And if legislators believe it to be seriously harmful to people's health, it would be immoral &lt;i&gt;not&lt;/i&gt; to criminalize it. And yes, cigarette companies have a powerful lobby.
"Oslo teens who drank the most sugary soft drinks also had more mental health problems such as __hyperactivity__ and distress" No frekin way...
I think this might help things. http://features.reddit.com/goto?id=jtwj
I'm going to go out on a limb here and say that an ungodly amount of steriods went into those quads.
How does this get to first page?
&gt;“That’s all the bullets we had, or we would have shot him more,” Polk County Sheriff Grady Judd told the Orlando Sentinel newspaper.
Amazed he didn't blame it on Clinton's penis.
No wonder we still use oil to drive our cars.
Haha, oh come on now... it's space.  What're you meant to say?  "Look!  Stars!"
Judge Jones in the Dover trial, when presented with evidence from both sides ruled that Intelligent Design is Creationism in disguise. It's the same bullshit just trying to make itself more palatable to those who are not fundamentalists.
Fair enough. Let's use common sense. I still have a hard time believing that "soft tissue" like this could survive 70 million years. Of course, I also have a hard time believing soft tissue could survive for 10,000 years. In any case, it must have been preservered pretty well. You bring up an interesting point.  &gt; You only live for 70 years, not 70 million. You have no common sense about what can or cannot happen in 70 million years. It is quite true that we cannot fathom what can or can't happen in 70 million years. Likewise, you cannot *really* fathom what can happen in 10,000 years. Now, I refuse to make judgement whether the Earth is really 10,000 years of 400 million years old, but I honestly wonder how we can know for a fact that these fossils are 70 million years old. Carbon dating and any other dating methods are held as absolute truth, when who really knows if carbon dating is anywhere near accurate, particularly over such vast expanses of time. We were not there. And our own meager 70 years of existence is a mere speck in such a timeframe.  And so, once again, I hold that we cannot and will never be able to know for certain how old the Earth is. And yet, does it really matter? I can maintain my faith in my religion, whether the earth is young or old.
I don't think we would think of eating bananas as readily if they were the wild variety.
Umm, no, this article is about the only place where blacks and whites life together and blacks earn more than whites.  There are very little or little blacks in Russia etc...
I'm sure the Coptic and Syriac churches refer to themselves as Christians.  Certainly the Celtic Church did, and indeed, it was a branch of the Catholic Church before the monastic reformation of the Roman Church.  Most of the important monasteries of Western Europe were founded by Irish monks, and *those* certainly thought of themselves as Christians.  The Benedictine reforms changed the form of monasticism and implemented a degree of central control that was alien to the spirit of Celtic monasticism. 'Christ' simply means the anointed one, as Jesus was supposed the son of god and anointed king of the Jews.  It's from the Jewish tradition of the Messiah, which is nothing to do with Paul, *per se*. &gt; "Jesus died so our sins might be forgiven". It's hard to see how he could be   &gt; empowered, or have the right, to do that without being blessed with at   &gt; least some divinity, at least some special relationship with God. First, that's a huge leap, and second, there's a mite of difference between being divine, and having a special relationship with god.  Additionally (and this is the crux of all of the medieval controversies about the nature of Jesus), can one possess 'some divinity'?  You've skirted over hundreds of pages of theology (and many burnt corpses) in this sentence. &gt; it's pretty well a logical impossibility to hold that one can be a Christian   &gt; without actually believing that there's something that much shinier than   &gt; usual about the particular Anointed One in question What has logic to do with it, really?  There's a (perhaps illogical) notion that Christ was sublimating the notion of religious sacrifice by sacrificing himself -- that sin (or transgression) was traditionally expiated through sacrifice to god(s), but that Jesus had made this unnecessary by engaging in the ultimate act of sacrifice.  A discourse with paganism (and Mosaic Judaism) that requires no divinity, just a significant act.  'The Ruin of Kasch' deals with this in a fascinating way. &gt; Which raises the question - is Sufism Islam? Or is it something else, which   &gt; just happens to have arisen from the Muslim tradition? That question depends entirely on how you define its terms.  Therefore it cannot be *definitively* answered, as posed.
Microsoft makes profit around $9 billion a year (sorry no link)
Curious examples to pick -- I assume they would think not. However, you're correct that corporations are accountable to their shareholders, so I was wrong about 'completely'.  Despite that, I think that corporations are unaccountable to the people that work for them, or suffer as a result of their loyalty to their shareholders, who are usually other corporations, anyway.
no ones onlien because its sunday so anything thats moving gets placed the the front page.
I copied the following from the Library of Congress website from the bill under discussion:   H.R.6166  Military Commissions Act of 2006 (Engrossed as Agreed to or Passed by House)  Sec. 950j. Finality or proceedings, findings, and sentences `(a) Finality- The appellate review of records of trial provided by this chapter, and the proceedings, findings, and sentences of military commissions as approved, reviewed, or affirmed as required by this chapter, are final and conclusive. Orders publishing the proceedings of military commissions under this chapter are binding upon all departments, courts, agencies, and officers of the United States, except as otherwise provided by the President. `(b) Provisions of Chapter Sole Basis for Review of Military Commission Procedures and Actions- Except as otherwise provided in this chapter and notwithstanding any other provision of law (including section 2241 of title 28 or any other habeas corpus provision), no court, justice, or judge shall have jurisdiction to hear or consider any claim or cause of action whatsoever, including any action pending on or filed after the date of the enactment of the Military Commissions Act of 2006, relating to the prosecution, trial, or judgment of a military commission under this chapter, including challenges to the lawfulness of procedures of military commissions under this chapter. END QUOTE There are two bills with the same name at the Libary of Congress website, make sure you are looking at the one that passed.  (I hope I chose the right one!)   
http://www.publishersweekly.com/article/CA6346866.html?pubdate=6%2F26%2F2006&amp;display=archive Publishers Weekly has some info on this $100,000 machine that can print a book on demand in different languages.
$9 billion in profits from $22 billion in revenues... in that case, their profits probably exceeded most of the corporations on that list in 2000.
Because I don't appreciate an *excel hack*?  Say it ain't so!
"Carbon dating and any other dating methods are held as absolute truth, when who really knows if carbon dating is anywhere near accurate, particularly over such vast expanses of time. We were not there. And our own meager 70 years of existence is a mere speck in such a timeframe." Carbon dating is not held as an "absolute truth."  Rather, it is one means of attempting to ascertain the age of something. Science works by gathering information from multiple sources and then integrating those sources and attempting to construct theories that provide causal explanations for the data.  A theory is not an "absolute truth," but it's also not arbitrary.  It is a best-fit, and is subject to change *in the event that new data is discovered* or *a better theory is put forward*. We have many data points on our fossils: geological strata, evolutionary history, correlation with other fossils, and radiometric dating.  We think the radiometric data is right because it correlates with the results from the other methods fairly closely.  If everything else said about 70 millions years and the radiometric dating said 10 thousand years, the radiometric dating would be suspect.  Likewise, if everything else said 10 thousand years but the radiometric dating said 70 million, it would also be suspect. As far as the other data points go, such as geology, they are subject to their own matrices of interlocking theories.  Science as a whole is one project-- one interlocking mesh of theories.  These theories interact constructively with one another.  Huge theoretical upheavals do sometimes happen, but small refinements are muce more frequent. P.S.  Read my other post in reply to this article.  The "soft tissue" thing may very well be hype to some extent. Here's an excerpt: "As is nearly always the case, the juicy bits are in the background. The great advantage that science journals have today is the ability to put all supplemental details on-line. In this case, the three page “main” article sports a supporting text over four times as long. For example, the main article has left many people with the false impression that the recovered tissues were in a soft pliable state when first exposed. This is not true. All of the fossil material was rehydrated during the same process that removed the mineral components of the bone. They were then buffered, and also some were fixed. The related press reports have created the impression that there are large features with the characteristics of fresh tissue. This is not true. The structures examined are a few millimeters across at most. The last, and rather irritating aspect of this research is not from the Science article, or the supporting material, but from the press interviews given by Schweitzer which repeatedly hint at the recovery of DNA, and even of cloning." 
Outstanding!  Hopefully they'll crack some heads wide open.  Scientology are evil. 
Actually it only denies habeas corpus to non-citizens. Heh, "only"... sigh.
"As a demolition hobbyist" -- well, what the fuck is that?
what do i do 
"are final and conclusive. Orders publishing the proceedings of military commissions under this chapter are binding upon all departments, courts, agencies, and officers of the United States, except as otherwise provided by the President." Well, to me it looks like appeals to the Supreme Court are NOT allowed, but I could be wrong as well.  I would really like to hear some well-respected, independent opinion on all this.  Just this past Thursday a law is pass which legalizes torture.  Then on Friday a law is passed which pre-pardons Bush for breaking International Law (geneva convention).   I'm halfway expecting a law to be passed on Tuesday making Bush dictator-for-life.   *edit*  forgot congress is now lame, and can't do any more foolishness, right? 
Gonzales said, "If Americans come to believe that judges are simply politicians, or their decisions can be purchased for a price, state judicial systems will be undermined."  ---   
By a royal decree of the President of the United States of America.
The guy didn't even bother to taste all of the drinks!  So he's judging them by the concept/packaging?!
http://www.911mysteries.com
They are, because it's been reported that this BBC article was mistaken.
The Windows caching and swapping algorithms are a nightmare. I don't know why they're not paying attention already.
I work on a pretty large VC++ 2005 project too, and I can't say I've seen any code generation issues. There were definitely some differences from 2003 but they all fell under the category of "things I should not have been getting away with in the first place." There are, though, a ton of bugs related to intellisense and corrupt .ncb databases which result in IDE crashes. I tend to think the VB.NET compiler/IDE is the buggiest of the three and I use all three at work. I do definitely hear you about the compiler teams working at a glacial pace. We've had multiple premier support cases open for IDE problems and it takes months to get anything out of them.   
The original news story on the New York Post is gone.  However, the pics are linked to from the above page, [here](http://wizbangblog.com/2005/01/25/more-than-meets-the-eye.php).
Nonsensical -- should all scientists be blamed for Nagasaki?  Should all socialists bear the responsibility for the gulag? Should all Americans be held responsible for the sanctions against Iraq that (by his own account) prompted Osama to attack the US? If so, wasn't 9/11 just? Thought not.
Now, if only the Los Angeles police would start targeting them, we might make a dent.
The road to hell is paved with good intentions.
it should be noted that a number of judges also said that George Bush was president - judicial verdicts don't necessarily *settle* anything. **\*** ...and that signifies the death of reddit, so far as I'm concerned. It seems that this atheist here has fallen foul of the anti-Christian lobby after all, simply for pointing out that "a judge says so" is not a particularly good argument. Which it isn't, and in a field that is not exactly short of excellent arguments it's a bit sad that someone would appeal to misplaced authority. Let alone get modded to 19 points with it. Never mind. I'll be careful to shake the dust from my feet on the way out. At least now I know why all the names I remember from the first days of reddit comments no longer appear. Ten months from priceless to worthless - I knew life was speeding up, but is that a record...?
The US Constitution does not reserve *habeas corpus* only to US citizens. 'Ol Georgie is rewriting the Constitution, and he is scaring the shiat outta me more than ever.
That's redundant
that's zi you and it means freedom. It was intended as a sarcastic jab at the current situation in the US.  I figured it would be more fun to let people go to babel.altavista.com Has anyone noticed the all-chinese youtube video on the front page? It's not just an english internet anymore
It tells me type in a "Hello, world" document and save it as hello_word.html (note the missing L). Nit-picking about typoes is usually beneath me, but in the case of programming tutorials, it's pretty crucial. (A friend of mine once tried to learn C from a book that had accidentally omitted all the terminating semicolons. From *every line* of *every example*. It took him ages to figure out why none of his early programs would compile.) 
...not around here.  Defending atheism around here is about as courageous as defending Christianity in the Bible Belt.
Setting goals and eating healthier is a great way to feel better, look better, lose weight, have more energy, and be in a better mood. Here are 10 tips to healthy eating to help get you started on the right track.
in a functioning democracy...
God, I love that movie
http://atrieecs.seo.iitm.ac.in/
&gt; didn't chomsky support Pol Pot at one point? No.
There is room, why not? Not this immature garbage though.
The Labor Theory of Value has been obsolete for centuries.
&gt; Noam Chomsky was for a long time, and possibly still is, a vocal support of   &gt; Pol Pot. Look it up. You look it up, fool -- Chomsky supported Faurisson's right to publish, as a matter of principle. He never supported Pol Pot.
I'm not talking about the Intelligent Design movement, which the guy neither mentioned. I'm talking about the notion that the universe is intelligently designed. Which is also what the guy was talking about. It's not possible to tell from the video whether he represented the I.D. movement. Unfortunately though, Intelligent Design has hijacked the concept "intelligent design".
Is that the same smile as the smile of people who make smart ass comments?
Purified elements nevertheless remain difficult to obtain, and expensive - and waste is abhorrent, no matter how one may encounter it.
Looks/Taste like BBQ Chicken Nugget. Now at least we know where McD get their chicken nuggets from :)
Not sure where to start with this.  (1) Correct, I believe that Bush is a disgrace and the harbinger of a national -- in fact, a global -- tragedy.  (2) Correct, I really do believe that making a demonstrably false generalization falsifies the generalization.  I'm not sure what about that is debatable. (3) Finally, your analysis of modding behavior relative to your views is tautological: An upvote indicates to you agreement, and thus confirmation; a downvote indicates to you behavior that you imagine to be consistent with your stereotype, and thus confirmation.
It's notable because it's contrary to the way things are elsewhere. So it's of interest what makes Queens different.
It's not waste; it's use. Now, many more of us know how those elements react with water: He's like an alchemist, who turns raw elements into knowledge. And anyway, if he's artificially overspending on them, people will have an economic incentive to invest *more* in extracting them. So in the long term, if you want more use of purified elements, you should probably support short-term experimental use.
Ulcers are such a pain in the gut! Not only do they cause alot of pain and discomfort, they have the audacity to dictate what foods you can eat. What gaul! I have been suffering with ulcers for a number of years now. My life has been a bland, tasteless hell. Fianlly I decided to do something about. Went to the Internet and done some searching. Came across a great site that really shed new light on my condition. Some much knowledge. Not only do I know how to eat properly for my condition, but I can actually go through my day pain free.
Did anybody else think "sports" when they read this title? Seriously, though, this is great.
So, according to the study, those who are unable to exhibit moderate behavior (i.e., those who drink too few or too many soft-drinks) are the most likely to have mental problems?  Color me surprised!
It *is* interesting however, that such a group of people as Powell, Tenet, and the others who worked on Powell's speech, were so intent on fitting the data to the conclusion that they never actually questioned why it was so difficult to do so, that perhaps the conclusion itself was wrong.  I wonder if at least some of them must have, but just didn't voice their concern out of intimidation or something.  Coming from a technical background where all conclusions are at the mercy of data, it's hard to understand, but apparently this is the way the mind of a politician works.
Ahh, I did mistake what you were saying.
Science is not limited to "common sense".  If it were, we would have no understanding of either quantum mechanics or relativity.
Well even that is not an issue because as I said earlier, Sulla was granted dictatorship without a time limit in 82 B.C   That demonstrates that the authors claim that immense power was granted to one individual without checks and balances for the first time in response to anti piracy sentiments is false. Thus his false analogy breaks down.
Reddit deserves an article, but some of those comments make me want it deleted out of spite. * Tens of thousands of unique visitors? Maybe, but just how good is "the best of your knowledge"?  * Who would attempt to hide reddit's existence by trying to get the Wikipedia entry deleted?  * Does Jimmy Wales want an article on your nose-hair?  * Quality does not imply notability. Digg and Slashdot are bigger, better-known, hence more notable. (It isn't that simple, but good enough.)
If someone could host an update server with Windows and Mac versions containing the non-mozcorp-branded versions it will be perfect.  Because to be free from the mozilla corp a build of the browser without the branding is enough but we loose the updates at the same time...
Compare with what happened to Bobby Fischer. http://www.ishipress.com/freeatlast.htm
Here's Carl Monday's original piece  http://www.break.com/index/libraryjerk.html It's facsinating just how far Monday goes to humiliate his target, whom obviously did a Bad Thing, but really doesn't deserve this sort of extreme treatment. I mean, what does Monday think he's trying to gain by going after this one guy, whose life obviously sucks to begin with?
Red Scare, here we go again! You're on the list of Communists.
and how does your comment make sense in relation with the article?
70 Brazilians
All the muslims should e banned anyway. so a good decision by the govt.
i think this video has been posted like 75 times already.
In any case, this isn't surprising, given the history of Scientology in Germany.
My comment is about making your code look beautiful, bloody obviously.  Do you have any sincere questions?
this is why we need more pornography in our homes. had that young man been exposed to porn at an earlier age, whatever he was looking at would have been boring and unstimulating. how many more Carl Mondays will there be before America wakes up and learns the lessons of whenever that guy pulled his dong out in the library?
AND!!! if held so that its curve is pointed upward after insertion, it hits the G-Spot perfectly!
-And he said the independence of federal judges, who are appointed for life, "has never meant, and should never mean, that judges or their decisions should be immune" from public criticism.- Sounds like a fairly benign observation. But remember the last context in which any one thought to make any "public criticism" of the judiciary.  That person was former Speaker of the House Tom Delay, remarking on the decision in the Terry Shiavo case. Recall Terry Shiavo was the woman whose husband petitioned the court to take her off of the life support system which had kept her technically alive, but brain dead, for 15 years.   The court ruled that since there was no evidence Ms Schiavo would have desired otherwise, and since her husband was her closest living next of kin, his motion should be granted. The Speaker remarked that "there were a lot of questions to be answered." and that  "the time will come for the men responsible for this to answer for their behavior." He later said in front of television cameras that he wants to "look at an arrogant, out-of-control, unaccountable judiciary that thumbed their nose at Congress and the president." The Democratic leadership reminded the congressman that "Threats against specific federal judges are not only a serious crime, but also beneath a Member of Congress," Lautenberg wrote. "Your attempt to intimidate judges in America not only threatens our courts, but our fundamental democracy as well." This all occurred in atmosphere in which a federal judge had been shot in Atlanta a few months before, and the spouse of  a federal judge had been slain not long before in Detroit. I guess I'm still sensitive about losing my constitutional rights not to be detained without being charged, to have a speedy trial, and to challenge my detention in court last Friday, but it almost sounds to me like the Attorney General  was making a veiled threat to the federal judiciary. I guess they need to remember just like everybody else in this country that the president is the decider here, just like he said. And the rest of us just better shut up and get used to it if we know what's good for us.
Cool site. Like the way logos are displayed - lot of functionailty. The RSS feeds are great too. Not much content yet - but then they just launched the beta.
Huh?  Look at the submitter's profile.  Doesn't look like a spammer to me.
There is much discussion about how an investigation to find boardroom leaks went wrong.  However, there is not much discussion on the right approach to find these leaks.  This article proposes several ideas.
Sorry! It's working now.(This is the first time I've been able to access an NYT article that was blocked earlier.)
wow
Well, to be frank it looked like some spam bot posting some useless junk lol About you feeling the language like a little girl, why don't you give it a try by writing a tutorial and posting it here? i.e. something related to what I have written? If you find anything incorrect, prove and post it here. About HTML and Code comment, different people think different way, but in the end it is a piece of code written in HTML right? lol About only one tip: CSS, well most of the things are rooted from CSS because you can just control the stuff from one file and you do not have to specify the font tags and other tags again and again in the code. So it has to be in relation with CSS. Emacs and Color themes - I am still trying to find relation with the 'clean code' and emacs or color theme. So before you post any of your crap, think twice and post.
Am I mistaken, or does the guy totally have an erection in one film?
"It really is the best illustration that the stereotype of blacks living in dangerous, concentrated, poor, slum, urban neighborhoods is misleading and doesn’t predominate,” he said. Sigh.  I wonder if a facility with statistics will someday be a common thing.  It seems very rare these days.  The guy who said that is a former professor at Princeton so it's not like you can even blame that statement on lack of education (if you are willing to call going to school for Political Science and education...) But that is such a stupid statement that I think it must be just a case of "If talking about race, turn brain off."  I mean, the whole point of this article is that this is a newsworthy siutation; it's unique! The worst thing is that the NYT editors and nearly all of us intelligent readers pass right over it, nodding.  Nothing to see here!
Too lazy to read the article.
do the russians still paint red stars on their planes?
Why is that deceptive? You'd see a similar curve if you ranked the wealth of almost anything. The top 10 richest people in the US have more wealth than the next 90 who follow them; The top 100 have more wealth than the bottom 150 million combined. Any of the corporations on that list have more wealth than the 150 or so nation-states that don't make that list. Which may or may not be troubling, depending on what you think the implications are. (I'll simply point out that the corporation overtaking the nation state as the dominant form of social organization has long been a staple of science fiction, and it's rarely potrayed as a good thing).
http://lookforbook.com/ is another excellent source of ebooks, especially for math and mathish science. (I just use it for math.) Some of the linked sites try to talk to you in Russian, but it's usually easy to navigate to the files without knowing Russian. Some files are pdf, the rest are in .djvu format. It's huge and excellent.
A notable post, have seen a long time. Worth reading.
Simple and to the point. We are (almost) all prisoners of our thirst for possessions.
After dealing with our hardward testing applications at work, written in Excel of course, this doesn't phase me at all.
It's not necessarily that people who don't want to read about politics on reddit are not political, it's that most political shit on reddit is redundant trash that i've already heard 5 times by the time I see it on reddit. The media is saturated with national/international politics and personally I get enough of it already. I do plenty of political activities, for ex: not owning a car, not owning a tv, donating to causes i believe in, donating my time and skills, ... but that doesn't mean i need to read another post about GWB being satan to realize the things i'm doing are the right things and vice-versa.  Personally I have a sneaking suspicion that plenty of people who spend a lot of time reading about politics do far to little actually doing and maybe that's why were still in this war(s) that everybody has plenty of time to read about.  
Household income?  I have a strong temptation to ignore these figures simply because having more or less income earners in a household affects this number.  Asians and Hispanics, have on the average, more members earning an income for a typical household (versus either Whites or Blacks), which would tend to inflate their household incomes.  This may also be the general case for immigrants as well.  Me thinks per capita income is more meaningful.
Stubble you said - "So he has an opinion that diverges from the mainstream. That's a crime? Ohh.. sorry forgot, in Bush's New Order any kind of criticism is a crime."   Being denied a visa is not something that is done only to criminals. So the issue of whether his opinion is a crime is irrelevant. No country is obliged to accept a person who justifies or makes excuses for those who murder it's citizens. Justifying the kind of terrosism that is responsible for 9/11 is an utterly disgusting thing to do not because it "diverges from the mainstream" but because it is evil.   The fact that you try to twist this as being merely a "criticism of Bush" is pathetic. 
needs better gallery browsing mechanism
The link's numbers and rankings are from 2000. A lot has happened in the last six years. For example, China's GDP has been growing at well over 10% a year for the last 6 years.  It is now the world's 3rd largest economy.  On that list, it's 7th.
That's a piece of paper a judge will look at, after the fact.  I still have to be presented in front of the right judge, and its not obvious there won't be plenty of wrong judges the administration can choose to submit me to. I was hoping for a piece of paper that says these rules can't apply to me, so that when the gestapo comes, I can just waive it at them, and send them on their merry way.  Surely, some people think they have an exclusion clause.
The bag with the gun was used in a campaign to promote the latest book of the Belgian crime writer [Pieter Aspe](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Pieter_Aspe).
fucking linkjack
Perhaps later he'll discuss the divine design of nuts. Or those berries that you can never pick without a bit of the stem sticking on unappetizingly. Or corn, which only became such a great crop after centuries of selective breeding by humans. Forget bananas; dishonest idiots like Kirk Cameron are the real atheist's nightmare.
Plus that'll hardly make me sleep better at night. Imagine if in the USA, your vote was weighted by the amount of wealth you had. The top 10% of the population would control 90% of the vote, and get to pick the winners every time (even more than they do now). But that's corporate governance. Further, the percentage of people who *are* shareholders is vanishingly small; especially if you exclude the people who are only involved through retirement savings. Secondly, this "accountability" only tends to be towards the bottom line. Coporations are legally obliged to maximize the returns to their shareholders. They're not accountable to, say, the public good, it's employees, or anyone else who might be impacted by the corporation's actions, financially or otherwise. "Despotic" is a good way to describe them.
My current favorite is Inconsolata: http://www.levien.com/type/myfonts/inconsolata.html.  I just wish it had a bold version as well.
Looks like [it's not the first time](http://www.answersingenesis.org/creation/v19/i4/blood.asp) this has happened. Here's some more info from an [alternative view on dinosaur bones](http://www.answersingenesis.org/creation/v21/i1/dinosaurbones.asp).
51 are now corporations? &gt; Note: When Sarah Anderson and John Cavanagh first did this comparison in their original report *in 1996, there were still 51 corporations* out of the top 100 economies, even though the order has changed.
&gt;Of course, pilots practice and eventually their "common sense" learns to incorporate flying into it's repertoire... but this is learned, not innate. Hmm, is the ability to walk innate or learned?
I wish he was my daddy so that every day he came home I could tell him "Dad, you're a goddamn idiot".
When programming, you *need* to be able to distinguish 0 and O, and 1, l, and I. True story: one of my friends spent ten minutes trying to get her code to compile until she found that it had an uppercase O where there should have been a zero. She was using Courier New, 9 pt. Since then, I never use it.
&gt; Well, to be frank it looked like some spam bot posting some useless junk lol &gt; So before you post any of your crap, think twice and post. Insincere sneering stupidity. &gt; Emacs and Color themes - I am still trying to find relation with the 'clean code' and emacs or color theme. I am still trying to find the relationship between this observation and a chicken.  ... wait, no.  I am trying to find the relation between "make[ing] your code look beautiful" and some means to make your code look beautiful.  That makes more sense.
So you ’ve decided that you’re going to do it. The list of 7 tips will help you in that!
[More than you ever needed to know about bananas](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Banana)
OK, here's my problem with this whole "evolution vs. intelligent design" debate: testicles. Yes, testicles; the thought that such sensitive apparatus is left hanging outside the body in a completely ridiculous little sack that provides absolutely no physical protection whatsoever, inviting anybody and everybody to disable its owner with a well-placed kick between the legs, is something that leaves me wondering who's responsible for this utterly absurd state of affairs. Yes, I know the "scientific" explanation about sperm production needing lower temperatures to work right, but this is about as persuasive as having to have the digestive system outside the body because certain nutrients can only be absorbed at lower temperatures; there's no rational explanation for the temperature requirement. No, I think this "lower temperature" bullshit, and the resulting "balls in a sack" design bears testimony to a designer who was markedly unintelligent and/or drunk and/or high and/or had a thoroughly twisted and sick sense of humour, and no QA department to catch his/her mistakes. I mean, this cretin would be fired on the spot from any halfway decent engineering department. OTOH, in my less angry and more lucid moments I'm waiting for a new kind of male to evolve, one that has no problems with producing sperm at normal core body temperature, and carries his testicles inside the body, shielded by two thick layers of bone. This newly evolved superman race will dispatch male members of the old human race with well-placed kicks aimed at stupid little leather sacks, and restore my faith in evolution.
I have four guns.
But corporations are all intermediate owners without actual goals. They just exist as a legal entity used by owners to accomplish a given goal. I don't really see why you'd rather be loyal to a country than a corporation; if the corporation starts misbehaving, you can call your broker and sell. If your country starts misbehaving, you have to move.
Yes and they are all just manipulating transistors to represent bits anyway so what is the difference.
Nice astroturfing job there, Mike Elgan.  Do MS's balls taste so good to you? He also mentions that one of Zune's advantages is its ability to share music across players, which is of course bullshit.  There's no way kids with Zune's will be able to freely swap their DRM'd music as they do on Kazaa, Limewire, etc.  At most, they'll be able to listen to songs on each others' Zune's, but they won't actually be able to get the actual song from their friends' Zune's onto theirs.  Mike was conveniently vague on that point.
Nah, only 256B of those distinguish us as human.  The rest implement a mammal in layers. 
Powell threw away his chance to make a resounding change for the better in this world.  Twice.  First, he decided not to be the republican candidate in a run for the presidency, which he probably would have won.  Then, after he became secretary of state, he decided to fall in line and lead the march to Bush's war.   What a terrible waste he made of a promising and rare opportunity to make a real and significant change for the better in this world.  Oh well.
[man sed](http://unixhelp.ed.ac.uk/CGI/man-cgi?sed)
It hasn't been an English internet for a very long time. Just becasuse we're speaking English on this site it doesn't mean that everyone here is a native English speaker. Because YouTube isn't text driven it's a good place to see other languages being used. Normally people just visit the sites they understand...
The main problem is that the reddit page is terribly written. For example:  &gt; Reddit has expanded to include several subreddits, lists which focus on a specific area. A recent PC World article comparing reddit and digg gave the edge to reddit, adding that "reddit may represent the future of community news filters". Ehh.. weren't we talking about subreddits? I doubt "the show with zefrank" is more popular than reddit, but compare the wiki pages. http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/The_show_with_zefrank
Yeah.  And the problem is that we don't hold those 'special bi-Weekly meetings' to ratify our current Executive Officer's decisions.  Someone should look into implementing that.
Hilarious! (and weirdly hard hitting)
Fairly sad statement ...
no
_"If we get the average one of those 100,000 eBooks to those 100,000,000 people we are targeting. . .that is TEN TRILLION eBOOKS!!!"_ Lies, damn lies and arithmetic.
For someone who used to serve as a major economic advisor to a Democratic administration, Stiglitz is mighty eager to write off the entire value of veteran's benefits. Spending money on a soldier's pension isn't like spending money on bombs: When the bomb explodes, the value is wiped out, but when the pension money is spent, it goes back into the economy. In fact, Keynes (incorrectly) claimed that since this money is spent faster than non-government money, a certain amount of taxation and spending would increase economic growth. Most of the estimates are better (see the [original  paper](http://reddit.com/info/kgxt/comments)), but that particular accounting decision needs some justification.
&gt; The researchers said it was possible that other substances in the soft drinks, such as caffeine, were to blame for the symptoms... So instead of blaming hyperactivity on the obvious stimulant drug, they blamed it on something else.  Sugar may not be good, but this study has no value.
I'm running VS2005 on Vista post RC1 and it's working like magic.
While this account may well be factual, I find anything on a creationist site suspect. By their own admission, they hold an obvious bias in favor of "truth" versus fact; where their Biblical interpretation is used to verify or disprove physical data. By that logic, science becomes as accurate as a particular belief system, which completely negates the idea of science.  That's akin to creationists accusing "atheistic scientists" of tampering with data to support "godless origins."  I've read many creationist abstracts, and find a disconcerting blend of verifiable details, rumor, rash conclusions, and logical fallacies. Just look at the third paragraph, where the conclusion is quickly drawn that these bones are a few thousand years old(!) That conclusion is not based on data, but on the writer's interpretation of Genesis (see above).  If someone believes in God, it's still important to make the distinction between fact and belief, particularly in regards to physical processes. Otherwise, our world becomes one of magic and superstition.
Propellors?  Geez.
I've recommended this book on Reddit before, but Status Anxiety by Alain de Button is a great read.
You're talking about this? &gt;It is of course much less of a surprise to those who believe Genesis, in which case dinosaur remains are at most only a few thousand years old. I don't see that as drawing a conclusion.  It's simply stating that the data here is in line with the expectations of the creationist.
well not entirely, jesus says believe in me and the gates of heaven will be open to you. Sure everyone should do good, but if your an atheist, you don't know why your doing good (other than abiding the law?). so its really to no avail. i dont say that all atheists go to hell, the fate of anybody  is only decided by God, so nobody knows. But somebody who says they believe in jesus, and rally dont act like a christian "don't really believe in him", i'm talking about just some earthly sinning like everyone does. but if you really are a bad person, believe in jesus or not, i believe you dont have the best odds of getting in 
The current US government fighting against a big corporation?  That's like the episode of Star Trek where the half white/half back guy fights against the half black/half white guy.
also from the article: &gt;As late as 1989, the U.S. Post Office issued four dinosaur stamps, Tyrannosaurus, Stegosaurus, Pteradon and Brontosaurus, for which it was accused, amongst other things, of "fostering scientific illiteracy." Should we be fostering scientific illiteracy as well? ;)
if i stood behind you and threw a ball at your head. you could believe with all your might that the ball wasn't there, but in the end it would still hit you in the back of the head.
isn't that also called one of the "life skills"?
Pineapple?  How will that help?
when God crated everything, it was good. people are the ones who corrupt it. Not God, he gave us free will, I suggest you should thank him for that at least
bittorrent is your friend
